Okay I'm going to get downvoted to hell for this but there is a difference between this guy and Nyberg.  Namely that he knows it's fucked but as long as he doesn't act out in rl or post pictures or visit the kind of sites Nyberg did I don't have an issue with him being free so to speak.  There is a huge fucking difference between this guy and someone who thinks pedophilia is okay and that the laws against it are wrong aka Nyberg.  Just figured I'd say my piece /shrug.I think you are thinking of cheong there mate.Is Nacho Shield not a racial slur when used to attack a Hispanic woman?  He cut the fucking bottom out of his pants maybe that's why he is defending nyberg because he trends the same way.  Seriously dude that fucking person is someone you consider good are you fucking joking?  How about the underaged sex comments he made are those excusable as well?So pretty much none of gg cool so we can never hear that idiocy again.I'll have to post about it on my tumblrs that I'll have to make though I suppose storify is the new version of it.Huh guess it's must be reactionaries crying when I say that the Witcher 3 devs had all the right in the world to make a game only about polish people.Racism begets more racism much like bigotry begets more bigotry.  You need to fucking learn this.I will trade places with a millionaire black transexual in a fucking heartbeat.It's already past as far as woman go, over 60% of college entrants and rising still.Okay when you have woman being hired at a rate of two times their appearance in the talent pool yes it is punishing others in the pool no matter how you try to dress it up.Nah. If I will condemn a report that wouldn't muster a passing grade from any competent professor.It's what you are advocating for whether you realize it or not.It should be but it isn't currently.Are we talking about the school that was allowing anonymous reports with no evidence and taking action based on them because that was fucked.I'm not you are.  You are directly saying discrimination against males is good.  People should be being hired at a rate proportionate to their talent pool otherwise you are likely fucking a group over.I'm pretty sure Tax has said he is with one of the top tax firms in the area and is able to do work from home at times correct /u/TaxTime2015 I might be thinking of someone else.Hm to be a multimillionaire black and trans or to be a poor ass white kid who got seriously fucked up for a while by having drug addict parents who were also super religious choices choices.  You know I think I'll take having the chauffeur drive me around while I flip off anyone who spews a racial epithet.  Bruno will deal with them if they try anything physical.Some of mine are fucking dead.You just fucking did by saying inequalities are okay as long as they are against the right people.Tax we both know that is not what it meant.

Are you fucking kidding me?  We are talking about men who are in their early to mid 20s and could literally rip a girl in half if she said no.  Yeah you fucking stick up for the teenager also what fucking state are you in that 16 is legal and not statutory for a 22 year old.  Which is likely the lowest we are talking aboutYeah I really don't get it though I will say Batista was damn good in GoTGSame, edit with one caveat gone home was fucking trash.  Much like the current gah gah over life was strange I don't fucking get how people with brains could give that a 10.It's moderate lefts vs extreme lefts more than anything there are some right wing but it's more moderate left than anything.  Trust me I still consider the repubs even crazier than most SJWs with exceptions of ones who defend child predators because wtf.bingoA lot of us are on the autistic spectrum hell I flat out said in my interview I think differently; that can be a challenge in day to day life or social interactions however I consider it a strength when it comes to coding and design.Than explain exactly what you are saying.  How does hiring females above their percentage of the talent pool not directly discriminate against those males without jobs who are still in the pool?That is not what I asked explain how it is not discrimination against the rest of the talent pool to hire people at a rate significantly higher than their percentage of the talentpool.This sounds more like AS than anyone especially the excluding certain ideas part.I think reviews have always been rather shit but at least previously they were mainly about product features.  Now they are about stuff the average gamer really doesn't give a shit about.  Personally I would prefer it if reviews had no score whatsoever and were far more in depth than they are currently.4 and 5 heathenThat would be because people actually give in.  You give me a winning lottery number I'll take care of my gma and myself the rest of my "family" can fucking rot.  I haven't spoke to them in years and the only reason to hearing their voices on the phone or them turning up would be slam the phone down or slam the door and call the cops if they didn't leave.my mistake sorry misunderstood.I've already seen these part of the issue is people don't know how to say no as cold as that may sound.  Honestly I would move my grandma near me and get a permanent home everything else would go into solid stocks with an emergency fund.  If there is a recession I could ride it out and just buy at the bottom since I would have financial stability anyway.Most states are 2 to 4 years even 5 most nfl players are over 21.  I'm also not doxing myself did you miss the 2nd part of the sentence?

&gt;What fucking state are you in that 16 is legal and **not statutory for a 22 year old**

The key to this was 22 and statutory.  That is hugely different than a 16 year old having sex with a 17 year old.
Violence in some cases.  Overdoses yep; suicide possible but uncertain.  Also quite a few are in the military and on active duty so who knows what will happen with them.New Hope &gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt; Return come at me broHalf plus 7 is the rule, so uh yeah.  Yes 16 is the age of consent but most states have specific things ie you must be within 2 years.

https://www.cga.ct.gov/2003/olrdata/jud/rpt/2003-R-0376.htm

Not necessarily rape but felony/misdemeanor absolutely.  Also seriously you are going to defend not standing up for a 16 year old who couldn't stop them if she tried and lets be honest was most likely drunk.chromas don't count.  Though pool party is at least decent.  Cosmic zac could be awesome though just a blob of the night sky his expody would be a supernova his slow would be a back hole.  His ulty could be metorites crashing to earth.  His jump maybe a moon crashing to earth idk could do so much stuff with a cosmic theme.The real question is why the hell is he reading the twitter of a game series I'm guessing he actively dislikes given his positions.It isn't over yet, there is a reason c9 wasn't in it :Dno bad yasuo badI can't wait to Kabum you.It's Jen Hale aka fem shep.  Also Lissandra but she has heavy distortion for that.  We actually have no idea who the announcer is in game.Warriors is so fucking good.I think reddit would collapse if this happened.Well green didn't show up and neither did we so I guess we are going with synthesis Hai absorbs faker and goes only to win worlds.Hey someone else beat TL and Gravity and didn't lose to TSM once this split.It's because Warriors was fucking god tier.It's because Warriors was fucking god tier.And Nyberg got a fucking hugbox thread on ghazi.I wouldn't know.Everything except for four agree with you don't solve inequality with more inequality.It's not really a conspiracy she whined when there was the best possible version of a damsel in distress who saved you twice about how the devs should be embarrassed.  She is heavily anti violence as well see her doom tweets.It is complicated however he is the difference uncon if she said no we are talking about people who could literally rip her in half we are also supposedly talking about multiple dudes.  Now could kluwe have made it up to seem important absolutely but I'm assuming he isn't lying.I don't think you have any clue where I grew up.  I have childhood friends dead due to gang violence, overdose and possibly a suicide if not it was just another murder.I think child predator trumps conservative but hey your choice.Yeah I recognized it and i simply didn't reply because I was fate limited though I had one typed up.  I really couldn't care less about an actual harasser's opinion of me.  She also has literally zero insight into the industry.Compromise at this point is kind of impossible tbh.  Most of us are beyond disgusted with anyone who would defend an actual child predator.Compromise at this point is kind of impossible tbh.  Most of us are beyond disgusted with anyone who would defend an actual child predator.It also comes from their crazy ass mechanics let's be honest.I mean the hugbox thread in ghazi I mean people like hokes were the ones who pushed the moratorium in the first place all because this person happens to agree with them on this specific issue.  I can't understand overlooking something like that just because this person spends hours a day trying to make gg look bad by selecting tweets.I didn't say it did but it makes it a hell of a lot more likely for a girl to just go along with it especially with the reputation nfl players have in the media whether deservedly or not.They need to at least finish it.  Polygon absolutely did not finish mad max because they never got to pink eye or they wouldn't have put their bullshit about not strong female characters in.  Also for fucks sake get people who can actually make it through on difficulties other than easy.  Easy is put in for bads most games are meant to be played on either normal or hard.I've said to work to change the fucking law I am absolutely disgusted by it.  HW has said he will only remove illegal content unfortunately this content is not illegal yet so make it fucking illegal.  Also you are talking about a tiny board vs a major face and a thread where every single comment had to be moderator approved.

Oh and don't try to fucking tell me what I believe.\u201cWithout Freedom of thought there can be no such thing as wisdom;and no such thing as public liberty, without freedom of speech.\u201dSo is FNC this good or is IG back to their usual form is the question here.They are inconsistent but Kakao and Rookie are both top 10 players when playing at the top of their game  Their issue is their bot lane more than anything.  The picked top Riven and didn't get ahead basically they are fucked.in for bads as in people who are bad at games.In this example they are born with money I will take that upbringing over my own thanks.Looking for non biased opinions I have no idea honestly looks like IG's bot and top shit the bed and fnc took advantage but who knows.I didn't see a denial I saw an attempt to turn around no denial of defending Nyberg.It's common internet speak.  Bads refers to people who are bad aka scrubs newbs ect.  People who play a lot but still suck and aren't beginners.yes for the most part, the issue is good teams attract bandwagons we used to have a lot for c9 not as many as TSM or fnatic especially this season for fnatic.  It's like the patriots except people legit hate the patriots not just their fans. Rek is weaker than Reignover tbh every single other player besides Rek is top 2 EU for their role.Kabum shoo AliianceDAMNNNNNNNo that's our rolemight not need to reverse sweep :PI think we are all as surprised as you.Correct, I think incarn's veigar is going to be permaed now so what does it open up.Or C9 just outplayed the shit out of them and played at a level they didn't even play vs gauntlet that deep warding so beautiful.It's going to be permaed so what does it open up is the question.Those kicks hnnnghI'm kind of surprised they took gp over darius but w/e we won.da fuck did I just watchI love trist bombs on turrets people underestimate that damage so much.Wrong one https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=r-EleGBnHuA

or

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8J-hJzZhiVcBetter? Just really sick of people going you are following a doctrine no I'm actually not and I don't particularly care about what some rando has written.In games people undestimate both the range and how much damage it does with a full stack.  I get so many kills on people trying to wave clear with it.5Pft my pickem is still on track I wasn't going to cheer against my team for a skin however awesome it may be.C9 had amazing wards otherwise quite a few of those would have worked.  Especially the attempt at sneaky.I want c9 and fnc to get out of groups hell lets go tsm and og as well because fuck it.  And since we are going nuts Pain and CLG AND H2k and BKTHai's Lee Sin was fucking phenomenal seriously those kicks wow.  Seems like they are pulling out all the stops in his last year and that veigar.  So you force veigar bans from now on and what does that leave open.Nah that will be in about a month :PScuttle scripts okayCan we make Montee cast it I want to hear the repressed rage.It's not so much that Meteos wasn't performing it's that his style isn't compatible with incarn.  Meteos likes to hard farm jungle incarn wants ganks to get ahead and push advantages.  Meteos also tends to babysit top something Hai doesn't do he is far more mid focused.C9 had deep wards so he saw it coming but yeah good reaction.How exactly is it argument? I have never read the rules for radicals bs they keep bringing up.I still can't believe Forte is seriously on the trade block.  Would seriously look wrong to see him in a different uniform.Oh I'm not done, for final C9 vs CLG and make Monte cast it.fiora is absurd right now if you are decent.She can be shut down but not with gnar basically.  If you don't shut her down in lane she will shit on your dreams later.It's simple, we ban the fiorawell this game is unfortunately going as expected zzzyup and those are weird as hell, even I like the second one.That's like saying vayne wasn't broken during botrk initial release because you could shut her down in lane but if you didn't hooo boyNiels Hjarnan Freeze and arguably Forg1venEquality of outcome would be people being hired at a rate proportionate to their percentage of the talent pool given at places like Intel people are currently being hired at nearly double that rate I would have to say it doesn't exist atm.  Of course it's not for the reasons people are claiming but rather the opposite.  There also doesn't appear to be equality of opportunity when people are getting a leg up for skin color or sex but that is just my opinion /shrug.I'm liking the TSM skip :PI expected the reverse sweeps to continue but we have evolved beyond that it seems

^^^tbh ^^^I ^^^expected ^^^no ^^^wins ^^^in ^^^groups ^^^and ^^^just ^^^wanted ^^^to ^^^be ^^^the ^^^kabum ^^^for ^^^this ^^^year ^^^if ^^^possibleWe saw Hai play a damn good lee sin this group is going to be very interesting.We almost made it interesting watch c9 vs ssb game 4 literally 1 second away from taking them to game 5 that fucking nami bubbleLook at their review their complaints about not having strong woman characters would have been answered if they finished the game.They were trying things they had never played on stage they didn't work so they went back to what did.Eh I mean maybe for you I'm still perfect.Lol no yellow might be better but sneaky is literally a tier above rek.You are beyond delusional.No they didn't finish the game because there is a character that answers literally every possible complaint.  A wheelchair bound old woman with a shotgun who is the fucking leader of her area and a badass.  Checks off almost every box.  Not conventionally attractive disabled and a leader to boot only issue possible is she is white /gaspSpoiler that will be because Kakao and rookie not because of shitastic bot lane.  Assuming it happens of course.It's not a connection it's a character who goes directly contrary to their claims.Considering the only "argument" people can muster is you using rules for radicals derp it is rather amusing.Didn't defend shit said he served his time and should be allowed in an area that has pretty much zero people to tempt him.  Not sure if you have been to an mtg tourney but a guy made a documentary called buttcrack odyssey or something of one believe it or not there are very few females there.  The only people I go after about that are people I've specifically seen attack 8 chan and then be completely silent on Nyberg.So we have double retirement mojo, shit the ravens one the superbowl with just one retiring.  Cloud 9 confirmed to be champions of the universe soon.Honestly it depends on your skill level it's nice for league but for I flat out won't play CS without it just makes it silky smooth it's hard to explain.  It also depends on both your role and what champions you play.  If you are jumping all other place with lee while holding down space to keep centered it's very noticeable.So how fast can c9 learn korean because that would solve the whole shotcalling issue we have upcoming as well.Butts was never charged, hence you cannot say that.The Baltimore Ravens went on an insane playoff run following the news that the emotional core of the team was retiring this culminated in a super bowl win.  Cloud 9 has not 1 but 2 players retiring as such we aren't just talking world champions we are talking universe champions :DSorry I don't take well to hearing how "privileged" I am.  Also he paged me to fucking bestofoutrage where I proceeded to run into such luminaries as harper and yourmomsreddit account and yup I shit on people there since it isn't against their rules.&gt;cause you don't care or have to care. You already one. Now you want to take your ball and go home

How is that not rule one?  Saying someone should fuck off because they are white therefore they are privileged no matter how they grew up.you do realize the late 1990s would be over 15 years ago at this point right?He is the most impressive candidate he should get the job period I don't care if he is white black brown red green blue purple orange teal chartreuse w/e the candidate who is best for the job should get it.  Otherwise you are discriminating based on race full fucking stop. No you wouldn't you would never get equality of outcome especially between genders.  People have different interests and there are just more people of certain races than others.  Now what you could get is proportionate hiring equal to the percentage of the talent pool that a group comprises.  That is what I would consider to be equality of outcome and it would come naturally from equality of opportunity.  However we currently have groups being hired at rates far above their percentage of the talent pool.I lost the fucking game judge I just said fuck it and worked my ass off anyway.  I was born into a family with pretty much no income and shit genes as  well as addiction problems.  I worked my ass off to do well in both sports and school but I wasn't good enough to get the needed scholarships I couldn't get scholarships as a minority because I wasn't one.  I also emancipated myself from my family as soon as I legally could.  So what did I do I traveled using work visas and did pretty damn hard labor because one thing I could do was work I saved up enough to live on and was able to get loans and go to school.  Now I'm doing something that frankly I have no business doing with my upbringing.  Oh and I'm on the autism spectrum though I am very high functioning thankfully.  If I can fucking do it than people who actually get a leg up certainly can.4th and 10 on our own 5 2 minutes left down 10.  Well I can either say fuck it and give up or I can say okay I've got this and I'm going to get this done. Eh their hiring in the last year disagrees they are hiring woman at a 35% rate with a 19% talent pool there is certainly something funny going on there in that regard.Not True because people have different interests what should be True is that their hiring rate should be equal to their percentage of the talent pool.You really want to talk to me about my father?  My father who owned no land whatsoever who would get fired from jobs due to addiction?  Who was the main reason I grew up in the shithole I did?  You seem to think that just because people are white they magically get great tracts of land it doesn't work like that.  Someone like Trump literally doesn't give a fuck about the color of your skin.  He claims to because it might win him more power all they care about are power and money.  It's not a coincidence large chunks of his tax cuts would effect his tax bracket specifically.  They couldn't give a damn whether some random white dude lives a nice middle class life or dies in the gutter with a needle stuck in his arm.someone make a drop it track with bkt let's confuse the fuck out of inven :DA lot of people wear nfl gear as fashion especially in europe you would be rather surprised at the amount of raiders gear.  TB is also from Cali and hadn't been accused at that point.  He reps a lot of people from Cali especially south central.I'm pretty sure they would be an all out scramble even from us.  Could make a new record for kicker salaries.  Hell there are teams that might even part with a first to trade for him cough steelers coughSnoop seems more like a player fan than a team fan but could be.  Like I said he tends to rep most good cali players at one point or another.  Kind of a region fan I guess idk.THOSE CRITS ARE BULLSHIT AND ARE ALSO ON FOR SEASON FINALSTAGGEDANYONE KNOW FNATIC REDDIT USER NAMES SO WE CAN PAGE THEM TO PARTICIPATE IN THIS WORTHY CAUSE?IT WILL CHANGE WHEN WE ACTUALLY PLAY EACH OTHER DON'T WORRYMINE ISN'TUH INCARNATI0N?Judge I went to a school that was 50/50; I didn't go to a good school there were pretty much zero support systems for me whatsoever.  The only reason I graduated is honestly because high school is easy and I could skate I don't have genius level intellect but I do have intelligence that is significantly above average.So wait it's terrifyingly recent yet history changes rapidly over a short period of time which is it?Disagree so they played you and did like shit bang is a top 4 adc in the world according to quite a few.  He wasn't playing at this level when you guys played fnatic the first time.I wasn't aware that removed crimes.I'm specifically talking about gender which people argue should be 50/50 regardless of the talent pool.  Where woman in tech are currently being hired at a rate nearly double their percentage of the talent pool.Except for the fact that men and woman are psychologically different in general no matter how much you try to deny it.No he really didn't.  You have no fucking clue about my family.Your new one is even better though.Group of Death = 3 or more strong teams on approximately the same level one of which can't make it out.  C, A, and I would argue D all have clear cut favorites.  B doesn't especially with c9 winning and IG floundering our group could turn crazy.So what are you planning to do I assume you are creating a portfolio with all of these but what exactly are you looking to do for career just curious.  Really well done either way.Sigh see link.  Experiments with primates show differences in choices between genders even when there are literally no possible social pressures.

http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0018506X080009491. Yes should have disclosed it

2.  Yes

3. 24 isn't a lot of time should have been 48.

4.  Yes I consider it unethical

5. Yes in terms of disclosure but I don't know if this is fabricated or not.  If it's not fabricated the information is important for the public since star citizen is still selling products as well speak.  If it is fabricated it is massively unethical otherwise it just needs disclosures added.  Most of the issues in general for both this article and others would have been fixed by simply adding disclosures, but yes as it stands this is unethical and should be on deepfreeze.You are get over it.  That doesn't make you responsible for all the actions of a group but you are a group.Anyone who posts here is likely fairly deep in gg whether pro or anti tbh.Oh for fucks sake someone could sign their name as AS and send a death threat to Obama doesn't make her responsible for it.Yup a lot of them.  Hell a lot of them are features on boards like /cow/ and were long before gg people like coffin.Wtf are you talking about PL?  There is no subtle hint of racism it's a simple statement.  When people dared to even talk about the BLM crap at the Sanders rally is when the ghazi mods made their everyone is racist but us post.So leigh's article?There have been other riots tax ....PL I'm going to be honest here I flat out think she posted the initial dox she tried to do the same type of thing but on steam but didn't sign out of her dev account first.  She has shown no compunction about lying even to the national media when she claimed she hadn't been home and and didn't know when she would be again while in her fucking home.  I trust her less than any other face involved in this mess and I don't trust many of them whether pro or anti.

Nobody had any fucking clue who she was before GG she is literal nobody.  The most common posts on the dox thread were go home briana you're drunk and who the fuck is this.Which she managed to screencap less than a second later come the fuck on PL.People have also gotten away with murder because the only evidence was circumstantial.Nowhere near the most visible woman in gaming at least not to actual gamers.  Jade Amy Kim Jen are the four biggest names that most people who game would know yet not a single one has been targeted maybe throw Tara in there as well though I don't think people know just how many characters she voices.Would you like me to link the post bashing on a guy because he happens to be a magic world champ?He is one of their own is the thing.Yet the person who was mocked most prior to the UN women shitstorm was #FullMcIntosh weird.Possibly because ZQ and Sarkessian just gave a talk to UN woman advocating for online censorship because people were disagreeing with them.Liana K course ghazi hates her so ....

https://www.youtube.com/user/LianaK/playlists

There are links to the articles which are just transcripts of the videos and are much quicker to read.  Go through the 2nd playlist particularly.Uh not True there was actually a high upvoted thread basically saying fuck you it's unethical.8 months ago it didn't but now we have people pushing at UN women for censorship of speech because people are disagreeing with them on the internet.It's not necessarily that it's that prior to gg I consider sjws to be a fringe lunatic group like WBC unfortunately we have seen people actually pushing for censorship using the ideas of these batshit insane people.Have a nice day all, if I don't leave right now I'm going to say something that will get me banned.You guys didn't do your job fix it.Uh why would we be jelly both NA teams won yesterday we don't talk about the salt pile in the corner :PA 23 minute win against a team that was supposed to curb stomp them with Hai going insec on Lee doesn't look promising?Could have a final series for second seed more Bo5s yes please.HEY NOW BJERG AND HIS FOUR WARDS DO THEIR BEST BE NICEPretty sure he was useless all game.C9 did the same thing with fizz for west door yesterday.  Seems like the West in general is baiting picks should be interesting to see if we can keep doing it.1. Saying it looks promising isn't saying they are gods
2. See 1
3. His mechanics on lee sin for that game were the level commonly refered to as insec, get over it.Shouldn't C9 technically be above Fnatic since they had a faster win?I mean did we expect anything else?Faker has 2 deaths they already won.Yes Jennifer Hale, Kim Swift, Amy Hennig, and Jade Raymond absolute dwarf any of the aGG faces.Hey man I just want to be on top for a bit everything after this is gravy :DFor any actual gamer yeah they do I don't give a fuck what non gamers think.  Jen Hale did the league trailer for worlds and people instantly recognized the voice much like Nolan North and Troy Baker she is insanely well known by gamers.  Kim Swift Portal nuff said.  Amy Uncharted, Jak and Daxter and a star wars game soonish Jade AC series and star wars soonish.  Yes these people utterly dwarf someone who has made a twine project a ps1 level game in quality and a z list e celeb who make videos crying about sexy characters in games.No it took censorship aka the DMCA followed by more censorship and then the gamers are dead articles stop trying to rewrite history.Well at least here you admit she is nobody who is not a highly known face in the industry so should I report your other post for arguing in bad faith?Get him a hockey rule book problem solved get him an office since he sounds like the most senior member of the team and that he might work better in an quiet environment.  Playing hockey in high school really isn't a qualification hockey in high school is miles different than in college and that is miles different than international which is miles different from the NHL.  If your hypothetical candidate even with his quirks has held multiple leadership positions chances are he is damn good.  So I will take the AAA guy you take your guy who flat out isn't as good and I will make a better game.  I'll just give him an office so he can sing all he wants.I don't care about mainstream I'm talking about gamer recognition.  I have no idea how the hell you can not recognize Kim Swift or Jennifer Hale at the very least.Please explain it in other terms one of the reasons given was because people were calling her a liar.  That isn't harassment.I said the 2nd playlist which is specifically about her take and includes a deconstruction of DAI and why she feels it's actually a step backwards compared to origins in terms of representation.  But hey keep strawmanning nobody sees through it honest.I'm going to be honest I was actually really disappointed with infinite.  It was a fun shooter but the script was /r/iamverysmart worthy.  To many things just flat out didn't track and didn't fit even the ending just ugh.

Agreed more mirrors edge I'm really worried the 2nd is going to try to put emphasis on gun play but I'm hoping I'm wrong.I also like to compare it to deus ex where Jensen is literally mutilated and large portions of his body are replaced in what is essentially the opening cinematic.Good thing I named both highly influential devs and voice actors then.Nope still a nobody to gamers at large.Depends on the moba in league 5 hours might be 5 games and there are 5 roles plus champs for those roles.I can't imagine someone playing that particular game more than once but that is just me.Okay someone could sign BLM on a death threat to Obama that doesn't make BLM responsible same fucking thing.The thing is literally nobody had any clue who she was prior to GG at all.  She verifiably did what I said on steam I can link you the archive.  She verifiably lied about not being in her house and not knowning when she would be back while giving an interview from her house.  So yeah I don't believe a thing she says, if she said that water freezes I would have to test to make sure.No I'm not the vast majority of gamers have no idea GG even exists.fffffffffffffffffffffffffffff

Why couldn't it be jinx.She has 7 skins including warden yeah she might get some new visual effects but she already has a gold and silver skin.  I was really hoping for jinx you could do some awesome stuff with her particles.Jinx or vayne for solo q would have both worked.  Victorious is based on solo q not lcs.  Champ is based on lcs.So is warden siv that didn't stop themonly 50?  Would be easier for me to just spam random words in chat and get chat restricted I think than to lose down to silver.Seriously why the fuck not jinx sobsIt's fucking warden with a helmet fffffffIf jinx gets challenger skin I'm okay with that but she should have been victorious :(Which is why people wanted it to be any adc but siv sighyup sighseriously I already have a victorious siv skin it's called warden sigheh Siv has pretty much always been decent in higher elo but yeah she has fucking warden.  Jinx is who it should have been.it's warden unmasked your disappointment is warranted.It's not even so much adc it's that she already has warden if it was going to be adc it should have been jinx.jinxAs someone who does main adc I speak for pretty much all ADC mains when I say literally any adc but sivir would have been better Warden is already basically a victorious skin.meh season 3 was support/jungle season 4 was jungle/support lol
It's sivir unfortunately.Because she has fucking warden already literally any other adc would have been better.The only part that is a conspiracy theory is her posting her own dox.  I can provide archives of the steam post and she flat out admitted eventually that the interviews were from her office aka home because it looked more professional.  Doesn't change the fact she lied on national tv.Siv has been highly contested it's just she already has warden it should have been jinxThe reason most of us are tweaked is because it's likely going to basically be maskless warden she already has a gold and silver armor skin.So you don't all in you kite back duh.  The entire reason siv is picked is her R provides insane mobility to the team.  Cait is picked because she makes your life hell in lane that includes against siv.Jinx, Vayne these are fun to play Sivir is not.She is the champ that you tell the person who hasn't done adc but gets stuck to play because at least her ult will be useful for the team.  That really says it.Kalista already got champ and siv has warden jinx is definitely up there.  We are talking solo q not lcsIf you are facing a cait with a brain you won't catch them in a bad posistion her range makes that hard to happen.no duhhell no c9 and clg first tsm 4th the way it should beBasically the ending doesn't actually solve anything.  The split in the timeline is even earlier at the very least.  The first concrete split is where the twins are born we are only in the reality of one of the twins.  Than they let at least one booker live who is to say that doesn't cause another split where said booker goes back and gets baptized anyway.  Essentially it doesn't wrap up neat and tidy as people think it does there is a bunch more but yeah.Then you don't have a problem with discrimination, it's really quite simple.  Btw teaching is female dominated yet I'm pretty sure there would be bloody murder being screamed if males were being hired at a rate above their percentage of the talent pool.Because that's exactly what happens to those kind of areas in real life.  They are popular for a year than people get bored and they make another and they fall right back into disrepair.  Much like how they stuck the whole food in the new one city wok made.True but the same goes for aGG course in many cases their faces are completely open with harassment they just don't give a fuck ie harper quinn AS ect.Places without guns tend to have higher instances than normal of stabbings and road rage.  Perhaps just maybe a better solution would be to attempt to remove the stigma surrounding mental health care and get people help.  That said semi automatics and automatics should flat out not be available for sale.Yes, there is a heavy stigma surrounding getting help in the US.Better idea remove the mental stigma from mental health also shouldn't you be saying men in general seeing as the highest number of deaths from gun violence outside of war are due to gang violence that tends to be black on black.  I mean if you want to be sexist you could at least do it right.I'm sure you won't have issues providing examples then?Actually it still is apparently being a racist bigot isn't against the rules which is interesting I suppose.Weird that I don't see black leaders coming out and taking responsibility for black on black violence and actually doing anything about it.  Possibly because it has literally nothing to do with race and everything to do with in this case mental health and in that case gangs.One of the biggest issues that makes it such a big issue is the media insists on reporting the names of the fuckheads.  They had the cops tell them they weren't releasing the name then went and dug for it anyway.  Then they put it up on a fucking scoreboard with other school shootings just wtf gah.Something Awful is where I believe the zoe post was first posted and deleted; this is likely what triggered certain people to start looking into it seeing as it was reposted from either there or penny arcade forums.  Assuming you are talking about the zoe post of course if so it would be none of the above either PAF or SA.  Though you could go all the way back to the wordpress but I think he might have posted it prior to actually posting the wordpress as a separate thing not sure though.If you are going off the zoe posts first appearance it was either something awful or penny arcade after which a user of one reposted it on 4chan.Someone sent her an email basically disagreeing with her and she published with with the full email header shown basically doxing them since once someone's name is out in the open it's pretty damn easy from there.It's an issue of mental health not of race or should we just avoid talking about the vtech shooter and others?

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Seung-Hui_Cho

This guy doesn't look white I mean I could be wrong but /shrugThere isn't inequality if people are being hired equal to their percentage of the talent pool it's simple.  When they are being hired at double their percentage they are being given favorable treatment and the rest of the pool is being discriminated against.There is a difference between not stigmatizing something and encouraging posting of crotch shots of one's 8 year old cousin in 2 piece.  There is treatment it's not great but there is therapy and there are sex drive killing drugs.   People who actually get help I have no issue with.  People on the other hand who talk about how the only reason they haven't had sex with a child is due to laws yeah I want them under fucking surveillance.1.  The biggest issue is the stigma surrounding getting help for mental issues in the US in particular.  Though it certainly doesn't help matters to have idiotic news casters putting up a fucking top list of spree killings

2. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Seung-Hui_Cho - no

3. To an extent yes, automatics and semi automatics should not be available for sale to civilians this would also cut down on gang related deaths

4. no

5. yes

6. It's been essentially glorified by the media as a way to go out in a blaze of glory.  Don't give a fucking second to the people who killed others you have to cover it yeah but cover the fucking victims.  Don't give the fuckheads names and don't put up a fucking top list just wtf.Yes$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$ is really the answer.Remind what exactly has CON done?  I think the timer just reset again while we were talking.LOL LOL LOL if you want to go down that route gone wild's front page celebrates women every day and they are self posts.The person I'm talking about posted crotch shots of a 8 year old in a 2 piece shoo.White people make up 68% of the country.  Also if you include any killing over 4 people not specifically schools that percentage changes A LOTNo it just takes someone who looks the previous actions of the person running it.The easiest method of killing someone is running them over with a ton of metal, if you just want to kill some random person that is.No 4 plus people at once not 4 people over the course of a week or something.Or she just took advantage of the situation she had much like I think she did with wizard chan.  She absolutely knew that was a False flag she also knew she could use it.I agree you should not be able to purchase automatic or semi automatic weapons as a civilians.  My point is the biggest issue is mental health read about some of the shit that happens in china that has massively restrictive gun laws.  That is with gun laws there are mass stabbings road rage ect.  Similar to the US china has shit mental health policies though.It's in the logsCould you make money of it is the question the answer is absolutely.  Never underestimate how stupid people are I mean seriously bit coin is a thing lol.YOU CAN TAKE THE DANE OUT OF DENMARK, BUT NOT DENMARK OUT OF THE DANEHow do people make money off patreon by taking donations duh, Hell Komen's CEO makes over half a million a year.Don't hurt Matt you bastards.This is amazing.It's not that this is amazing.Let me guess starting after they won spring?I got a bunch of keys for heroes but only a few for HS I also didn't play HS anywhere near as much as HOTS or give anywhere near as much feedback so that could be part it idk.Cloud 9 is getting out of groups you will not bring my dreams crashing down and your friend will not get champ riven, ^^^^I ^^^^HopeObviously Faker should come jungle for c9 instead :PTSM is actually up 1k atm we have literally no idea what is going to happen at this worlds it's fun.  Next up BKT beating SKT in their 2nd game :PSo uh Flame I hear there is a team in the west that might be in need of a top laner after the entire roster besides sneaky and incarn finishes retiring :(Please not until after the next game /begSo you going too enjoy that Taric?CLG and C9 could both make it out if that happens do you have to go to a million or just 500k still?

TBH if it happens it could be a blessing in disguise stream your pain and people will watch it.Also once we get to c9 v Fnactic.I would be so happyI mean they were trying to kill Faker they killed him twice already their worlds is a success at this point.Okay there is overconfidence then there is flat out insanity.  We have 5 games left down boy.Well spent right?Marin is seriously a fucking beast he gets overlooked because of Faker and to a lesser extent Bang at times but god damn.I'm pretty sure na lcs would literally just be open mid if that was to happen OG is catching up though idk I think this game is going to get to the point where it's going to be one team fight then win but both teams have pretty good scaling idk.nm TSM is done.They are banning a lot of people I would have been far harsher personally  

Cliche Boring OverpricedPositively atrocious trash.

Did I do good?Eh matter of taste I prefer telltale personally especially wolf among us.Indie is absolutely crashing anyone who denies that is a fool.  There has been too much unmitigated crap released and games are promoted based on political/friendship reasons rather than quality.  As such gamers have become rather wary of an non established indie studio stuff like Transistor and Bastion is amazing but you also have stuff like How do you do it getting awards from IGF.  At this point it's more a function of time than money.  I would rather pay slightly more for an experience I know I'm going to love than pay 10 cents for another artsy game I might play for 10 mins before getting bored.Making a good 2d game isn't easy though.  That is the difference to functionally make a game sure easy but to make a good one isn't.Thread currently on the top of /all actually.  The game is acclaimed by critics; its scores by gamers and highest rated reviews on the other hand are in stark contrast to the critics.You are commenting on a gaming section on reddit, you really shouldn't be telling other people to get a life.Well yeah a better game does see Bioshock.Because Dear Esther wasn't screamed as 10/10 game of the year.  Sorry but if you are going to rate this game top in a year that included GTA V you are going to get pushback.So it's a literal turd?  Gone Home isn't good sorry the only thing it has is a "story" which is cliche beyond belief and full of gaping plot holes from the instant you enter the house.  At the first mention of the GF the plot simplifies down to two possibilities either she killed herself or ran away since people were praising the hell out of it she ran away with gf.  It's not deep and it's not particularly good.  If you want to play a decent walking sim play Stanley Parable.It really didn't audio logs have been a thing for a long time.  Something like No Man's Sky now that is unique.  The story was incredibly cliche and the only reason people went gah gah over it is happened to feature lesbians which isn't a new thing either.Hm this is actually interesting may check it out.The thing is people like fullbright are incredibly connected unfortunately in indie it's far more about who you know than the product you create.  See shit like Freshman year getting features just wtf.They are doing well because people want to be seen as progressive and they have a lot of contacts in the journalist sector of the industry.   It's a cliche story except it has lesbians so apparently it's innovative.  There have been lesbians in gaming stories for a long time going back to at least KOTOR if not earlier.This I will agree with the atmosphere was great with a story without massive plot holes and actually capitalizing on the atmosphere it could have been an incredibly creepy good game kind of like amnesia.  Unfortunately the atmosphere has pretty much no payoff and the sheer number of plotholes just piss me off.There are multiple deleted comments the op's isn't the only one you can see deleted ones quoted.Vanishing is incredibly enjoyable also it's just beautiful.  If you have the horsepower that game is so gorgeous.It was down to running away or suicide given people loved the game chances were 90% plus it was running away.I consider it an interactive experience that isn't a bad thing though.  So is Stanley Parable so is Vanishing to a large extent both them are awesome.  The reason I don't like GH is the story is cliche and has gaping plot holes.  The annoying thing is they nailed atmosphere but did nothing with it sigh.Uh yes it does?  Fill up the screen you lose.Weird because I and others enjoy Stanley Parable and Vanishing yet I don't enjoy Gone Home.  Might be because the story is weak and the ending is obvious 5 mins in who knows.Yes.Not really Stanley Parable was prior by about 2 years; heck one could argue Amnesia had the same kind of find notes and read them to find out the story just also actual game-play.  If you really want to blow your mind to get the full story of Arkham Asylum way back in 2009 you needed to find audio logs.For Gone Home nah there will be no press.  If there is it will be attacking the mean gamers who totally deserved to be banned.I'm talking about why critics went gah gah over it.  I actually really liked the atmosphere I just felt they did nothing with it and I already had the ending narrowed down to two things the instant I found out about the obvious gf and had a heavy weighting towards what ended up being the ending.  That shouldn't be possible in a game that is literally entirely story.Go play Vanishing or Stanley Parable both absolutely crush it.  They did atmosphere well but there was no payoff and the ending was far too obvious.Hm now I want to draw a car creeping stealthily along hiding in the shadows.Well now we have twine for people who can't even do that :PBjerg and the 4 wards :(  Wards can't teamfight well sadly.Balls actually completely came back they didn't even mention it but he pretty much evened out cs and kills/assistsNo see it was opposite day when he said that :PNo it's not the rest yes but Hai's shotcalling is the best in the west it isn't even close also Sneaky is still a tier above rek just not two to three like he is above Kid.Better than 4th ^^sorry ^^had ^^toTPA was so underestimated though was a huge part of it also Bo3s manThey also played SKT who appear to be in fucking god mode form.Hell yes #FaithAgreed Rookie was scaring the shit out of me their bot lane just fucking sucks.  How the hell do they not have a better bot lane when they have Kakao and Rookie.The dunks on that last fight so good.Remember their first season how for the first ten games or so they would be asked they would think they would do.  Every time it was 1-27 than 2-26 and so on fucking great.  And joking about wanting to go 0-28So spend the money to get Uzi or TnT or literally anybody else.  Kid has done 433 damage to champions on Vayne lets that sink in for a second 433 damage how the fuck is that even possible.He is; Rek is the 4th best adc in his region Sneaky and DL flipflop top 2.  Now if you want to say Niels or Freeze is on the same tier I would be more likely to agree.  Rek is a better cop who has world class players around him.  Every single player other than him is top 2 EU he is top 4 arguably 5 if forg1ven gets his shit back together.  Hjarnan Freeze Niels are all better and forg1ven can be.We need to see head to heads it seems like every Chinese team has glaring weaknesses, it's like they just bought in the superstars then picked up random scrubs on the street.Now now just because they would rather talk about Indonesian politics rather than rock band at a demo for rockband isn't reason to demonize them :PIt's not being a jerk to give an honest opinion when asked for it.Nope, some poor guy lost a hard drive full of bitcoin when they were in the thousands in value estimated he had millions of dollars worth.  Anyone who didn't cash out when they peaked 1000 was a fool but /shrug.  It was basically a microcosm of the real estate bubble collapse it's actually rather fascinating to look at.

http://blogs-images.forbes.com/jessecolombo/files/2014/02/BitcoinCrash.png

You can see where it was shooting up unsustainably then boom.Personally I find it stupid but that is the way indie is currently and a huge part of the reason why it's going to crash soon.  Rather than pushing good innovative games people are pushing politics and friends and gamers are getting jaded.supervillain ftfy TBH it has nothing to do with the relationship it has do with being made to feel you are worthless.  You are so fucking worthless that this entity would rather fuck 5 different people behind your back than just break up with you.Guess what if you cause 3 kills your death is worth while vs running away to preserve your kda when you could have caused a teamfight to swing in your teams favor if you took a risk aka cop.tbh I don't usually listen to the after, especially on weekends this is precious free time and I already sat down and actually watched c9 rather than having it on in the background like I usually do.BTW Rek is down 25 cs to fucking AN right nowRek is cop get over it.  It works well for fnatic because they have heavy carries at top mid and jungle so they just need someone who won't die for the most part.  He is better than Steelback yeah but he isn't on top tier.I'm going to miss Hai so much again :(And FNC vs AHQ is close as shit right now while C9 curbstomped them.  This group is nuts.Except the story is crap the atmosphere is good but the story is predictable and cliche.Rek was almost a non factor nearly every single massive play by fnactic just now was feb.  AN completely outclassed rek this game.c9 top of groups day 3 wtf lolI think you guys count as the wildcard now :PThe Tahm peels for jinx were gigantic.Why I enjoyed Balls dunking everyone the final fight.I seriously have no idea who is coming out of this group at this point C9 Dumpstered AHQ who FNC just lost to but struggled with IG who FNC dumpstered just wtf.Are you kidding?  He was playing Sivir your job is enable rotating and wave clear and do safe aoe damage.  Also spell shield come on.If we can find 2 more wins I think we are through but idk if we can at this point.  I think IG might tilt hard at this point there is no way they expected to be 0-2 at the end of Day 3.  If AHQ beats them they are done and it's a 3 horse race.  If they beat AHQ than it just becomes nuts.I'll give you a hint you can using spellshield. mega gnar is easier to kite than mini gnar rofl.Everything he did is consistent with callout culture he just didn't count on the fact because she was a girl people would overlook her actions.  Hence why he first posted it on SA and PA after it was deleted someone else posted it on 4 chan.nah end of this interview C9 came in with a ton of hype because they were just curbstomping people both in challenger and the promo series and phreak tried to get hai to trash talk and he joked about how jack wanted them to go 0-28 because that looked good 
for sponsors because it was perfect.

http://www.twitch.tv/riotgames/b/416114659?t=2h49mNo Origen destroyed a wildcard didn't you hear TSM got disowned :Pfucking deathbushLol rek is not even top in his region and he just proved it yet again.You might want to check the cs and kd at the end of the game he caught up and was huge in the final fight.Then you are simply an idiot also he didn't even try to kite he just sat there while that ate his ass which certainly was hilarious.I would put Niels on the same tier as dlift and sneaky but who is the best idk.  Mechanically probably dlift but sometimes he goes way too aggressive.  Also I'm obviously biased in favor of sneaky.No bang is strong top 4 so far have been Niels Dlift Sneaky and Bang.You are simply an idiot rek fanboy the u give fnatic freeze or Niels they sure as fuck don't lose to ahq.So this no longer appears on the top of gaming or on all shortly after hitting number two that is rather interesting.How is it troll post not everyone likes it if they only wanted sunshine blown up their ass they should have said so.No matter what we still have 3 games in a day to deal with 2 of which are back to back if we beat you guys I will feel much more comfortable.Darius was a pretty big factor in the final few fights for us vs IG he went dunking.Look at how much the CEO of Komen makes if you think people can't make money off charity.that work?I was going off how they looked in the gauntlet I mean did I want them to make a miracle run yes but I honestly didn't think we were good enough especially in a heavy top lane carry meta.  They appear to have adapted incredibly well and Incarnati0n seems to have taken it to another level.  Also I really wish Hai would stay if he can become this good at jungle in half a split how good could he become in a year.  After all he was originally jungle to start with prior to the last version of quantic.Marin, Faker and the Mother Fuckers?Nah shy is top lane faker but Marin is beasting it atm.You know c9 is going to need a jungler if he feels like showing he is the best at multiple positions :P For censorship I was talking about the mods of /r/gaming sorry if that wasn't clear.  Just kind of reminds me of a certain other issue that took place but this one breaks no rules and was only removed when it hit all.It's not longer visible on the front page of gaming the consensus appears to be the mods stopped it from showing in the top 5 but didn't delete it.So is it censorship or not I don't particuarly care if you care about it I'm just curious if you consider it censorship or not.  What can of worms btw a user was banned for a reason they should not have been for daring to criticize a game.  Don't ban people for critiquing you when you actually ask for critiquing it's pretty simple.It would be flat out broken the way blizzard likes to release stuff it would be pre nerf zilean.Why do you consider it to be the right course of action?  It's absolutely related to gaming.Honestly don't get why they are here they wanted certain people gone from their sub and now they are idkHow is it a shipost how is either a shitpost?  Someone posted a topic asking for a description of gone home in 3 words they said nothing about having to blow sunshine up the devs butts.  There is a lot of wariness going on right now around steam since the most recent attempt to buy reviews via keys, so yes someone getting banned for making a post calling a game meh is going to get attention.I mean it's at least actually related to gaming and frankly is more interesting than the 5 billionth look at how pretty skyrim is with mods post.Man having a radio show with cameras on the people is so weird.  They look so self conscious.  Hayward schooled him but tbh that isn't hard Cowherd was basically ESPN's answer to being unable to clone Skip Bayless.Geez cosplaying Dyrus that's just over the line man.You should watch csgo sometime igl's aiming is secondary compared to calls.  Which is the role hai serves he micromanages everything but he is also doing well in the jungle now.Damnnnnnnnn That's so trollDown boy still have 4 game to go til end of groups just have to keep plugging away.Suck it up if I can wear c9 for the entire split while we were being dumpstered you can wear FNC after some light ribbingEh saying AHQ gets through groups and takes a game off SKT is pretty bold I mean yeah they beat FNC but C9 dumpstered them :PThat actually really pisses me off.  What they should have done is allow NA to have sister teams as well also they really need to move to the series format KR uses for the LCS.Oh I flat out had LGD first and have no qualms about admitting it.  It seems like the Chinese teams in general are just underperforming but I would see the West wreck people than win a skin for a champ I rarely play anyway.Sneaky is love, Sneaky is life.Shy is considered to have faker level mechanics by several pros believe Mata alluded to it during his AMA.The dude was unbanned after the post hit the top of all and it became a pr issue.  Suppressing information is considered censorship by most people and can be done by entities other than the government I realize that might shock you.There would only be a danger of being co-opted if a large chunk of people weren't already in favor of censorship even if they don't consider it as such.  In other words you can't co-opt something already contains a majority of people with your views.EG's gag order and trying to push that her setting up essentially a stalker of his words via alerts should allow her to file it in a different state once it was clear it was going to be overturned in MA.But it was fucking hilarious.   Watching people try to claim she was trans then pointing out we saw her as young as 3 years old in the manga then either silence or them trying to claim she transitioned prior to 3.  Fucking hilarious.  Also that twitter rant after wiki kicked the idiots off literally crying with laughter.It's not a passing phenonmon but it's really not common.   It is due to different brain chemistry/hormones than normal that isn't just something that randomly disappears.  It's just not a very common variation, being homosexual is the same kind of thing and occurs in nature though it's much more common.Put it on the pc and I'll take a look until then nahThe best transgender character would be one you aren't sure is trans.  I do know a few trans people outside of gg post transition very few people besides their closest friends have any idea they are trans.She gag ordered Eron in a way that far overstepped the first amendment.  When it became clear that it was going to be overturned she tried to file a new one.  One of her arguments for this was she set up an alert to let her know when EG was talking and for some reason this was his fault not hers for essentially stalking him.  Thankfully the judge said no to her this time.  There is also speculation she may have advised the mods on what to do as they reached out to her prior to the TB post being removed but this specific part is only speculation.Not in America in aGG in general fuck yesFalse DMCA = censorship mindship without a doubt.  I actually forgot about that one lolExcept balls came back and was relevant even prior to complete catching up.  He put his bleed on everyone in team fights and due to Black Cleaver sneaky was just shredding.Would you prefer I said sociopath?  I don't see how anyone with human emotions can cheat let alone with that many people.  If you don't want to be with someone fucking break up you are just going to hurt them worse when they find out otherwise.So uh how about that AHQ?A what?I am talking about full on sex because it can have by the far the biggest and most nasty consequences for the one being cheated on.  Also that is fucked up especially if you knew they had boyfriends back home.  Sorry but Quinn doesn't seem to have little confidence she is incredibly manipulative and just doesn't strike as a person with low confidence.Agreed even if for the most part it's just a simple follow up make sure person isn't a wack job it's fucked.The thing is balls could literally go in and die as long he got his bleeds up and ticking which he did he was useful.  Since he didn't just flat out die he was more useful.  The reason he was useful was absolutely sneaky but giving that armor shred to a fed tristana is disgusting.Ghazi brigaded AGG all the time nobody gave a shit.  Gaming is a default unless you turn it off you are going to see it flat out.  The post hit 2 on all of course of people were seeing it who normally wouldn't.  Hell the only reason I saw it was I happened to go back to the front page after being on the league sub.Then how is the post still live yet somehow not even in the top 3 pages razor?  This is a post upvoted over 4500 times that was 9 hours old was at the top of all then was gone.I mean we kind of are breaking up sadly.  Hai is gone and Lemon is apparently gone, I don't know about Balls yet.  At least we will still have Sneaky Incarn Bromance.  Now if Meteos can just learn to play support stick Rush Jungle and somebody learns how to shotcall.Hai stays and we get Impact top after he decales as NA and Mata comes and plays support hnggghIf Balls wants to stay he will likely stay.  Idk if he wants to at this point though there is likely going to be only one of the original crew left besides him.  He might want to start up a new challenger team with meteos or something as well idk.Eh they went for a super risky early play it backfired and SKT just strangled them for there.  That entire advantage was built off one risky play.  Which is why SKT is so fucking terrifying.What if I told you about a jungler with a punctured lung and broken wrists who won worlds through the power of his mind

ESPN 30 for 30 The Hai Nine

I tried /shrugBullshit it's HaiTheir bot lane is just utter trash as much as I'm glad that we have a chance to get out of groups because of it it actually pisses me off to see Kakao and Rookie have literal anchors dragging them down.The sub's front page not the front front page.I've argued that game is too large of an umbrella and needs to be further broken down give software such as gone home Vanishing and Stanley the term I've suggested in interactive experience.  Hint I actually enjoy 2 of the 3 interactive experiences I just named being one isn't a bad thing.then how is it removed razor I can go to the topic right now it disappeared from the top lists within 10 mins of it hitting all It's only worth rushing if you have a dev jungle.Speculation backed up by the games mod contracting her on twitter and asking for an email so they could talk right before bans and deletions started going out.Razor I have flat out seen posts be restricted from appearing but still actually be made by key word filtering during the whole Victoria thing.  It really wouldn't surprise me if default subs have access to something like that.I never claimed she did?  Whether she encouraged their actions is what's at question here and frankly I believe she did given her other actions.I'm guessing defaults might have access to the keyword filtering that was used during the Victoria incident.  Which would absolutely be a way to do it.We all know SKT is likely going to win but god damn it c9 has plot armor multiple retiring players, the soul of the team essentially resurrected this is our year :P  In all seriousness everyone expects skt to win baring a freaking miracle.Given fakers ability to learn even if it is in league I don't think he will have much of an issue in rl but we will see.Yup Balls was certainly impactful in our game it just wasn't obvious but yeah part of the reason sneaky did such good work was those bleeds shredding armor.Balls is the only one who could rock a tank for League on c9.Pretty sure he was a near perfect student in school and displays an amazing ability to learn incredibly quickly and retain that knowledge.  Which is why you can see him out out champs that he hasn't played in months and play them basically perfectly.  That ability is something that could easily translate to say learning languages for coding.Why would she need to strong arm the mods when it appears they line up ideologically with her.  Everything EG did is straight from the callout culture playbook hell ZQ attacked WC with literally zero evidence except for two anonymous posts that the users came from CWC to make.  Yet I don't see you crying about a witch hunt there, weird almost like because it falls in line with your ideology you don't care.Compare votes here to votes there.  I have watched comments from plus 3 to minis 6 or umder.Believe it or not if Fulbright only sold to the people their games were actually aimed at they would go fucking bankrupt.much better, also are you a raider's fan?Nowhere is safe :PEh Cop is better than a few of the ADCs at this tourney Kid comes to mind.Everythng you said except for whole team is how zilean is now, so imagine how broken it was on release lol.DAMN!!!!!!!

[](#face-popcorn)It shouldn't anymore gratz the first and only time I will root for TSM so enjoy it.Can't you now post a picture of Monte's tears of unfathomable sadness?Sit Palmer the Rams will manage to win one of their games again you no matter what don't get Palmer hurt.Didn't we hear how it was worrying that the Hawks only beat the bears 26-0 :(Cincy looks way better than Denver atm sorry.Peke built the team for himself he isn't going anywhere for at least a year.God Kid sucks lolEh we will have to agree to disagree.I mean if you just get the logo without the words it wouldn't look that weird.  Put it on the top of your hand like link and claim it's a birth mark :PTell your bros on FNC they should totally throw so this guy has to get a tat ploxIG AHQ still has huge group implications.  if IG wins they could end up a game out of first depending on today and if AHQ wins it's quite conceivable there could be a 3 way tie for first.Welp this group is officially nuts.No they aren't at all.  If FNC wins today there will be 2 teams at 2-1 and 2 at 1-2 that is a a one game difference if c9 wins three teams at 1-2 and one team at 3-0 this group is nowhere near over.With a Kali he shouldn't even need to smite Kid done fucked up.so c9 1st ahq 2nd I can live with that I suppose.Except Kid did fuck up hard.  You should never ever lose a baron on Kali EVEROh it's surprising but groups are nowhere near over still 4 games left.All I want is Sneaky to have his very own skin and I don't care who it's for :DI'm trying to keep hype in check we still have 4 games to go.welp that's a throw sighlol fuck offNo the baron call was fucking stupid and I don't know what balls was doing.  They played this game so well at the start.The fucking throws sighOkay and we are back in it that could have ended horribly lol, also that alley oop was gorgeous.Nope lolI've been hurt too many times but now I'm cautiously optimistic :DJust beat ahq and ig and you are through everyone is tied for 2nd right now at 1-2 if you beat the other two teams you are 2nd seed just ignore c9 and focus on them kI don't tend to comment much during games I tend to be rather pessimistic see my comments right before c9 somehow came back to win.Oh I'm happy as hell but we almost threw that game like 3 times if fnatic had taken advantage like they should have.Your flair I'm confused.We need a Darius face damn it well this will have to do

[](#face-draaaven)I don't get how nobody has banned Sneaky's trist yet I mean I hope it continues but it fits our standard team strats so perfectly.This I agree with but the comp at worlds they have been running has been the same over and over I don't get how nobody is banning Sneaky's trist they even left up Kali and he still took trist over it.  She is just so good in a coordinated team incredibly safe and stupid strong siegeAre you joking?  The entire reason that last teamfight got cleaned up is you guys went deep after azir and trist and Darius got full stacks then it was gg.   It was similar to what FW did where you have to run through darius to get to the squish.  If you had gotten sneaky as well the game wouldn't have been over but Darius still would have cleaned up the instant he started getting resets.nah man that alley oop from sneaky to incarn with the buster shot of rek soooo good.I actually have that skin except for fucking lgd sigh.  I don't think anyone predicted lgd sucking this hard.He hovered Heimer which is what he should have taken.  Heimer can give Darius fits.Sorry about the first but not the second.I might still have a chance at the 2nd poro D is screwed because of lgd but c is perfect A so far is correct and B is correct :Dyou have LGD in 4th?pst make a crack about forever fourth.hm we need a darius super sayian gif.No keep picking against us.C9 didn't lose to TSM during regular season if they had played a 2 v 3 to decide who actually deserved the second seed C9 would likely have won it.You know monte could do be a really good triggered face meme can we find the exact moment where he realized KT was going to lose and get footage.Meteos said he was full damage reksai and Sneaky said he was too while playing corki.  This annoyed meteos and eventually ended with sneaky just saying same to everything.  Thus the meme was born.I am so fucking confused right now.Cool, also when is part 2 coming so lemon can say he is joking ploxHow about a 3 way tie for 2nd and we go through 1st I think that would be more awesomeTSM took 1 game off when SSW tried to style.  C9 took a game and forced lucian bans for the rest of the series and was literally 1 second away from forcing a game 5 that fucking nami bubble.into ftfyPeople are better but they are better on both sides and mistakes tend to get magnified.  In low elo you can go 0/5 in lane it doesn't matter if you are over 100 cs up on your opponent.  The biggest thing you can do to climb low is master cs. c9 is probably going to have Hai and Lemon retire and maybe Balls idk.  I think Sneaky will stay since it seems like he has a new bromance with Incarn.Well Hai would be the main character so I'm down that means we win.If c9 didn't throw mid they would have strangled fnatic down to nothing.  Huni getting kills via the throw was so huge to getting him back in the game Balls was destroying him early.So does FNC if they beat IG and AHQ they get at least 2nd.Huni dropped and Darius got his broken ass passive and gg not that I'm complaining.Needs a cameo by IncarnHe does that with jungle if anything it's better now since a lot of jungle is running from camp to gank to camp. lots of time to look around the map without missing cs.SKT is more likely to be guaranteed 1st than anything else in this tourney so far.Honestly idk about that fnatic aren't exactly slouches this group is just nuts.  LGD have tilted off the face of the earth and freeSM so KT is their only competition.Here is the thing c9 hasn't had to show anything they baited out a veigar ban with their first game for each game since so what do they have waiting for when trist gets banned.Except C9 had to try to give the game away with that first baron fight they were strangling fnatic until then.We forgot to ban Westdoor's fizz :PGo watch gauntlet Sneaky and Incarn have massive champion pools and lemon has been playing tahm kench a ton in yolo q for a reason.  Tahm deals with jinx's biggest weakness really well which is likely what will happen when trist and azir and veigar are all banned.  To jinx vik we go or even draven.Nah that was his wrists he was damn good in s3 his wrists fucking up cut his ability to broaden his champ pool.Niels, Freeze even Hjarnan are better also Forg1ven when he gets his shit together.   Rek is cop with world class players.  Niels in on the same tier as Sneaky and LiftLift right now.Or because we actually watch games well some of us others yeah that's why.Yeah I know but he still does that with jungle there is a reason he is playing stuff like lee.Well we are nearly to step 6I feel like he just hates na for some reason /shrug.The bandwagon didn't come back til after the 2nd reverse sweeep tbh.He also said CLG would lose to pain who they crushed.  To say flat out that c9 wouldn't win one game without even seeing a single team on the world's patch was absurd.I mean they won a game which is more than LGD can say.  They also have a literal anchor via their bot lane.LGD tilted long before that look at their pick bans.Did you miss CLG will lose to pain?No he wanted to retire from fnatic he then handbuilt a team of exactly the people he wanted.Incarn played like a world class midlaner during gauntlet as well.  Hai looked great when he wasn't trying out new stuff.  Compare the first two games of each sets pick ban to the next 3.  It's massively different that is the different.  Balls has gotten way better he has put over 300 games into soloq plus scrims in a month.&gt;Jumping does not affect accuracy.

Hm that's rather interesting.China is showing that now well that and you can't have a fucking anchor for bot lane gd Kid just pisses me off lol.I still think a lot of it goes back to raiding world firsts especially in wow were endless NA v EU sniping.Because TSM is trash?  There is a reason it's called Bjerg and his 4 wardslol noTBH I'm really glad they are third I don't know if they would have gotten through groups if they had to go through SKT EDG.  EDG doesn't have the anchors the other chinese teams do for the most part.OG v C9 finals I'm down :P SKT dqed because faker turns out to be a literal deity and goes to start his church.C9 went something like 10-0 in elimination games going back to the split.  It's absurd.  Not sure on exact number but yeah.I would love for Hai to somehow get a world championship before he retires but honestly I don't think anyone will beat SKT in a Bo5 but we will see.I think riot might get pissed over that.  They could do something less obvious but open mid no way.You consider that to be a great thing other's don'tNot sure that will be enough throw in some baron throws and maybe.only 2 actually I think assuming c9 doesn't drop a game obv.Uh dude glass houses and all that.No they wouldn't TSM wouldn't beat FW and they sure as hell wouldn't beat Koo.  TSMs only strong player is mid their bot is sometimes okay but often sucks we don't talk about their mid and jungle.  The only reason they beat lgd is imp threw hard and got cocky and at the 3rd Mord hit for 90% of his health.  If he doesn't do that they clean up and go on to win and LGD sucks this tournament hard.  Plus LSD's jungler is sick TSM would win a game or two in A but they wouldn't advance.and skt goes into baron pit what are they thinking they are at 1/4 health and in comes the ori ball PENTAKILLL.  Just when it looked like SKT had this game in the bag H2k is running down mid to take the game.  Who would have thunk it after beating EDG H2k has beaten SKT to take second in groups and EDG is out wow.In division it's pretty simple.I love hai but he sounded annoyed that they got to worlds and he had to keep playing.  If he can find someone to replace him and doesn't actually want to play anymore I don't want him to feel obligated to keep playing if he isn't enjoying it.noooooo please no that made me so sad :(  A kali with that much time on it should never ever ever lose baron.It's really not q has to kill the target for q to kill baron it would be well within smite range.Because it's to do with the idiocy of religion not to do sexism whether you believe it or not.   I agree it is a major problem that half of our countries major parties essentially defer to religion.You realize pretty much every pGG person got chain downvotrd if they said something even slightly pro right?Tiger Woods any politician ever.  They are just mercilessly mocked and nobody gives a fuck because they are male.What the fuck kind of relationships have you been in ?Can we see pictures of said bruises or is it just the same bullshit story she claimed where eron wasn't allowed to dispute anything?Buh byeSorry if truth hurtsNah most people consider cheaters whether male or female to be horrible people.  If you want to fuck someone else break up first this isn't hard.Cheating with 5 different people at minimum is being a horrible fucking person.  Break up if you want to fuck other people that badly it isn't hard.1. The intended difficulty this is either hard or normal usually.  It tends to be rather obvious in the text of the level select.  Heroic for example literally says this is how Halo is mean to be played.   For games with online components it's the online difficult aka all pro for madden

2.  If possible yes but finishing the primary story s more important

3.  Tricky it depends how big a part of the game optional coontent is.

4. Maybe, I think it would be better if publishers started giving more time for embargo

5. Theoretically you could include a time clock that links back to hq and tells you how much time the erstwhile journalist has put in as well as completion status.  Those who put in significantly more time could be given the next game say a week early since they play it more in depth.

6.  Ask for games earlier impress how important it is for their games success to be able to have time to go through it thoroughly.  Also hire people who are actually good at games to play through and put down their thoughts.  You can always have those who are skilled with words come in and tighten them up but being able to play on the level of the average gamer and intended difficulty is important.

edit: One other thing if a company gives you a game days before release date just flat out say it in giant letter at the top of the review. We only recieved Wibblies and Wobblies 2 days before release date as such we were not able to spend as much time as we would like.  If you had to review at an event say so.3 named 5 total.  I'm pretty sure children are the ones who excuse behavior such as cheating adults find it rather disgusting.Hell sometimes I take jungle tp especially if I plan on countering.  I stick a ward in top side and can always just go to it if I see the other jungler and am too far away to counter I'll go take all their camps.You know the best way to fix toxicity use your mute button don't engage.  The only "toxicity" that can't be ignored is straight up feeding.maybe he should go back to fucking mid and stop making me ban him every game.They might be wider on purpose so that he doesn't see the frames at the edge of his vision while playing.Right except I didn't say anything about climbing I said ignore the idiots who spew garbage in chat mute is easy.If you think CNN wouldn't jump at the chance to interview ISIS in a safe environment you are nuts it would be ratings galore.That makes me expect rap battles there better be rap battles choob.Racism is actually very well defined part of the reason it's hard to stop is a. people who practice it don't give a fuck if you "shame" them, and b. some forms are considered socially acceptable.

I could argue the exact same thing about femininity it's just gish gallop with no evidence behind it.

There is no such thing as the patriarchy the vast majority of men don't benefit from shit like trump being in office if anything it's negative.  The upper echelon in terms of wealth cares about two things the vast majority of the time making more and giving the government less. 

Trying to label things toxic is fucking stupid, what you should be doing is working to destigmatize getting help for mental issues that is why this shit happens.Are you trolling right now?  Yes it is a biological imperative to pass on one's genes much like guys will think with their dicks at times to pass on their genes in combination with a those a desirable mate.   You can cry about bio truths all you want but the truth is the vast majority of people have an ingrained need to pass on their genes it's how the human race survives.I'm pretty sure you wouldn't have this reaction if I used cock dick or some other synonym for penis as an insult.  In fact I would be willing to bet you have said behind someone's back geez that guy was a dick.Incorrect but you usually are when it comes to talking about GG so /shrugThe people who are openly racist do not give a fuck.   People who attack others for being white is considered socially acceptable by people in your group.

The upper echelon outside of new money is passed down cash from the 1800s no fucking shit it reflects who was in power then.  No it doesn't fucking matter we are talking about 1% of the country if that believe it or not many of these men have wifes and daughters who heavily benefit from their wealth I know that is shocking.  Some of them will even pass down their wealth to their daughters /gasp

Gish Gallop is effect whether in speech or writing because you can just bombard the other person with a bunch of bullshit and it's hard to refute all of it.  The whole idea of toxic masculinity is part of it.  It isn't fucking toxic masculinity it's a. access to guns b. stigmatization of receiving mental health care as well as the sheer expense of it.  Part of this stigmatization btw has to do with not wanting to date someone who is seeing a shrink /gaspWe need egalitarianism not feminism or masculism or anything genderism another word would be humanismTrue in tech woman are currently being hired at double their percentage of the talent pool that is rather sexist.It's rather hard to do that when their meetings are consistently disrupted by lunatics pulling fire alarms just saying.I love how you gloss over the fire alarm pulling itself A+ dodge.hm k?Throwaways are very useful.Being a sociopath?  Some people have the inability to feel certain emotions and lack the ability to empathize with hurt people.That was one of the few times I have actually wanted to punch someone during this whole thing.  Also that ghazi hugbox thread made me fucking nauseous.Pretty sure most of us have said push to make it illegal exactly the opposite of excusing it.Uh no judge you want to see what the actual end arguement became?  Briana's cowriter everyone

https://archive.is/vjS7eI would have just said it was crap had a mediocre incredibly cliche story that people jerked themselves raw over because lesbians if I wanted to be crude of course.I would say the majority of comments following the posts should qualify so just choose one about how white males are the devil and be done.  Or you could got the irby route and scream about white feminists which totally isn't racist for reasons.Yeah that one was rather chilling thank god I'm not in indie.So it's fair to directly discriminate against 80% of the hiring pool because you want to be "progressive"?No it's a serious question wtf kind of relationship have you been in that that seems like a standard bad relationship.Meant for email not for name, I have a spam email specifically for website signups and that kind of stuff.How great was last week going 3-0 when pretty much everyone was predicting 0-6 so good.Uh why?  I'm very confused by your flair.FUCCCCCCKKKKKK I don't want the prophecy to be real I want to win in Levi damn it.Yes because Lane got hurt and we were banged up in the secondary.  If Lane doesn't get hurt that is an entirely different game because he is the cover instead of Simon.The only reason that games wasn't over already is Kearse dropped a 3rd down pass in your territory because it dropped in his lap and apparently that is hard to catch.Russ?Bullshit I've been to Madison.If Rodgers goes to the Vikings it's because they moved on to Rodgers 2.0 do you really want that to happen?Make sure you go to /b/ I've heard that is a really fun place.Yes, hurry up and lose a few so I can stop following your record and cheering for teams I hate pleaseGeez have you guys already given up on the season?I mean he is a niner fan should we just tell him?I like you guys except tonight.  Tonight I want to see you shattered sorry :(Goff is probably the closest.  Texans might pay a lot.But you guys could make history this year isn't that worth losing a few more games?Okay that was good that was really good.  Now tell Eli to stop freaking people out and go back to his normal self please.better?Back in the day feminists actually had a lot of people on their side including other advocacy groups.  The most common response is a mocking what about the menz to issues MRAs bring up and they sure as fuck aren't going to get help from other advocacy groups who are busy mocking them. In tech yes they are.  Woman comprise approximately 19% of the talent pool.

http://www.intel.com/content/dam/www/public/us/en/documents/corporate-information/diversity-in-technology-intel-2015-midyear-progress-report.pdf

Page 9 is what you are looking for.  Also the demo most highly being sacrificed for this isn't white males it's asian males which is why they aren't included in the diversity report but other races are.Too much running around :( I don't suppose they have one adjusted for non scrambling at all?fine how about now?It's super common to make someone think they are going crazy and constantly question them while you are cheating on them?  That doesn't sound common at all it sounds like the actions of a pathological liar though.Would you like me to start linking racist irby quotes?

Mental illness absolutely fucking does.  You need to lack a certain component of humanity to be able to shoot other human beings with no feelings of remorse.So in other words you are trying to impose american views on people outside of america but only for slurs relating to females?35% hired from a 19% representation True it isn't twice as much.  There are also companies that advertise how their team is 50/50 EA did in the poly article which is over double the available talent tool.See you say that but how else do you think Rodgers ends up leaving GB before he retires?I wasn't just talking about the cheating did you miss the other shit?Geez that is rather depressing.It's the same thing you are just crying over it because it's the female version.&gt;pre-crime predictions and subsequent dispatch of police.

Sounds rather minority report like just saying.TBH if I didn't have to worry about money I'd just play and make games all day but I wouldn't have to worry about crunch which would be awesome.  I already do that now but not having to worry about crunch or where I'm going to be in a year would be pretty cool.RH didn't dunk shit the only reason I didn't reply to her is because I was rate limited.  The only reason I was in that shithole is I didn't realize that was where Tax paged me to at first.  You want to talk about a "dunk" look at my response to YMRA.Or I looked it up on KiA because I remembered it and then copy pasted the archive link included.  I remembered it because it was hilariously dumb much like your comment.  As for going outside perhaps you should try it.Uh what does what razor posted have to do with zq?You did read the article right?  It didn't come from Beitbart and made some really good points.Yes but it's because of religion not sexism as much as I consider it to be fucked it's fucked for a different reason other than sexism.You appear to think that at least 25% of Americans aren't retarded that is a mistake

*before the crying over the word I used this is in reference to a south park episode*When people link pictures of wide open water or a person just floating in water it freaks me the hell out kind of.   Can't stop about thinking what is coming up from below.I didn't claim it was?  I've never claimed gg was only about games journalism.No I looked at their posting style their account name and their frequent projections onto others and made a fairly reasonably conclusion.  I have no salt I find it hilarious that google ideas invited actual harassers to talk to them.  I also find it hilarious that she is now against censoring of ideas when she made a tool to censor them before.It's not a gotcha at all actually.  The vast majority of pros agree that it shouldn't be defended we just point out it's due to religious bullshit not sexist bullshit for the most part.Why are you here?  You have your place without razor or I, I mean I know we are hot but just not interested whatsoever.Most don't sorry Tax but I can go through ghazi alone and post tons of hatred towards men that isn't even counting the salt mines of twitter and tumblr.Just to play devil's advocate it doesn't matter what the guy wants after.  Say a guy doesn't want a kid and to pay child support to bad if a woman does.I've never claimed gg is only about games journalism it's also a backlash agains the hyper pc culture that many call sjw.  Which this article absolutely falls under.Nah I got to watch my team have Balls and pentakill FNC so I'm going to spread my happiness.I should be good after early febuary but you guys will be sitting home /crosses fingers.  Sorry but I don't want to fuck around.Right w/e the fuck that is supposed to mean it's actually a well reasoned article that points out how heavily partisan news sources have become rather than presenting the full story they are often heavily biased one way or another.  I suggest reading it if need be I can link an archive if you don't want to give clicks.Agree to disagree finally watched it honestly wasn't impressed.  I miss the old mad max movies.Big assumption to say it's a supporter and not a troll.GoodThe vast majority are trolls some are just better at trolling than others.Yeah what happened goes far beyond that.Because people were trying to push it onto the official wiki when that failed the blowup I linked happened.I was referring to the ablest bullshit not being a thing here.It's more I don't care.  It's probably something about propaganda which that piece isn't.  As I said read it.That thing looks beyond disgusting.You apparently do since you know what it's from or just salty about the latest season?look behind mel to the right.This is my only alt my main account has nothing posted about gg.  If you believe the idiots that post that shit I have no idea what to tell you course considering where I now know you post idk what to think at this point.  I don't obsessively follow people unlike certain others.  The only people who I know views by name are those I continuously run into.Except I was right without ever looking it up wasn't I?  I'm unsure how it's a defense of ignorance to say he should read it course you should to.Sure and I can say that would be a retarded statement and make no sense since I'm not disabled.Diamond Balls &gt; allSorry it will it might actually challenge you.Really data like Intel hiring 35% women when the pool is only 19%.  I mean that does show an issue with sexism just not the kind you are thinking of.The claim I was responding to was you saying that MRA's claim feminists don't care about men unfortunately in large part this True beyond blaming men for all the evil in the world of course.From Two-Way Shouting to One-Way Mockery

fine ctrl f that and read from there that is the relevant part to this conversation anyway.You have too high an opinion of our Oline.But the ball wasn't loose until it was hit?20 ftfyYou can see Tate's heart break :PHere is a hint if people like tech they of into tech of they don't they don't.  Tech is STEM it isn't easy and those who start early have a huge advantage.  Do you have a similar stance as far as teaching?  Since the numbers are similar there just reversed or nursing.How the fuck are there still 137 correct brackets I expected 0FreeSM over Or come on bro you know better.I might be guilty of this at times.If they somehow beat EDG I think skt might find a way to lose to them to kick edg out early.You have watched his Lee games right?Riot fucked up the combo makes me sad it's not 100% reliable anymore apparently.Well 2 of his games have been Lee the other was Elise and he still did his job just didn't have the flashy plays like he did on Lee.Lol kEh I love Hai but he is 2 Marin is shot calling for SKT and hard carrying.  The weakest player right now on SKT in terms of performance might be faker which is fucking terrifying.Eh sneaky actually didn't do much in terms of champ damage that game.  He died have a really nice alley oop buster shot though.  That was mainly incarn and balls.If C9 were to somehow win worlds it would be amazing for acceptance of reports hell you are talking 30 for 30 material there.Nah Lee gets it again he hasn't had a skin in a while that's good.Yes guys totally want to end up paying child support for their first time /sI meant that it isn't 50/50 next we will get into trash collectors and that NYC  FD actually passed someone who falt out failed their physical portion of the test because they were a woman.Our line might as well be traffic cones I'm terrified Russ is going to end up hurting by the end of the year.Yeah but we actually like clg.Actually three you forgot the good ones but that is an endangered species.Yup The Godfather is in that stackBecause the FBI agreed and it didn't read like something an actual sociopath would write.  Namely if feminists ruined your life you aren't going to curtail your rampage if a z list e celeb doesn't speak in fact you would as many celebs whether of dubious celebrity or not to spread your "cause"Except it's never swung towards dude bro ultra violence nintendo has always been there.Believe it or not we organize for reasons other than scammers.One side of the story that has never been fucking disputed by anyone involved even the people who are fucking married.Yeah it's totally classy to drop a restraining/gag order because you know you are going to lose while at the same time trying to get one in another state pure class /sHave you actually read all of those?  A decent number are simple disagreement some cross the line yet but not all are what they are represented as.  Also in the time period in question there were over 50k tweets made on the gg hashtag gosh doesn't seem like AS bashing is the reason for the hashtag considering that very few of those even are tagged gg.Only time it annoyed me is when it stopped communication because people didn't see points.  Most of my better posts were sub -5 or under.Actually the only reason I dislike downvotes is they hide posts which often hinders getting a conversation going.  If they didn't hide posts I wouldn't give a fuck. I have 21k karma on this alt account if I ever start running low I can just post in nfl or lol.This may the ironic thing I have ever seen posted that was supposed to be nonironic.Have there always been popular non ultra violence games is the question the answer is yes.I doubt she is now after seeing all the mistakes she makes.It's not a meme it's a simple statement of fact.It was fucking prince of persia the original with gender swap there was nothing creative whatsoever.You should.The reason it's controversial is it's pushed as being insightful by a large number of gaming sites filled with people who desperately want to be real journalists.  There is also never a secondary perspective provided showing just how wrong the shit she claims is and it isn't like there is a lack of things to point out.It's actually very typical there was a JT one and there is one for almost every politician.The comparison fits sorry.for fucks sake that was a title some idiot anons tried to start up most of us flat out hate JT far more than AS though frankly the actions and words she speaks have a distinctly JT flavor but she is coming at it from the left instead of right.It's the original prince of persia with a gender swap nothing original about it whatsoever.  It was a good game when it was first made but I would like to see an actual creative idea before critiquing it.Not even a thousand tbh.At this point most of the things GG set out to accomplish have been done.  However there is still a major issue with so called progressives pushing or deriding games due to politics Mad Max being an excellent recent example of this.  I can flat out say prior to GG I really didn't give a shit about SJWs AS was annoying but insignificant what drew me into GG was the issue of artistic freedom this is something I do not feel has been accomplished at all.  

Time after time we have seen pr bow to the demands of a few lunatics basically outside of Japan.  Shit like the Witcher 3 getting attacked for not including black people in a fantasy analog to medieval poland when the polish themselves were oppressed minorities is just infuriating.  I also think we are heading for a hard crash in indie the bubble is going to burst and every piece of crap release that gets pushed speeds it up like promoting Nina Freeman's 5 minute snore fests.  At this point it isn't even a function of money it's time.  I would rather pay 60 bucks for what should supposedly be a really good experience for say 30 hours vs playing a piece of crap for free that I feel wasted 10 minutes of my life.  That is starting to be the opinion of quite a few people.Protein World actually got a lot of attention including from national media and posted record sales due to it.  Essentially people cried that they used a fit model with the slogan are you beach body ready.  With people going as far as to say that the body type was unrealistic yet I see tons of girls with it every day weird that.  There was supposedly going to be some giant protest and like 50 people turned up who were the epitome of the tumblr stereotype.   Oh and somebody ended up threatening to burn down their office.  Also their CEO basically told people to fuck off and grow up on twitter.  End result was they made enough money to plaster it all over new york city leading to more salt and more money.  Interesting thing is they did the same thing with a male model last ad campaign and no a peep was made.I check KiA once or twice a week the mad max reviews were absolutely a subject between industry friendsI bet a lot were used and in the 5 dollar binsAnyone with a brain knew she was going to lose the gag order massively overstepped the first amendment protections and was incredibly broad.Why exactly are you here honestly curious?  All you do is try to score points you never actually discuss.Shall I start linking Trump Obama ones next how about Bush?The Sterling 4 and the polygon 5.  Bayonetta 2 also comes to mind, and of course gone home reviews in general.Actually they declared it wasn't legit doesn't mean they won't investigate and track down the hoaxer but it was never an actual threat.Meant NA in general a lot of NA really dislikes TSM both because of regi and the arrogance of their fans as well as the heavy heavy bandwagon.  Regi is kind of like LiftLift if LiftLift didn't have the skill to back up his words.Has nothing to do with mind reading has to do with knowing the constitution the gag order massively overstepped and was overly broad.http://nypost.com/2015/05/03/woman-to-become-ny-firefighter-despite-failing-crucial-fitness-test/They are incredibly off base since those criticisms would have been answered if they actually bothered to finish the game.bastards choosing odd job growls.EG posted a chronicle of abuse that he had suffered at the hands of a particular individual including gaslighting people happened to notice that one of several people she cheated on him with was a journalist who had given both her software and herself positive coverage.  This was immediately cried misogyny and the usual professionals used it to make money off of idiots.  FTFYLimit on how many or can I just post my list of 10s?Then go play Prince of Persia the original since it's literally gender swapped PoPWhy do frequent such a shit site is a better question.Try frozen hot chocolate sometime it's amazing if you do it right.You mean fake liberals like the kind who claim to be supporting of freedom of speech and then move to a letters to the editor type system because they didn't like the opinions espoused in comments?Hey now let's not be restrictive it's more than one.Believe it or not pop is pop because it is popular that doesn't make it good but nor does a band being unknown make it good.  One of the greatest bands ever was the absolute height of pop and arguably the first boy band they also changed music particularly production forever.It's rather hilarious tbhYou PC bro?You realize ETC actually makes incredibly racist comments right?I named 3 I could go do the list for congress and over half will have one that isn't counting govenors.  I'm not walking back on shit you try to prove it is unusual for public figures because it isn't.One of the strongholds is run by an old woman in a wheel chair who is a complete and utter bad ass.1.  Sure let me just put on my hipster glasses and muster up a fake sense of outrage think I will write one about /r/aww and how they don't feature enough pc puppies on the front page

2.  It's hilarious, horribly written and nonsensical remindds me of the samus trans article.  Wonder if the fallout will be as funny.

3.  Absolutely GG is alternately framed as nerds or fratbros depending on the writers audience.  Also the powerless/all powerful.  The terms like brogressive and brocalism come from SRS/SA/Weird Twitter and are used to demonize people who aren't far enough left

4. Existed before GG but yes was used in regards to GG as well.

5. Uh I guess I can do a simple one.  Now that I actually have enough money to live on I like to do this a few times a month.  

Get a decent cut of meat skirt works great and a cast iron pan and some salt and pepper.  Salt should be Kosher Salt, table is to fine and the meat will end up bitter.  Also aluminum foil a resting rack and a tablespoon of veggie oil.

Prep: Remove Steak from fridge pat it dry and place it on a rack for 15 mins you want to lessen the temp dif between meat and the pan

Lube er up: Coat the meat with a thin coat of veggie oil you want to hold the salt and pepper on but not so much it will just wash away

Season it: Season on both sides with salt and pepper to taste again use kosher not table salt or the meat will end up bitter.  Rub it in and then go wash your hands.  You want to let it sit for around 5 mins.

Heat it up:  Heat the pan up on high for 3 mins if you have a vent or exhaust system on your stove turn it on.  Otherwise you could maybe use a ceiling fan idk where I'm staying atm has one thankfully. 

Actually Cooking yay: Carefully lay the steak in the pan and leave it for 3 mins don't touch it or prod it or anything.  After 3 mins flip it same thing.

Almost ready to eat: Remove it from pan stick on cooling rack and cover with aluminum foil for 5 mins.

Now your are good to eat enjoy.Sweet bro I'm rocking a Devil Canyon with a 780 ti overclocked of course.Ouch 

[](#face-cry)Faker jungles broLet's not and say we didn't.I say c9 vs clg final and make monte cast it.Uh no that would take team meteor making an appearance for both SKT and EG.It wasn't unlucky honestly it was the fucking nami bubble if they were spread out so it couldn't hit all 3 they would have won.trist azir bans will happen and c9 will move to a dif strat sneaky and incarn have huge champ pools.we need 2 wins to be assured of 1st which is rather important since we have no idea how the 1 and 2s will be dolled out and would prefer to avoid SKT in the first round.Like the triforce or on the bottom?No it isn't because their crying would have been answered if they bothered to finish the game.Uh not he doesn't are you fucking joking?  Are you seriously going to just ignore racism because it's at acceptable targets?That's cute now actually link something with a significant number of upvotes.Believe w/e the fuck you want I won't change your mind and I've given up on trying it's an exercise in futility.There are actually multiple other female characters they just aren't pc enough for poly.  She is the **LEADER** of one of the strongholds so yes fairly important character shockingly enough.Digital women are just as objectified as digital men they are literally objects which are made of collections of bytes and bits.  Plus we have guys like Kratos if you want to try to treat them like actual people who have just as much skin showing every male dota char has at least one outfit that pretty much puts them in boxers and so on.  Hell we could even look at superman the so called ulimate male "power fantasy" who is an outfit so skintight it might as well be shrink wrap.1. Nope
2. Yes. reinforce is weasel word when you can't get away with cause.  For something to reinforce misogyny someone would have to already be misogynistic shockingly enough most people aren't.  
I won't go into specific game examples because people will cry about how they aren't utter misrepresentation and how they totally forget what console they play a game on when it has a wildly different control scheme.  Also there will be excuses for why very few parts are not just ripped from long play channels.
3. Not a woman but I know a lot who play games
4. Fuck no
5. Yes both watched and looked at other people's interpretation which often involves completely changing what she said to opposite which is amusing.Or an actual good story :DLists of 10s some have more reasons than others.

Shenmue - The sheer amount of content in this game was absurd.  Imagine GTA 5 but you can actually go in buildings and they are populated by characters who interact with you even behind apartment doors.  This was on the freaking dreamcast it's insane how ahead of it's time it was even the graphics are half a decade ahead of anything else.

Final Fantasy X - This is the first game I played to full completion it's also one of my favorite games ever that didn't have mods to extend it's life.  I recently got it for the vita and having access to the internation sphere grid makes it even better since you can now spec characters however you want.  Black Mage Yuna OP :D

Goldeneye - This game basically invented console shooters and was amazing the multiplayer was spectacular.  Prior to this the only really good shooters were on the pc

Halo - The original halo is the foundation of so many of the core tenants of current shooters and was one of the first really good twin stick console fps games plus it actually had a decent story which a novelty at the time

Halo 2 - Best multiplayer of any console shooter story was kind of meh but the multiplayer was amazing and was the last halo before it started to homogenize into CoD

Silent Hill 2 - Still one of the scariest games I have ever played and a damn good game to boot

Dragon Age Origins - Likely people will dislike this one but I fucking loved this game especially with mods i have over 300 hours on the pc version.   The tactical combat particularly playing as a mage was so damn good and part of the reason I have been so disappointed in the recent DA games was just how well Origins did this.  It was like playing wow except you play every single role required constant micro managment and I fucked loved it.  I would compare it to being an igl except you control the rest of your team flat out essentially you are the overmind

KoToR - If you don't think this belongs here you are just nuts one of the best games ever made and it's star wars

Super Metroid - Obvious reasons

Bayonetta series in general - I love these games I love the depth of combat these have a kind of nonsensical story but the combat makes up for it.

Shadow of the Colossus - This game is absolutely beautiful and takes the whole idea of David and Goliath to a brand new level one of my favorites for sure

Ocarina - Nuff said

Fallout 2 - Absolutely fucking legendary

ESPN 2k5 - I'm going to get so much shit for this one but this is still the best sports game ever made it's still better now than the new Maddens and it isn't even close.  I flat out love this game and wish 2k could make another but exclusive licenses blow.

One Finger Death Punch - This studio basically went with make a crap ton of stuff and hopefully one is good.  This is that one it's incredibly simplistic yet fun and requires stupid high reflexes by the end.

Portal - is flat out amazing if you are in this thread I'm just going to assume you know why portal rocks.

Mirror's Edge - I don't really care about the story but I was absolute addicted to the trials online the parkour in this game in just incredibly fun.

The weird thing is some of the games I have spent the most time in I just can't justify giving 10s the counter strike series while it's awesome I can't give a 10 I can give it a 9.5 though.  DoTA/League/DoTA 2 again great games but just not 10s idk.

edit: Mass Effect Original - I love this game I love the convoluted inventory system I love the mako I love everything about it then they had to go and fuck it up sigh

I'm probably missing a few more but now I want to actually go play some vidya cheers.

edit2; I fucking forgot chronotrigger and MGS2 :(
How about a time period after most people even knew GG existed ie after the TB post that would be good.Being white doesn't make you not racist against white people lol?  How often have we heard about internal misogyny ect.It has a cliche story full of plotholes of which the ending is obvious 5 minutes into the game.Most games don't just have story. Bayo's story is not really cogent there are a few things made clear but a lot is just weird.  However the combat carries the hell out of it.  If you just have story for your game and that is it, it needs to be at least on par with DAO in terms of story.It was rather interesting how LA Noire used that one but they made it way too obvious because the same guy kept popping up if you were observant.At the time she bought them they were absolutely bargain bin that doesn't make them trash it just means she bought the cheapest games possible.  Also wasn't mirror's edge supposedly a game she already loved why would she need to buy it again?A time when people actually knew KiA existed hint if the top post of the day is sub 300 upvotes people had not fucking clue it existed.Except that bioshock stories even infinites iamverysmart one are far better and except infinite don't have the gaping plot holes gh does.Freedom of choice?  Everything led up to 3 endings that were ripped off of deus ex.  I loved the first ME, ME2 was good as well but ME3 just ugh.1.  If that hasn't been okayed with the company they shouldn't be leaking it.  It could easily get their friend fired and they should let them know that.  If they are actually their friend they won't do it

2. Disclosed not even a question but again could get SO fired stop doing it

3. Disclose that jesus fuck, or better yet don't fucking do that because again yay fired.

4. Disclose again not hard

5. Disclose just a short sentence at the top

6. Again what happened after is the question, because it usually doesn't stop after one point of contact.

7. Did they become friends afterward, if not fine in the vast majority of cases it isn't just one point of contact it's stuff like trips to vegas together

8. eh when sex enters into the issue just get someone else to write it period

9. Disclose not even a question or better yet see 8It not however accepted that video games do.  Believe it or not if it was easy to force people to follow what games told them to do even if we go with AS's rather illogical ideas of what that is there would a lot more advertising in games.

Also I really like the way this person put it.

&gt;Because 99.99% of games with killing, have you killing solely men. If she's right, then she's basically shrieking "only white lives matter" at a billion Trayvon Martin funerals, and wondering why blacklivesmatter is offended.I mean razor's kind of right here anytime I hear that this shit is feminism 101 it's just fucking mind boggling.I already did 300+ upvotes on highest post of the day and honestly that is low since it reguarly hits the 1000sI never touched that game after finishing it the first time so no idea what was added.no next question&gt;Because 99.99% of games with killing, have you killing solely men. If she's right, then she's basically shrieking "only white lives matter" at a billion Trayvon Martin funerals, and wondering why blacklivesmatter is offended.How is that misogynist exactly?  It's ripping on so called nice guys who yeah can tend to do that kind of thing I know a few of them.This is common knowledge and should not be an argument said in regards to things like rape culture patriarchy and that video games reinforce misogyny.Our Oline is trash and Cable needs to be fired yesterday.Except Faker is a jungle god watch his jungle sometime.fine fixed cripes but seriouslyI know fucking "nice guys" they are scum a lot of them are involved in sjw shit and constantly cry about how girls don't want nice guys.  That is the entire reason a large chunk of them spend their time that way.  Sorry but you aren't going to change my view of people I've fucking experienced.No it goes back to I don't think she played a single game for years prior to that kickstarter.This is my alt my main has nothing connected to gg posted.I'm not agreeing with you it's mocking white knights not the people they defend.He will be for a much better off.I think they want people who can actually go into custom and play a matchup against their pros reasonably well kind of like a scout team.Ad sona triforce into bloodthirsters mmmHave to ban azir as well you can easily run a fair or jinx instead.Because it's an absolute shithole and the fact you are now hanging out there is frankly perplexing.So this is the guy to hate let's get himI don't lose just because you refuse to move in position not being able to change the log to someone who is covering their ears with their hands and going lalala not listening is not losing.Or here is a shocking thought racism is fucking racism not matter the target.Which is why Kim Swift Amy Hennig and Jen Hale haven't been attacked at all.  You know people who are actually relevant in the industry.By quote mining you mean posting the first two paragraphs and the concluding statement it doesn't really change at all the throughout.Really he doesn't have a hashtag just to mock his idiocy?  I could swear he did.&gt;My view is that these are all just excuses and the bottom line is that she's a woman, she's in gaming, she's doing well for herself, and GamerGaters get a thrill from shaming and attacking such women.

ZQ has done literally shit in the industry if gg hated having woman in the industry it would actually go after successful ones.I wasn't aware Milo who I detest was randomly part of this conversation?  The claim was that GG hates woman in the industry I named woman who are actually significant in the industry not nobodies.Because they have spoken up against sexism and in some cases directly against gg yet gg hasn't gone after them whatsoever.True EG had a lot of evidence and ZQ said nothing so really just he said and brought copious mountains of evidence.Exactly it's callout culture the only reason people went against EG is because Zoe is massively connected from her days on SA and Weird Twitter.Some of us have been in or know people in shitty relationships but still nothing compared to that one.People disliked her because she also abused the system last time to get her trash through green light.  It wasn't going to make it through the second time either until people happened to trash a complete unknown on wizard chan which zq just happened to get linked to.Did you miss the gaslighting making him think he was going crazy and forcing him to isolate himself from female friends?  That would be considered textbook emotional abuse by most.infidelity shaming != slut shaming, thank you come again.She wanted it go there is the thing she has done shit like this before to get her crap through greenlight.Or he posted on 2 of the places he frequented as well EG is absolutely an SJW this was callout culture however he underestimated how connected she was and to what length those connections would go.  Why should he regret it?  He literally did what is supposed to be done in pc circles he called out an abuser just happened to be a she and very connected.Ahahahahahahahahahhahahahaha

&gt;Leigh Alexander was successful.

How is being in siberia working out

Not compared to Jen Hale

Not GG people have also gone after male devs like the cod guy who recieved death threats for changing a gun.  Perhapes much like sports fans who threaten people who fuck up on special teams cough Bostick cough there is a loud minority of assholes as in almost every hobby.Because here you tend to be talking to more moderate people than on KiA and for the most part Ghazi.

The claim was gg wants woman out of the industry.  This claim was refuted I have no idea what you are trying to do at this point.No what gets Sarkeesian under fire is she cherry picks and lies Quinn lies Wu lies JM lies Kuchera is just an ass but I don't know for sure if he lies.  The vast majority lie and are tbh horrible human beings which is why they get shit.Nah Brazzer's Vel'koz fits.Balls runs that one after getting mvp for his level 1 hexakill in game 5 of the grand finals, after which faker typed open mid gg while openly sobbing he retired to help other diamond 2s deal with their immense responsibilities.or do ;)They are also not thee same thing at all.1. Not really I honestly rarely read user names even unless I recognize a style of writing, I try for the most part to actually engage with the argument being set forth.  However I do fuck that up at times.

2. Nope

3. Doubtful but it's therapeutic at times and I have had a few discussions worth having

4.  I usually spend time between loading screens and builds doing this so I guess I could do pushup sets maybe idk

5.  Hm honestly not sure I would say the word I would use most to describe myself is blunt.  I don't mince words I don't dance around.  As to how others describe me there are some who apparently think I'm a middle school dropout given my opinion of those others that doesn't really bother me.  The only thing that really sets me off is being called a liar, because there was a large chunk of my life where integrity was literally all I had I had no money or material possessions pretty much all I had was my word.Except for there being no change in focus.It's a name for the set of article if it was the actual name of one people would assume it was only referring to that specific one.Except of course that her first volley was at those who attend midnight releases and cons ....doesn't erase the first two paragraphs doesn't change her first targets were con goers and midnight release attendees.No it doesn't because the first two paragraphs set the scope
The scope of the article did not change she just said well maybe it's a small group but who gives a fuck it's way to materialistic as a whole.  As such it should be burned to the ground.The game isn't 99% shit it's a solid game is it a game for all time fuck no but it's a solid fun game not a fucking 5.People who are scam artists and liars I consider horrible people yes.I just told you the initial reason yeah a lot of people were still pissed about the WC bullshit that isn't mind reading.Well that and dropping that third down catch in the super bowl that would have iced the game.Or we could just fire Cable and bring someone in who wants actual Oline people not projects.Your name makes a bit of sense with that response.That isn't a conspiracy it's textbook callout culture.We drafted multiple Oline projects this draft because Cable wanted them.  None of them are starting in fact Cable's best draft is probalby Britt who blows chunks.  Get Russ a Wisconsin type Oline big full of beef not tiny guys who are fast but get blown up by actual dlines.It's not a single game though we have consistently been awful in pass protection and honestly not great in run just Beast has been able to overcome it.A wizard is a virgin often terminally depressed usually over 30.  Most of them share heavy characteristics with agoraphobics and can be on the autism spectrum.  You think my work mates don't know what WC is lol?  Believe it or not a lot of game designers actually spent time on the internet including the chans.  The Wizards are kind of like the little bros of the chans we can pick on them but others can't, or yeah there is a reaction.

http://i2.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/508/430/824.jpgThat isn't mind reading it's extremely fucking obvious.  It was not getting through greenlight on the second try the only reason it got through was the outrage wave.I do my very best not to lie integrity is the only thing that can not be taken from you.  People can absolutely take your pride they can take your life they can take your possessions but only you can give away your integrity.Kind of hard to at this point honestly.  She is speaking in front of the UN promoting censorship.Yes it is absolutely.That isn't a conspiracy theory rofl look into the origins of game journos and people like LA sometime; they spent a significant amount of time on SA and in Weird Twitter circles.

Also I can just point out all the shit that has never been been deleted from 4 chan or reddit for that matter.  Yes it takes connections to force that kind of reaction.So in other words it's fine if you isolate someone from a female friends constantly question them while cheating on them and make them think they are going crazy.  That is totally fine.  I'm curious what your reaction would have been if EG was the one who did that to ZQ instead of the other way around.  I'm willing to bet rather hypocritical after reading your other posts.Uh no shit what EG did was callout culture EG was/is an SJW and pretty hyper pc to boot.  So emotional abuse doesn't matter just physical?  It's certainly not people have ever taken their own life due to emotional abuse after all /sTBH I've wanted him fired since mid last year possibly earlier.Did I say they were more horrible than murders?   There are degrees of horribleness but yeah I consider pathological liars aka Wu ZQ ect to be horrible people.&gt;I think you have reversed who did the "callout".

You appeared to think I didn't.I'm not sure what aspects of aGG I'm supposed to enjoy when weight against the death threats harassment and pedophile defending that the faces have done.The thing is most people didn't care about the ban they cared about the absurdity needed to get around it.&gt;"We hate pedophiles!"

Supports SRH Butts 

&gt;"We hate unethical journalism!"

Links to Jezebel, Gawker, Polygon, Kotaku

&gt;Censorship is bad! 

Cough UN coughYou could actually look for yourself I suggest starting from Teridax's circle and spiraling out.  The proof is how 4 chan mods and reddit mods reacted.  There has never been a reaction like this not even to the fappening.It tailors with her actions once again yes it is.Cloud 9 could be the first NA team to win worlds I think that is way more important ^^pay ^^no ^^attention ^^to ^^flairEverytime she starts to fade from the spotlight she does something to pop back up there is also her previous actions regarding WCPushing the Duluth model is by far one of the worst thing feminism has done.  Also the fact that forced enveloping still isn't considered rape what the literal fuck.For the 5 billionth time it's the stuff other than cheating.&gt;Not compared to Jen Hale

In the industry it isn't even close.No I want gawker fucking gone they hurt people and serve no positive purposeBecause the entire idea of making someone essentially strap themselves in the stocks is odious to some /shrugHaving to make a public apology thread which would likely have rules of decorum ignored in it is being compared to strapping ones self in the stocks not sure what is hard to get about that.It's far better here there is actually a level playing field for once.A magical girl you say does this include powers and transformation sequences?Or most of the users when they saw it wouldn't change moved to either VOAT or the chans only reason I'm still here is this place and the league sub tbh.She was absolutely was an outsider she had zero idea how reddit works.  Especially that PM links lolsLittle do you know I am John Snow.Or once he saw the idiotic policies continued he decided reddit was a lost cause.I wouldn't have an issue if it was a pure permaban the issue her is the farcical ban message.Now I have tears :(Uh?

https://www.reddit.com/r/KotakuInAction/comments/390bni/user_banned_from_rplanetside_after_using_a_meme/

Pretty much everything is ripping on the mod almost no ripping on trans people at least not highly upvoted though there are many people point out trap tends to be used as chick with a dick not trans.How is there not?  I would be willing to be I'm up there in comments removed so are other pros most likely.I've been told to take things to modmail if I want to continue to dispute and not cared enough to do so.I said industry as in vidya specificallyFor fucks sake how can you not see what he did was callout culture.  I hate callout culture but his actions fit it and given that he is or was an SJW makes fucking sense.  It isn't his fault that someone on either SA or PA shockingly had a bone to pick with ZQ and crossposted it.  His only mistake was assuming that people would actually listen to a man calling out a woman especially a highly connected one.You can frequent Reddit and given them pretty mich zero money ghostery and ublock origins with no white list.No they are right about this one tax you ascribe motivations that aren't there to a lot of people.Then find the fucking court case or look past the first fucking hit.You know the shocking thing a lot of the people posting that kind of stuff are in good shape and need the calories just to maintain weight.  Last like being physically active is a good thing.How can you not love the rain gently falling on your roof it's wonderful.DieAs soon as they start doing it they will stop getting hate.At this point I'm just praying Russ doesn't get hurt.We should try that might work better.  Or Puppies nobody would stomp over a puppy to hurt Russ.Nah that's Link's; Hai's step 6 is world domination basically this except actually succeeding.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qzZmU0aGmcc

Their reverse sweep you mean :DThere are not alternatives to discuss GG.  If reddit goes back to being a free speech platform I will go back to whitelisting non invasive adds I will not turn off ghostery because I don't turn that off anywhere.&gt; We've learned from GG this doesn't mean censor though. It just means to effect change. 'cause you guys don't want to **burn gawker down, right**?

Might want to check what I'm replying to just saying.

1. No
2. No
3. No
4. No
5. I felt it was more needed in places like SA then the USA and that some of things they were complaining were getting frivolous.  I also felt that some members were no long pushing for equality and I didn't feel that feminism was the way to reach equality.
6. A lot larger chunk than I thought appear to be pushing for superiority I think it is flat out harmful at this point towards the goal of reaching equality.  I also feel at best they pay lip service to issues as far as males go and often not even that.
7. A group of nutjobs 
8. A group of nutjobs that unfortunately have some fairly high level connections which could enable them to attempt to force actual policy changes.  The saying of those who can't do teach is fairly apt the issue is a lot of these nutjobs are in the education sector.
9. Far more skeptical, I was skeptical of the right media before but more of less accepting of the left.  It's like when you read a paper and they are talking about a subject you know a lot about and you are just laughing because holy crap they are so freaking wrong. Yet you go and read the rest of the paper and accept it without thinking wait you know they might be just as dumb about other topics.  So yeah a lot more suspicious of both sides of the media and looking for other motivations than just telling the truth.
10.  Depends on the subject tbh I'm more open to the fact that the left might be lying just like the right I suppose
11.  The same most of the people crying about it come from SA/Weird Twitter and are simply using it to make a buck or are legit nuts
12.  More optimistic you have people like Levine standing up and telling idiots to fuck off and let artists create that is a damn good thing
13.  Eh it's cyclical last time to break it unfortunately the right had a win a few elections due to the left starting to splinter hopefully that doesn't happen again
14.  Gaming has always been a place where all the matters is your skill and your personality most of the people crying lack one or the other
15.  To an extent but outside of Bioware really pushing it, it's mainly only in indie and indie is starting to crash hard.  AC is doing anything they can to garner "good press" following the Unity debacle hence their mega promoting of a transgender **quest giver** aka glorified notice board.  If we start getting actual quotas not just crying for them by journos I will be much more worried.
16.  Sure but I'm also in the industry
17.  More large devs/publishers telling the offendatrons to fuck off and let artist's create.
That I would absolutely agree with.The problem was hokes didn't want to treat pGGers as human but instead as slime they scraped off the bottom of their shoe.  While Scar actually had empathy FTFY.  I can link a lot of posts backing this up btw this is not unfounded.fuck noRuss in on track for 72 sacks how many is miami on track for?  Also we aren't talking about some slow footed prototypical passer we are talking about the most elusive QB in the league is on track for 72 sacks.Welp CLG is done I wouldn't be surprised to see them loose to Pain now :(  C9 is our only hopeThey just seem off idkAh I thought you were saying that Miami's line was even worse since I've heard that thrown around lately.I LOVE THE STEELERS CHARACTERIZATIONSEND CHEESE CURDS PLEASE OMFG SEND CHEESE CURDSA. Don't sink to their level and b these people have contacts in twitter who fast track their idiocy.  So not only would you be sinking to their level even if you managed to get them suspended they would be unsuspended stupid fast see Harper and the shit she gets away with posting.Objectively a 5 barely functions and is unpolished but has no major bugs.  Max is highly polished runs well has solid combat and driving a significant story length.  It also has a decent price to hour ratio of about 2 dollars per hour which is pretty good for AAA.Who says they don't?  They might want to I mean they want to win worlds they have to face them eventually most likely.We still have C9Fnatic is also half Korean OG and C9 are the only full west teams left.How about no also that wouldn't be a tiebreaker fnc would still have 2 defeats.I've had a C9 flair for a long time prior it was kind and prior to that c9 been cheering for Hai and co since they were Quantic.Polygon only used that bullshit when they want to ding a specific game otherwise they use a standard scale.Nah we made a new contract we get all the faith tsm gets left out in the cold.C next day is D and they close out with BTBH for EU I would cheer for OG.  I'm just not a fan of the rampant Korean importing it would be like the US going to the world cup but only because they imported Messi and Ronaldo.  Plus C9 vs OG would be way closer in my eyes to possible redemption for S3 if we meet up with them and can beat them.You are implying that they actually understand sarcasm.except of course that a mod of the fempire is the one who took it first though I will agree those subs tend to be extremely racist and sexist so you are right in a fashion.All she is describing is that she stopped pointing it out.  She still firmly believes it.  Seriously stop trying to twist it all she has said is that she stopped pointing it out all the time.Artist?  Really an artist would use that as their icon on what I assume is their professional twitter page k.I'm sick you dismissing shit because of the source look for corroborating evidence or things that prove it False.  Even I don't dismiss every article from the mary sue as sheer lunacy; at least not before confirming it.Yeah it had nothing to do with people like Teridax baiting others to send messages to quinn with smash codes not at all /sred pill was a thing long before TRP teuth it's just the idea of revealing a hidden truth.The average stem student is a skinny ass nerd not obese.c9 is already in a tiebreaker for second at the absolute worst.  If we win one more automatic tiebreaker for first.LMS absolutely deserves 2 still.One change the runners up of the gauntlet w/e seeds they may be.Would you link me to start linking posts?  How about screenshotting mod mails.  They treated pGG like scum they had scraped off the bottom of their shoe. Oh please yes more games MOARRRRRRHey riot put it in the fucking store for 1800 or something people will buy it honest.When hokes posted it was to attack ggers and when hokes posted in mod mail their disdain and scorn was made quite evident you can ask other mods about it they constantly added things that weren't discussed with other mods before hand.Fairy Boy was Jack the Ripper play Revengance and you will see him in a whole new light.Would you like me to screenshot the mod chats or I can ask /u/judgeholden27 to confirm what I said about hokes messaging in mod mail.  If he doesn't by this time tomorrow then I'll post them.  I would prefer not to though.  Hokes always had to have the last word and was constantly antagonistic often sending mails days after the conversation was done.I might be down.Pretty sure that is just you judge.She also lied to be more pc so frankly much like others I don't trust a thing she says.Btw according to that test I'm solidly in the bottom left quadrant so are you sure you want to claim it's accurate seeing as you people seem to think I'm the devil.Nope I suggest you look at the talent pool vs the hiring numbers before you claim that.  Especially for woman hiring rate at place like intel is at almost double the talent pool representation.Bloody idiotic cartoon and especially doesn't apply in tech.When people are being hired at double the talent pool rate that means others are being discriminated against and either getting lesser jobs or no jobs at all not fucking hard to deduce that.Nah San Fran is just fucking nuts or at least a large number of people who live there are, Portland is pretty bad as well.  That is coming from someone who shockingly enough falls solidly in the bottom left quadrant of that test.Yeah I don't believe a thing Quinn says especially when she only says it in court that one even she didn't dare to say in interviews.  Also that isn't what she claimed, she claimed he left bruises after their last sexual encounter and wasn't called on it in court.Milo's Wu article got stickied for one reason so the mods could make a public response ripping the shit out of it most of the higher voted comments were yeah we don't like Wu but this is wrong.  I realize you don't even bother to actually look before claiming things but at least try for once.I don't care about the fucking video I care about the second half of the article which talks about the all too common practice of simply ripping on something rather than looking into it and investigating you know what journalists are supposed to fucking do.  This goes for both sides and everything inbetween.  For fucks sake you know one of the most popular ways people get their news now is the daily show/colbert report.  These are satirical "news" programs they aren't meant to be your primary source for the news.   We have fucking CNN ignoring the cops plastering the Oregon killers name up on a fucking top list for spree killers just wtf.if you caps a name and put period after it it doesn't page me.  Also I didn't say was never I said I see it trotted out by your group of idiots far more than pGG given this is the first time I have seen a pro say that in months I would be correct.

For the record /u/Mourn it was positive coverage not a review and the far more troubling coverage was of the GAME JAM event and promotion of her not yet named jam that turned into the scam known as rebel jam.  This was prior to sex but not prior to a vegas trip proving a pretty decent friendship[.](http://vignette2.wikia.nocookie.net/chillsonicfanon/images/8/81/The_More_You_Know.gif/revision/latest?cb=20150707060152)How about linking this?

https://archive.is/TQJBa

or this

https://twitter.com/SarcasticWarhol/status/510544501517979648We are talking tech writing code not stories.It's 19% it's 19% of the talent pool.  If you go to the right college aka a lower tier than Stanford ect.  Which still isn't much higher than 19%.  The hire rate of Intel is THIRTY FIVE percent.  You know the people not getting jobs because of it?  It isn't white males it's asian males.At this point shouldn't it be better than Shades of Grey literally the only love story worse than Twilight.Oh shit I should stop trying to climb then think D2 will get a special border maybe a blue tinted challenger style border.Shit it's not you mean c9 didn't already reverse sweep skt to win worlds :(Except Forg1ven even said he considered Sneaky the top adc in the west on his own tier.Hey now gotta ban Vayne to.Eh idk about that Hai had been around forever so had Lemon, Meteos was a normal star forever Sneaky was on Dig's B team all of them outperformed pretty much everyone their first season they were just flat out better in all roles every single player was top 3 or higher.  Balls as well.Nope no more purpose than a male whoever is the best should get the job period.we .... rightNon STEM degrees for the most part aren't worth the paper they are printed on you could have easily learned the info on your own without paying 50k or more to go to school for a degree that will not get you a job.  I get hot cocoa every morning from english majors.  If they had instead apprenticed themselves to learn a trade or even just gone for a blue collar degree they would be making a hell of a lot more and not working in a coffee shop.  A non STEM college degree is becoming the equivalent of a high school degree at this point.  Nobody care if you have an English degree or even worse a gender studies degree.  It qualifies you for literally nothing.  The only people who can afford that are people who already have money to fall back on.Same don't know yet if I'll be home by then or notThey do but in most cases it's better to just learn on the job rather than spend an inordinate amount of money to get a worthless degree.  I know people with english degrees they regret it for the most part the one guy who doesn't is traveling all over the world on his parent's dime so his degree really doesn't matter.I mean I said he had above the brain capacity of a troglodyte hence why I couldn't understand why he didn't get it but k :(Sorry the only people who can afford that and not have their financial situation utterly fucked for a while are those with money to fall back on.Except they really aren't outside of a few people who get lucky most jobs outside of stem pay substantially less the one exception being psych which most would consider a soft science and psych isn't exactly an easy degree unlike say gender studies.&gt;extremely valuable and valued?

They really aren't outside of psych valued.  I would say the most valuable is teaching and that often includes stem and judging by what public school teachers are paid it isn't really valued either.But but we want Mata if Lemon is actually retiring somehow we want Mata.Eh I would disagree I think the new system rewarding teams for the entire season is a good thing.  What I do think should happen is the 2 and 3 seed should play to determine who actually gets the 2nd seed.It's not a witch hunt when you link unaltered evidence rofl.By valued I mean what they are paid I consider teaching one of the most important jobs there is.  A good teacher can inspire 1000s of kids they are also paid jack shit for the amount of work they do.Because discussion of that topic thankfully isn't banned here.Again what I said is it would be cheaper and easier to learn on your own.  Maybe Business not but graphic design absolutely.  I know people without degrees at all who got hired on the strength of their portfolio they took a year off did a minimum wage job and drew sketched ect every night.  The vast majority of art schools are a flat out rip off.Yes but STEM subjects having the degree actually matters for the most part.  In GD your portfolio is the biggest chunk of what will get you hired or not hired for the most part they don't give a crap about your grades.TBH it really doesn't,  Some teachers yes but a lot of teachers suck and get into it for a stable job.  If teaching actually offered performance based pay based on student and parent evaluations not standardized tests it would be a lot better.  Also if they actually paid what a good teacher is worth it would several hundred k a year.League quite a bit recently end of season coming up and trying to push for Masters.  Worlds and Cloud 9's crazy run have reinvigorated me previously I was content to sit on Diamond.  Also Wildstar went free to play I suggest checking it out if you enjoyed vanilla wow.This is an excellent explanation the majority of unrepentant bigots I have met during GG have been so called progressives who simply attack the correct targets and as such get away with their bigotry.I suggest looking at the post history of ghazi mods and every post they talk about white people swap it to black and see how incredibly racist it sounds.Emotional abuse is still abuse if you don't consider what she did abuse that's kind of fucked.Except that isn't the same thing at all we are talking about races. which are equivalent things.  You are either racist/bigoted or not there is no such things as reverse racism or reverse sexism because it's just flat out sexism or racism.You shut your whore mouth and go read Ender's ShadowYeah GC has a degree in Marine Bio I know this.  A huge part of the reason for this is the previous generation for the most part did programming as a hobby while getting other degrees because honestly most of the programming degree programs sucked.  Even now they often aren't great and the most important work you do will be your side projects outside of class.The thing is most degrees outside of the hard sciences are going to cost you a crap ton to teach you stuff you could easily learn on your own especially stuff like GD.  GD pretty much comes down to learn the basics then practice the shit out of them until you are actually good.  What matters is your portfolio not your grades.Blind is the only one worse god I hate blind so fucking much.Lemon already said he is retiring after worlds :( So is Hai again.  Don't know about Balls.  At this point I only feel safe in predicting Sneaky Incarn being on the team since they seem to have a bromance going.Yup and I hate both of you person with quinn flair.As in the fucking debt collector, who you are excusing doxing was doing his fucking job.with a freaking tree trunk in width it's like the old nid spears.No it makes the person who doxed someone doing their job look like shit.Criticism of pop feminism doesn't equal misogyny someday you will learn this.How so?  It provides a contrasting view if the original view is loud enough it can easily overpower the contrasting view.How the fuck does that have anything to do with race?There is no context she doxed a guy for doing his job it's that fucking simple.Or she is just known for wearing them and it has nothing whatsoever to do with race.Okay then please explain exactly what happened how you totally didn't dox a guy for just doing his job.The logs are legit is all I fucking care about.  Also frankly we didn't dox Wu and I doubt we doxed Quinn I doubt we doxed any of the people who has benefited financially.So in other words exactly what I said thanks for confirming.https://witchwind.wordpress.com/2014/10/07/utopia-what-would-a-womens-society-look-like/

I mean is it straw when people have actually written it down?Why would I snark at someone I agree with?  I was merely advising them to use words other than stupid which mean the same thing because it jumps out in fact Shoden commented on while he was trying to get it approved.So is it reactionary to want to stop planned parent hood from getting defunded after all that is an action that would entail keeping the status quo no?  To be clear it absolutely should not be defunded I'm just pointing out the logical inconsistencies with using reactionary to mean bad.Authoritarian left fits far better with their actions than regressive tbh.Nothing he said on twitter was a fireable offense I've watch LA gloat about ruining someone's career no amount of context will change that.Uh that isn't correct.  Indie absolutely but stuff like Madden CoD ect are absolutely played by lower class kids.  It's a one time investment of 300 to 400 for the console that lasts 7 years or so then 60 a year which the kids pay themselves for the most part.It was the XOXO event you know the one that is 500 a head but that they will let you in for cheap if you are a minority because they don't have enough come to make a progressive atmosphere :Ps4 game 4 vs ssb sobsSo socialism is wanting to regress to a time when there was no money then and therefore everyone was equal?  If you want to play it that way.Pretty sure the people going to XOXO would most likely be aGG just a guess seeing as they have people like AS speak.We don't have a gameplan tbh we don't have a line either.  At halftime Russ will break his helmet radio and play backyard football the rest of the night at least that is what it seems to be so far.Honestly it's hard to tell our line is beyond awful this year he was consistently getting hit in the backfield.Yes I believe people who are benefiting financially and have been shown to be liars in the past would have no compunction about doxing themselves and blaming others.Goats had a troll call them GG couldn't give a fuck about some rando.Now that I would pay to see.Dyrus gets a solo kill on ssumday and nobody cares how the rest of the games end would be the idea end.You do realize that actions speak far louder than words right also never say never.  I can always rely on the insanity of wtichwind to prove you wrong.It's actually completely spot on start reading her actual words not what you wish she said.I am a leftist I don't consider actively encouraging discrimination against any group to be a position that is left whatsoever.That isn't True at all.  Here is the thing I consider reviews to be product reviews that has nothing to do with freedom of speech it has to do with reporting on a topic without injecting irrelevant biases.  Stuff like attacking PoE and going to the press when they didn't change it instantly I absolutely consider to be going after free speech because one actually involves creativity.The biggest issue with DA2 is it came after origins.  Origins iss an amazing game due to it's tactical combat.  DA2 is a generic hack and slash with an okay story attached to it.  Basically Origins was awesome and we expected more of the same DA2 was nothing like it so it got pushback.It's not a free speech issue it's a fucking product review if they want to write an opinion piece fine that isn't a product review.Nothing is a perfect utopia simply because it would include humans who will always look to get an advantage somehowWtf are you talking about.The most common mock I've seen is but muh freeze peach guess ghazi is racist after all.good thing there is little to no actual harassment going on from gg then.You mean Liana K?  Also that Kiva has a patreon is fucking hilarious.When it's game developers should be embarrassed to make this in 2015 yup.Lol yeah Rev 60 totally doesn't look like bratz dolls come to life :PWhich ghazi still uses so ghazi is racist at least according to your absurd speech rules.No the hilarity is that someone who made a horrific looking set of feminists cards which included randy harper is being given money.About as likely as there being no harassment coming from aGG there are always bad apples.I didn't say it wasn't a good goal I just said it's extremely unrealistic.That isn't True at all.  There is nowhere near the level of micro in DA2 as in DAOThat's good.That's discriminatory against people who can't stay up past 10 because of parents :PA so so shamble.That isn't even True though.  It's as long as **we** are comfortable with it.  They couldn't give less of a shit about people outside of their group.That 25% flat out can't be right the average American knows over 50 people of those 50 people at least one has likely been "harassed" onlineTumblrs lets doxs and cc info stay up even most chans boards don't do that.They have said their users are they have never admitted that many of the things they believe soley basee on race are racist as fuck.KGiven that the last time a figure associated with games got one was JT and with how his thoughts parallel AS wouldn't it almost be sexist not to have one :P.  In all seriousness pretty much any controversial figure gets one eventually.No but I do consider it idiocy I hope the person who wrote it was at least trolling her and didn't spend the time to seriously write that.It doesn't.Shall I go ahead and link Bush ones how about JT ones.  She is a controversial figure take gender out of it.Or we just point out it's nothing new and you only care because it's ASShe is a z list eceleb not a private figureBecause if you were around you would notice the incredible similarities in rhetoric between AS and the think of the children crew and JT just she is coming from the left instead of the right.Eh it's backed up by your actions I wouldn't call that baseless.Actually I care about racism in general I just don't think more racism is a good way to stop it.  All gamer isn't a race so your attempt to turn back fails on multiple levels have a nice night now.No I don't give the benefit of the doubt to people who have proven their intentions by past actions.  I can believe the ghazi mod fucked up in over zealousness with their dox.  Yet believe Irby is insanely racist based on my knowledge of their history.Petty sure you can customize the 410 to w/e colors you want.  I'm also looking at getting one.Pretty sure I know a lot of Asian and black gamers.  Also most people in the world aren't trans get over it you use an identifier for outliers.Irby is the second highest ghazi mod and an unrepentant racist but is racist against the right targets.You said cis I calmy said that isn't a thing get over it.  It's really not tokenism btw I know a lot of really fucking good Asian gamers fewer black ones but I'm less into fgm then I used to be far more info mobas now.  I was saying your stereotype is falt out wrong.  BTW the person who put that stereotype forward recently has said some incredibly racist things in the past.Governments in general tend to be rather incompetent.  Hell the presumptive next in line for speaker stepped down because he didn't want to deal with the 40 idiots who caused our government to shut down.Why not talk about the Justin Beiber dick pics that gawker as laughing at vs crying over jlaw nudes.No I hear enough about that in NFL where for some reason they get voted high.She has never ever ignored trolls don't fucking bullshit.Or racists are racists and there is no such thing as anti racism.FlairfineShe is incredibly racist one of her favorite targets is white feminist.  She is also currently evading a ban one her old account idesoflightBecause she spouts nonsense that actually has a chance of causing issues unlike a random troll.You ever notice how she publicized the hell out of a bullshit one she was told by both the fbi and the state police wasn't legit?  Sure is weird that coincided with getting 400k from idiots isn't it.It's also amusing that they think politicians actually work for us, rather than giant companies.Nah he does it to pretty much everyone recently.  He used to be far more even keeled idk.You believe her views of course she tolerates youNo I'm talking about the 350kish in donations in the winter quarter of last year.Sorry I misspoke no such thing as reverse racism it's all racism my bad.Sorry it isn't your crying about 99% of the human race doesn't make it a thing.Then you haven't paid very much attention.  White men aren't the group that is getting fucked in tech that would be Asian males.Racism is racism bigotry is bigotry get over it.Racism is racism there is no such thing as reverse racism because it's racism period also I would have to look into it more a tiny blurb tells me peetty much nothing We might finally lose the axe fuckkkkk I'm actually worrried about it this year we look like utter shit.I mean you beat us not that long ago just we tend to run for a bazillion yards every so often when we play you.  Well that and your first game in the Big 10 was against Russ.You go sit in the corner.He got people the board just fucked around with what the old policy was and we lost a 4 star rb this season because of it.Ew why would you go to that one of all of them.  It was very obviously going to be the PSU game except against a top flight D.So what we trick him somehow into thinking it's sub 2 mins every drive?Ah the Russell Wilson method.Because our 4 star got kicked to the curb by the board before he could actually enroll :(I'll read it later without looking deeper they seem to be pushing for equality whether it is via discrimination as I have seen you excuse in the past or not is yet to be seen.If you have any talent whatsoever in tech you can get hired as a woman.  You don't go from a 19% talent pool to a 35% hire rate when only taking the absolute best.Being Gay/Bisexual is a significant chunk of both humans and nature around 10% just for gay with estimates ranging up to 30% or higher for bi very statistically significant.  Sub 1% is not and would be considered abnormal statistically.  There is no reason to attach cis especially since it's most often used as a slur.Watch Dogs is utter shit they promised the world and delivered nothing good god the driving in that game shudder.  You know what's even easier than your whinging just play the fucking game you don't hear me crying that in one of my all time favorite game series I play as black people and the most consistent white guy in the story is kind of an ass.  Walking dead case you are wondering.  Making comic heroes really isn't hard especially when all that changing an established property tends to do is tank a book after a brief uptick.  

Make a new Anole or Northstar book and I bet people would buy it.  After yet another Alan Scott suddenly gay so Jade no longer exists or Iceman now gay because reasons people tend to stop buying the books.  It just gets fucking stupid.  Making a game is hard yes which is why guess what everytime that you cry because the female hero or minority hero isn't perfect people start to think you know what nobody gave us any shit when we literally chopped the white guy up.  Maybe we should just do that way easier than dealing with these idiots.  So sure keep criticizing every non perfect portrayal soon enough we will have none besides tokens.  Newsflash good characters actually have flaws they aren't perfect.TBH I kind of have to disagree between AGG and here I have only seen antis for the most part go further off the deep end some pros as well but we are talking about direct opponents here.The biggest issue with socialism particularly in the US is human greed.  There is also the sheer size of the country, but the biggest issue is greed the Trumps/Hiltons/Gates of the world will not go quietly into that good night.  They also have the money to flat out buy seats via congressmen.Mainstream?  Innocuous?  Are you fucking joking?Teuth sorry man but the shit I have seen defended and flat out covered up just ugh.  Has nothing to do with good faith it's just flat out wrong.Actually I'm not it's the same type of appeal it's think of the women instead of think of the children if anything AS may be ever more anti violence than JT after seeing her doom tweets.Google is your friend start with the doom quotes and look at the appeals to think of the women instead of young men but both heavily focus on the violence in games and want to limit it.ffs have you never heard of sarcasm.You seriously need to take a break dude.  You know the group who are actually getting fucked out of jobs by pushing to get women in above their talent pool?  I'll give you a hint it isn't white males.Uh are you serious right now?

Islam is the religion in which Muslims participate.

Islam is derived from the arabic word which most closely translates to submission or surrender.

Muslim translates to the one who surrenders.

Yes Islamists are Muslims if you are going to talk about something at least know the basics.

9/11 and ISIS are far fucking worse than anything gg has ever done

I really hope you never play an online game you will never leave your house again after you fuck up and your team lets you know about it.  Are you just randomly throwing words now it's very hard to gish gallop on twitter not enough characters.  As for sealioning well that comic is incredibly racist/sexist and that is all I will say on that matter.You paged me to an utter shithole because a spaghetti coder was saying I was the same person as some rando.  You seriously need to take a break dude.Then write fucking opinion pieces don't ding in product reviews that actually contribute to fucking bonuses.Good portrayals are fucking flawed the greatest characters have flaws.  Even superman has flaws.  Hell the 2nd most well know character behind him is Sherlock and he absolutely has flaws.I never said that but they are a huge chunk of the hiring pool likely even with or larger than white males at this time.It is about race she just tolerates those who follow her insanity.Nice ignoring the rest I have no issue with the comics only what a group of idiots uses it for.I never said it was left or right also don't make laugh about Russia.  The USSR is one of the go to examples of a corrupt government.  Also don't link rationalwiki all it does is discredit your arguments.Yes they do sadly hell Trump is trying to buy the presidency right now.That doesn't make them mainstream.Yup agreed I'm saying pure versions of either are completely non-sustainableAre you serious you are comparing murdering 1000s of people to saying mean words on the internet and claiming there is no difference.

The article you linked does not say what you think it does BTW.K shall w talk about the Justin Verlander pic that was stolen in the same way as the JLaw pic that deadspin put out while gawker was crying about jlaw.  BTW Deadspin is owned by Gawkera. I was rate limited

b. Nah because of her actions

c. Where the info came from is irrelevant it wasn't hacked and is still up via archive.

d. She doxed someone for doing their job and you just excuse it because reasons

e. Say what you like about me but I don't defend people just for being on my side.

f. If you only look at usernames and base your argument on them you aren't going to be creating compelling arguments.

g. Seriously take a break.She did, although her primary attack was at con goers and release attendees.Difference between AAA and indie is just being illustrated there.No please no.Every single character in walking dead was based on a stereotype that was subverted in some way.  Good ignoring that he was an ex professor btw very nice.Blew it :( not really much else to say sigh.  They got tilted off the face of the earth by the first fnatic game and never recovered.We are likely replacing 3 people I really wanted to see Hai get a chance to play vs SKT that he was denied by his lung even if we got crushed :(Not going to happen they are going to roll everyone sigh.The person who made that thread was trashing the shit out of na prior and is probably doing so again w/e.fuck off SKTI hope you get fucking wrecked by whatever team they put you fuckers up against.  I was rooting for FNC to get out of groups now I just want to see you arrogant fucks go 0-3No shit hope OG and FNC both crater now.go edg go fw fuck asshole eu fansand we were a last hit away from forcing game 5 vs ssb close only counts in horseshoes hope you fucks crater.Kabuma. the shithole you paged me to

b. I looked at the name after the lunacy of the reply

c.  Twitter is fruit of a poisioned tree?

d.  Doxing is doxing 4 years ago I was working my ass off

e.  No I don't

f.  They have a particular writing style and both are rather scummy

g.  You aren't in the industry you don't give a shit about vidya so no you first.Also how the reviewer acted like a terrible person even though they didn't have to.The artist of the piece wrote a long statement they were pissed as far as Divinity goes they were absolutely forced to change their vision due to social pressure.

As for the Witcher 3 the Polish are a fucking oppressed minority ffs.I can given an example of someone who was forced to and was pissed.

http://orogion.deviantart.com/journal/Save-the-Boob-plate-380891149Pain was actually a legit team tbh if they had held onto their lead against FW they would have gotten out of groups.  Kabum was a standard wild card.Nah Wu was the one who linked it claimed it came from GG but when context was shown was obviously directed **at** ggEh I'm just sick of asshole bandwagoners who are now shtting on c9 after going lets be friend guys east vs west hope edg fucks you.And c9 got tilted by the FNC game and didn't recover also didn't ban jinx in the tiebreaker just wtf.The most common thing I saw was people hoping both c9 and fnc got out of groups but w/e.Wait you think Russia is left wing?  Are you fucking joking?It is race that she attacks though rofl especially so called white feminism.SKT will wreck everyone who gives a crap.  I just wanted Hai to get a chance to play SKT since his lung fucked him in all stars.I mean it was predicatable either way I just wanted Hai to have a chance to play them since he said always wanted to and his lung kind of screwed him at all stars.You forgot ignoring culture because the people happen to be white it's done a lot.You mean like we have every year except this one when we shouldn't have even been at worlds and still managed to take a game off your superteam with bought koreans rofl?  Seriously talking shit is like Barcelona talking shit to the New York Red Bulls after beating them.every single one should show up that is actually rather large.I'm fine with that lets make some noise.So for a painful 0-3 then?You bought a team that likely won't get to the finals seriously 2 KR gtfoYou do realize that Russia is basically a dictatorship right?  Do you think that jailing people who are gay or support gays is left now?Indeed it's usually a racist caricature but since it's at whites who gives a fuck.Lol no they put her on specifically because she was controversial they wanted to drive views they might not get otherwise.So uh gifts sounds good.Actually I'm really not a fan of it.  It's like the US getting german players to nationalize here to increase the level of our soccer team.I don't have an issue with OG my issue with FNC is the same as TSM.The only reason it wasn't is there was nobody to follow up on the stun.  This play massively impacted the game.Actually I've said communism is a great system if you can remove the human element since you can't it sucks.  The entire issue is human greed same thing with socialism and it's why Russia for all intents and purposes is a dictatorship.Wildcard beat Fnatic guess EU's streak of losing to a wildcard at worlds stays alive then.Year after it will be KR on everyone no EU players at all, and the scene will die just like SCEven KR has slumped Najin was way weaker than either Samsung teams.  KR tends to be very top heavy and a lot of their talent got spread out by the removal of sister teams.  TBH except for TBQ LGD should have been the second most talented team in the tourney outside of SKT.  However communication issues killed them.  It's like throwing together an all star team but half speak a different language great individual talent but communication sucks.No way Brazil could maybe support 2 but not more than that.heh balanced viable in 3 roles yet for some reason people still think he is bad not looking forward to all the tahm bans.You mean like you fuckers are spamming now about c9?Lol no Alliance not ever.Doesn't matter you could win worlds 5 times in a row every comment trying to brag would be replied to with 
&gt;KabumWhat pisses me off is AHQ actually got the draw I wanted.  The one team hai said he never got to face that he really wanted to was SKT.  I wouldn't have cared if we got curbstomped I just wanted Hai to get that shot.That is called a joke.  Also a lot of NA people don't like TSM because likely they will have 2 or even 3 KR next year not sure if lustboy can naturalize yet or not for riots rules.  Also loco and regi really not well liked at all.C9 didn't even exist in s2 rofl.I mean their solution was to import Koreans.  I'm really afraid the scene is going to end up like SC which is pretty much dead in the west because almost all top orgs are mostly KR at this point.No if Karma's a bitch feb will smash his fingers in a door and you guys will go 0-3 because he is the one who started it.Faker wouldn't have a flair much like skins they are unneeded for the demon king.tbh that whole thing is just another reason players should be in booths.  I don't care if it's True they shouldn't be hearing that shit right before one of the most important games of the season for them.I never said that?  I just said I don't consider jailing people for being gay to be left wing I mean you might think differently but that would be my opinion.I mean that's what fnc did soooooIt is used as a good thing personally I feel the author did their best to make it purposely ambiguous and to catch up people who have bigoted thinking but wouldn't say so unless it wasn't obvious.  I could also be giving the author too much credit though idk.Personally I'm always a fan of the games where you want to avoid combat but in some cases it's forced upon you.  Scarcity to me is a key part of a good horror game.Yes but OG would be like Hotshot Dyrus and idk Chauster making a team in NA and being at their peaks again suddenly.  Not likely to happen their experience and massive champion pools have been a huge boon to them.It would explain a lotNo I'm going with what I believe the author meant the comic to do I could be wrong though /shrugBy actually looking at what is mainstream not just what the prof tells you.I mean CLG did double even admitted it they played what they wanted to play because it didn't matter.Curous why can I still see it?True it does suck there wasn't a competent ngo that could invite non harassers and abusers to talk to them rather than censorious hypocrites.The amount someone like Suh gets fined is like being fined 5 dollars for most people.Uh they got a tower as well also lost pressure.Yeah acknowledging it does shit all.If Hai was making as much money as football players that would be a just comparison in reality you are talking maybe 5k likely a lot lower probably closer to 500.Because football you can't just remake a game you could with this.  League isn't exactly a heavy physical sport with possibility for injury.From his pov there were only 2 and he had an escape if they engaged him he was trying to cause pressure on mid.It's a bug that's hard as fuck to detect that absolutely impacted the game would we have probably lost anyway.  Most likely we were tilted to shit but it was impactful.http://www.sikids.com/photos/48406/most-controversial-endings-in-sports/17

That white helmet is apparently a football this is why we now have instant replay.TBH they would probably do better if they went max difficulty because they are playing the notes that actually exist inbetween what they are supposed to.I'm not talking about idiotic studies I'm talking about what the mainstream actually believe as in normal people.  Physics is hard science gender crap isn't.Agreed but I do think a key element of good horror games is scarcity of supplies.  It kind of takes me out of the horror mindset when I have unlimited ammo and giant op weapons idk.IG just took dragon C9 was attempting to pressure to return the objective.  You do realize it's rather hard to pressure when the whole team is hiding in a bush right?https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WcebgKvAoh0 - See video for reaction currently.

Unjustified DMCAs are not justifiable period.  However since it was against a girl by a girl it would depend which one is more pc for the reaction of certain groups of people. Infidelity Shaming != Slut Shaming.  I should make a macro at this point and attach it to every post sighThen the people currently making content like AS should go back and retake it unless of course cherry picking is part of the curriculum in which case it's utterly useless.The tagline is from Eron's original post.I don't like people who have the gall to cheat on someone and then accuse them of cheating and force them to isolate themselves from female friends sorry I'm weird that way.Apparently you haven't been to college recently there are absolutely SRS like wack jobs in rl strangely enough they tend to be male.

edit: BTW SRS you are kind of proving my point for me with the downvotes stay salty now.Yes there is certainly no stigma whatsoever against males being nurses or teachers especially elementary ones outside of gym not at all /sOf course you would appluad a discriminatory director sigh.  For the record I would say the same thing about someone saying that for males.Or they would put their career since many people are far less wrapped up in identity politics than you.You don't get PTSD from fucking twitter if anything that is mocking actual vets.Cracked went dowm the tubes long ago.  Also idocracy really isn't dumb at all it's a possible outcome taken to an illogical extreme.  I can tell you a lot of the dumber people in my grad class already have kids few of the smarter ones do.Except they don't at all if they get degrees they get work.  Women are getting hired at nearly double the rate of their pool by top companies.Depends where you go to school.Lol except he is directly discriminating against males you even admitted it.Once again most media studies course are utter crap.  It's the only if kind of work someone with a gender studies degree can get.Yes they are?Hell in diamond you better believe I'm going for that penta.Theoretically you could hide it in a hidden file and only play when they aren't home not that I'm advocating this of course.  Or just get a decent ehd and stick all your games on that.The second movie is dead which is good because Tatum was supposedly headlining it.  Hopefully the first falls apart and any talk of remakes stops and actually progresses to sequels instead with a passing the torch style.How about posting why you think this.  I think it because of actual experience you tend to just be contrary to be contrary.Awful enough to take a game off the team you most likely cheer for given your two about the omg fnatic bug.Just another reason they should have booths and it's fucking stupid they don't.No what was said is exactly what rito said the nobody was near enough to take advantage of a stun here it directly led to a a major gold swing.So since you are in here what about the op will there at least be an acknowledgement from riot or?That isn't a fucking good thing it's discrimination rofl.Except they are being hired at a rate nearly doubt their percentage of the talent pool.  We are talking over 15% difference in hire rate vs pool size.  There is no excuse that is discrimination flat out.Did you miss the passing the torch style part?  The biggest reason I'm pissed is because it's a remake rather than a passing of the torch.  I'm also not a fan of the casting because tbh I don't find most of them funny.  Part of the reason ghostbusters worked so well was the sheer talent of the cast and frankly I don't think that is there in this iteration.1. Yes but not as much as she claimed.  As she has said to the UN she considered the every day of you are a lair (fact) and you suck (opinion but I would er towards factual this is because I think liars suck).  Even the so called week of harassment she released yeah some was but a good chunk was simply disagreement.

2.  Idk if it was AS or a supporter but I flat out do not believe the USU threat came from a non feminist.   Frankly what they alluded to is not something an average non feminist would even think of especially one from the US they would reference Rodgers or someone else.  Also yeah the twitter one is really sketchy idk.

3.  No more than any other public person, and no I have not.  I believe she lies and cherrypicks data that doesn't mean I condone harassment.  I have never contacted her or any other individual involved in gg directly on twitter.  I do think she reacts in order to get more disagreements on twitter and then pushes them.  She isn't stupid she knows just how much money she made off of the "bomb threat".  Much like Harper's patreon just went up 1k from supposedly being hacked.  It would be foolish not to take advantage of it assuming one doesn't have moral scruples about doing so.You mean besides one of them referencing someone that you would be very hard pressed to find a non feminist in the US who knew about it?  Not saying it was AS but I find it highly unlikely a non feminist sent that one.I feel like I should link the internet lie pic to him.As we get smarter and smarter we start to realize how fucked up the world is and you know what maybe I'll wait a few years to have a kid.  Idiocracy relies on the idea of the world continuing to spiral which is absolutely possible.  Where it breaks from logic is the idea of smart people never having kids.  Eventually you tend to hit the point where biological imperative to pass on genes over rides logic whether male or female.  That is why it's a movie taken to an illogical extreme because it takes a possible situation and heavily exaggerates it.No they aren't rofl.  They aren't inferior but they are not superior.Because I really dislike remakes in general and this is one of my favorite movies it was near perfect the first time no reason to fuck it up.I didn't say Sarkessian herself necessarily I do think a supporter faked the USU threat though.You think the average non feminist especially in the US has any clue about Marc Lepine?   Hell the only reason I know that name is that threat sadly we have a lot of mass shootings in the US.Those would not be lies they would be facts you don't like.In other words censor all you want just as long it isn't the big bad relatively ineffective government doing it.  If google censors the word feminist from appearing in search results nah who cares totally not an issue.I would suggest not drinking a lot it isn't great for your liver and no this is where I link dying light doom ect and you go but but that doesn't count because reasons.  I then sigh deeply and go back to blowing up scrubs so I will skip to the blowing up scrubs part.You realize goats admitted I interpreted them correctly right?No but I don't companies should claim to be pro free speech when they are censorious, but I don't like hypocrisy so.Was your comment anything other than an attempt to have the last word?  Also my comment while flippant contained some of the things I would point out and you would dodge.Actually I didn't make up bullshit I'm referencing intels report on diversity hiring compare the pool vs thee amount of hires.

Bottom of page 9 is the table you are looking for 

http://www.intel.com/content/www/us/en/diversity/diversity-in-technology-intel-2015-midyear-progress-report.htmlThere is actually an interesting fan theory that the jedi order is essentially like the government in equilibrium with emotional control.  While the sith are pro emotion; of course this is kind of ruined by Palpatine being an evil asshat and Anakin killing kids but hey interesting thought /shrugPower fantasies tend to be objectified males that are explained away as power fantasies.  Sonja is a beast but is considered objectified because of her Bikini.  At the same time Conan is a power fantasy because reasons.  It's just a way to excuse hypocrisy.

Much like punching up is a way to excuse being a bigoted fuckhead essentially it's double speak.

To be clear there is nothing wrong with objectified attractive characters.  I just see it as hypocritical to explain away the male version as power fantasies.Or they are circlejerking because Razor didn't make his intent 100% clear.Because most of them are incredibly bigoted but as long as they direct it against the correct target it's okay.  I would also say a large number of them suffer from a savior complex but who knows not a psychologist.It is discrimination the numbers show this no matter how much you try say this is bullshit the numbers disagree intel's own numbers that I linked to you.There is a difference between say reddit or google and some random fly by night blog someday you will learn that or not.You appear to be confusing being an ass with being a dev.  Some people are devs and asses but most aren't.Correct.No I believe bigotry that I have actually seen not bullshit.To the point a site is essentially a monopoly over 70% market shareIt isn't stalking someone was suspicious of what she said on a whim searched europe and found what she said prior to gg.So are people just reporting every single post I make?Or maybe base aid/scholarships on finances rather than skin color/gender and end it after college.  You have 4 years on roughly equal footing with everyone but the super rich and most of them already have jobs waiting for them.  So distinguish yourself from your peers there is this shocking concept called merit it's a great thing.Because that is racist.  What would be your theoretical reaction to black people suck or fucking black people.  Again I don't believe this I'm just pointing out that both are racist.No idea what color hokes skin is they make racist comments ends of story.Holy crap that is just beyond stupid.  In context it would be obvious you are referring to both of you managing to get past the hurdles you have faced due to finances.  It's not a fucking microaggression and if someone was to try to call you out in front of him he would likely put them in their place.  That said yes that is the shit that is referred to as microaggressions and it's fucking maddening. Not pissed at you just pissed a the idiocy that is going around atm.Not really look at tech hiring right now it's happening much more with gender but there are absolutely groups receiving positive discrimination.That doesn't make it good thing in it's present state.  Hell slavery was around for 100s of years and still is in parts of the world doesn't make it a good thing.That isn't True at all just so you know.  I know people who literally do not care about gg who follow you guys because they follow all the outrage subs because they find them fucking hilarious.  They really found the pedo hugbox thread amusing personally it sickened me but to each their own.The broad strokes of the report are utter shit something like 25% of the references are either circular don't exist or literally reference the creator's C drive.  If someone can't even cite properly chances are their report is bunk.  Of those which aren't complete bunk the vast majority are tiny studies like 100 participants or less.The general gist of it is utter garbage.Merit should be what matters most it's why I got a shot despite tbh being the second worst possible gender race combo in terms of what tech are recruiting for vs the hiring pool.  The only one worse is asian male which unless you are literally genius level good fucking luck.We aren't talking about systemic racism we are talking about racism period none of your power plus privilege bullshit just good ol fashioned bigotry.  IE RACISMThen you haven't looked at what their mods post no it wouldn't in other words.Almost every male superhero is heavily sexualized they tend to be running around in skintight costumes that outline pretty much everything.  However they are so called power fantasies because reasons.Let's be honest it was probably killallwhitemenI wasn't aware I was in tech for decades to enjoy this so called perference.   Tell me more about my past life.  No it's discrimination period no matter how much you try to excuse.  Also just so we are clear the group getting most fucked is asian males not white males.  It's a level playing field when you are hiring the same percentage of each group as they comprise the talent pool.  Not when you are hiring at nearly double their rate in the talent pool.  That would be a tilted field it's just one you are okay with.Eh depends if they have lived abroad also I would argue some forms of prostitution are basically slavery.  IE the kind where they get a young kid addicted to drugs and make them give up their body for more of the drugs.Personally I would highly prefer the system some countries are moving g to where college is free for all citizens to public universities.

edit: If you can dv saying that college should be free for everyone you are seriously fucked in the head.Some teams use sub spots for heavy streamers tbh NB3 is an example of this.  Without the ability to have a full sister team a sub is only so much use.One of the EU teams is pretty much an all star team and the other is mainly the old guard of all stars with a really fucking good up and comer.  NA squads tend to be groups of friends not meticulously put together like FNC or OG.    The thing is this is what happened with the SC scene almost all the homegrown players were kicked to the curb for KR and it kind of killed interest in the scene in the US for the most part.It isn't though.  The biggest issue with the NA talent pool is a. It's more profitable to stream and b. homegrown talent rarely gets a shot and even when they do well may be replaced.  See Azingy.Almost like it takes time for a player to develop and get comfortable on stage.Sneaky was damn good sesaon 3 he was just on a utility carry 90% of the time with the ashe zyra laneOkay seriously phone games do not equal game like league nor do facebook games.  Yes it's not like 5% but the percentage of female gamers in competitive games is around 20 to 30% possibly lower.Do you actually think women are delicate flowers?  If someone is truly competitive hearing something like that is just going to make them strive to prove them wrong.  Look at Russell Wilson hearing his entire life that he is too short to play qb now his a top 10 possibly top 5 in the league.  Flutie same thing Brees same thing.  If someone has the talent and drive such comments would only push them forward.This is actually a really good point when you ban "toxic" players who are say masters chances are they just move onto another game.  The people who tend to rage the most are those who are hyper competitive and always want to win aka the people who actually have the drive to be pros.  Yeah some are just asses but frankly who have dealt with assholes since the beginning of gaming we have mute buttons there is no need for riot to babysit. Shall we talk about EU last year?If you are competitive enough you will work harder just to prove the doubters wrong.  The whole concept of victim blaming applied to anything outside of actual crimes is fucking moronic.  If you haven't noticed NA is becoming less competitive in general it's the everybody gets a trophy generation.  People who have actually had adversity and have the drive fight through it and come out stronger if they don't have the drive they quit.The NA talent pool isn't a wasteland.  The issue is there aren't the incentives to go pro it's more profitable and less stressful to simply stream and you can go to school while doing so.  Azingy went 3-1 what was Helios's record again?  He was just another hyped up import who couldn't deliver.Nope still cop.Interactive mediums are different than passively observed ones why is this so hard to understand.Which is why violence has been dropping for years /sIncoming mass downvotes it's literally because of her gender.  Same reason why bernie sadly I don't think can win old white dude will not get votes from the people who will vote Hillary simply to have a female president regardless of their policies.For me because I don't want to see creative freedom restricted or quotas in all but name.  I am also in the industry I don't know why half the people who are here are here though particularly those who have admitted they know nothing about vidya and don't care about it.It takes time for a player to develop and get used to a LAN situation usually.  Getting rid of sister teams is the biggest mistake riot could make in this regard also we need Bo3 series.  The sheer number of games the LPL teams got vs NA is staggering.  Also there needs to be compensation that makes essentially sacrificing a year of your life worth it.Power fantasies = objectified physically perfect males but it's not the same because reasons.  There I made your post much shorter.Eh certain people aren't up yet I can watch comments go from plus 3 to -5 in a matter of minutes at certain times it's amusing.  I didn't say she was terrible because of gender what I said is gender is the biggest reason that people are thinking about voting for her.Would you prefer I said tokens?  The op asked why people care wtf am I supposed to do lie?  By quotas I mean in games not in tech you already get massive points for gender/race in tech that isn't a conspiracy theory I already back it up with intels own data.  You waved this away because I have been favored for decades apparently.   So a tilted field is fine as long as it's tilted the right way fuck having a normal field a tiled field is the right way the only way the judgeholden way.Not really I simply boiled down your gish gallop.Obviously a women will be more empathetic after all women have always been the primary victims of war.You mean since the numbers directly support the conclusion I wish wasn't True I must accept it to be True?Indeed early it's going to throw off timing a decent amount.The 40 mana is actually rather large especially early game prior to rune.It isn't meant for her dueling it's meant to impact her cs sheesh.The biggest right now for blacks is violence specifically gang violence especially in the inner city some of this could be lessened by having stricter regulations on automatic and semi automatic weapons.  Also by not defending community programs that actually give kids a safe place to go that isn't gang affiliated.  Another absurdity is the difference in sentencing between crack vs coke.   Also the amounts that supposedly distinguish intent to distribute vs intent to use are absurd.  There is also discrepancy in sentencing in general with it going roughly black male &gt; white male &gt; black female &gt; white female.  Obviously this is also influenced by gender.  Any other bullshit you want to try?  I can keep going these are just the rather pressing issues off the top of my head also income inequality is rising which is bad for everyone as the middle class is vanishing.I've written many actually. I just don't feel like spending the time to break down every component of your gish gallop; it's the same thing no matter how many words you spew.We have been overcompensating for many years.  I'm not bitter about anything I don't like discrimination in any form when there is a 15 percent difference between hire rate and pool size that isn't a good thing no matter how you try to spin it.

Also to be clear when I was talking about tokens I meant actually in the games themselves not the people making them since that doesn't seem to be clear.There is a 15% difference between hiring pool and actual hires it's also already a fairly sizable pool.  Pretty sure that falls outside of 2 standard deviations and pretty sure you would be screaming bloody murder if the talent pool was 19 and only 4 percent were getting hired.Your post boils down to a lot of words to say the same thing is different because gender.What I want is very simple I want hiring in line with the talent pool percentages.It's rather interesting I think these are the three biggest contributors to the frustration with gaming journalism besides payola and all the other fun stuff

&gt;That there are many people with left-wing or progressive political sympathies who recognize that art can be interrogated for its political beliefs but nevertheless want to read art and culture criticism that does not consist primarily of explicit progressive political complaints
___________________________________
&gt;That a time-honored and cogent school of thought suggests that evaluating a work of art for its political hygiene before and above more traditional aesthetic criteria leads to bad art criticism, art criticism that is incapable of working in the spirit of nuance, shades of grade, uncertainty, and instability that is so essential to deep artistic thinking
_____________________________________
&gt;That the degeneration of artistic analysis into political list checking provides incentives for creators of art to serve those interests, rather than actual aesthetic goods, a surefire way to create terrible art

I think think these two reasons sum up a lot of the annoyance with places like polygon and even gamespot massively pushing politics in things such as gone home.  Just because a product is politically doesn't make it good and just because it isn't doesn't make it bad.  Games should be judged first and foremost on well being a game and this seems to be happening less and less.

As for the gamedrop idk how much he has looked into gg but some of the groups of people he talked about absolutely fit gg.  I would say overall it's a negative game drop.  At the same time however he seems to believe many of the issues that gg believes outside of just corruption in journalism have merit.

I don't really think any big issues are missing but idk those three are my biggest at least but they could be different for others.  The only thing I can think of is that the attempted forcing of pc can lead to self restrictions imposed on the creators limiting what they feel they can make but I think this is kind of covered under the third idk.A large number of people will vote for her over Bernie because she is a woman.  The kind of people who are usually dems should not bee pro someone with a ton of a corporate sponsors that someone like Hillary has such a huge amount of support despite serving on freaking walmart's board is wtf worthy.It's almost like if you talk enough you can try to give reasons for why red and red aren't the same color.Except I have numbers to back up my "baseless assumptions" which makes them not baseless.I have been spending to much time on nfl I expected a manning face lolSo how many gigs by now?TBH SSW thresh is by far my favorite thresh skin love the style of it idk.I love SKT vayne if not for the pure gold crossbow the golds needs to the highlight and crossbow dark red or black and that skin would be god mode.everyone has headphones tpa skt fnc and ssw all did.That Vayne skin is so close to perfect just the giant pure gold crossbow annoys the hell out of me.Bandwagon as fuck but not wrong necessarily.I wish they all would :(Lol gl with that for SKT not to win would take the most obvious rigging to ever happen.  TBH I don't think they drop a game Marin Faker and Bang are just too fucking good.For dems absolutely for general possibly not.  Course the republicans don't have anyone sane running so the dems should win no matter what hopefully.Better?I read it then I dismissed it.There is no fucking conspiracy.Wouldn't be shocked to see c9 rush c9 impact and c9 random import next since incarn can declare region and so can rush and impact if they want to stay :(  Will be the end of an era if so.So can Incarn declare residency now or how does this work this is confusing as fuck.  From what I can tell everyone declares residency at the start of the season or something idk.Nah that will be the Koreans especially if they are only on one year contracts you could see some move over.Actually you have never cited numbers ever.Why would you want this?  That team would run roughshod over the nalcs supposedly mata talked about wanting to join c9 at one point good fucking god.  I mean it was be a beast team but I like apple pie and sneaky would be the only piece left :(No they don't at all.the jinx skin is a consolation for making siv the victorious adc :PI hope it's challenger jinx because I want it but also to spite you :PShe is Harley Quinn and Shacco is Joker it's not hard don't get why people think it's emo quirky bs it's an obvious take on harley and joker.It's dead rising/l4d sheeshProbably challenger Azir tbh most people were expecting Jinx but Azir makes sense since Jinx is now getting a skin.Dead Rising FTFYhttp://40.media.tumblr.com/883bb46a2b3f836389020c1b6da4e805/tumblr_nlezrdxe6J1tirp9oo1_500.pngOfficer Vi fits her well but personally I use neon because it's awesome.Good hopefully people will stop playing him.It's based on l4d/Dead Rising sadly hipsters look a lot like those games and the new non mad max movie has made it worse :(Oh I agree I've actually moved to maining almost entirely jungle because I hate playing mord and I want to take his dragon pet away so I play champs who can solo dragon and do my best to keep him from getting it.  I'm not bitter they stuck a fucking ap bruiser in my bot lane; nope not at all.The only non terrifying candidate for me is Sanders and I honestly don't know if he can beat Hilary.I was more questioning because of your flair.Agreed.ahIf I link posts saying exactly what I just said by /u/TaxTime2015 is it acceptable?Why?  Most people in this sub have been talking back and forth for months.For positive coverage not necessarily there were however major COIs which were not disclosed.  Also the response on both reddit and 4 chan was not normal at all even the fappening took days before being closed down and that was with major celeb pressure and heavy media coverage.  I don't even know if it got closed down for sure on 4 chan I know it did on reddit.  This was some nobody who got faster treatment than freaking jlaw.Blizzard meanwhile has 5 maps each with a different game mode in half a year sob.I was talking about SKT I prefer the skt skin over any if it wasn't for the giant gold crossbow as such I mainly use dragon.I mean it's not petty we left England to get away from the monarchy.Her political stances changes based upon what was popular honestly we have no idea of her True stances at this point and that is fucking terrifying.Or because she served on the Walmart board her voting record is anything but consistent and we don't know her True views since she just says w/e is popular.  So why is it you are apparently voting for her since it isn't gender.

For an example of this flip flopping https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-switch/wp/2015/04/21/hillary-clintons-history-with-video-games-and-the-rise-of-political-geek-cred/

Sanders on the other hand has been consistent for decades.  To be clear Hillary is better than an R but not much.Theoretically people who sell feed most people aren't heartless enough to let ponys starve.Are you sure he didn't copy a Hillary campaign ad?  Seems to flip flop enough.mmm chicken the demon king faker would rather have chicken than his own skin so you know it's good :DBut Rush and Impact can now right?Reddit mods specifically reached out to ZQ do you not get how unusual that is?  Also no nothing in the TB post that was deleted violated current rules and sure as hell not on 4 chan.  Seriously I don't think you get how rare it was for a topic to be forbid on 4 chan prior to gg.TB's post was absolutely not a witch hunt rofl.-8 yeah I believe there are enough people without lives to do that.I mean a cuck is short for cuckhold so yeah someone in an open marriage may well have cuck kink as for why it's an insult the same reason people use virgin to attack gamers.  It attacks a perceived weak spot.Believe it or not over the half people here wouldn't downvote that shocking I know.Wasn't a witch hunt so doesn't apply and still doesn't explain 4 Chan.You mean 4 Chan dislikes infidelity huh weird.The idea in this case is one being an unconsenting cuck ie you are getting cheated on while providing resources basically that you aren't masculine essentially since you can't actually satisfy your so.  Idk that is my understanding of it anyway not really a fan of it personally.Did you seriously just compare child molester being an insult to liberal?  Also most of us are liberal ffs.You tried this before I can just copy past my previous reply or you can delete your current one idk which.I love how he had to correct that he was quoted by more places including gawker and the Mary Sue pretty sure I would never admit to being quoted by either if I could help it.How has it swapped?  Wanting a level playing field is utterly consistent with that view and not hypocrisy in any regard.  You do actually read before spewing bs right?  Also my reference to quotas was in actual games not the people making them.  Stop trying to gotcha me it isn't going to work and wastes both of our time.Suggestion Google fdny dropping physical test requirement then when you cry about the sourcing send a politely worded email to fdny asking if this is correct or not.This was already altered and reapproved.Eh pretty damn effective actually seeing as she is now working in the equivalent of journalism Siberia.It's why I'm extremely paranoid and frankly have laid False trails on other sections of Reddit using this account.Not saying I necessarily agree with what happened in that case but it was effective.Police brutality is a problem for everyone if you want to talk about a minority specific problem we could look at gang violence but that unfortunately gets dicey.  If we could actually talk about it we might make some headway towards convincing people to ban autos and semi autos but idk.Haven't you said you are white multiple times but legally a member of a tribe or something?A flat tax with no breaks for the rich would gain far more money than our current system full of loopholes which ends with corps paying fucking 10% taxes.Ah so your that guy I see on public transportation with his hand in his pocket while reading a kindle intently :PNah I said I would be dved for saying it was due to her gender.

Also hate to make you a liar but
&gt;I still haven't seen the predicted "you only hate Hillary because she's a woman and how dare you say bad things about her" comments.

https://www.reddit.com/r/GGdiscussion/comments/3olrcw/offtopic_cnn_democratic_debate_thread/cvz1btw

and

https://www.reddit.com/r/GGdiscussion/comments/3olrcw/offtopic_cnn_democratic_debate_thread/cvyob2k

That work?




Gang violence is a rather verboten topic in the US because frankly it has heavy racial components.  Which is why you will hear about the latest school shooting but won't hear crap about the people who died in Chicago to gang violence that day.  Because sickeningly enough as the joker said it's because it's expected unlike a school shooting.  If we could talk about it we might be able to show just how important restricting semi autos is.  Let's be honest any hunter worth shit doesn't need more than a rifle to hunt they sure as hell don't need a semi auto. &gt;then when you cry about the sourcing send a politely worded email to fdny asking if this is correct or not.Pillars of Eternity would be the most recent one.Kam has been flat out horrible aside from that one play 2 of the Bengals TDs were directly on him thinking he could pass of the TE when there was nobody to pass off to.Eli is not top 5 even with injuries top 10 yes but not top 5.how about no.The best part is jungle with tele is completely viable so I can go kill top lane then me and my buddy can port to bot and collect our double kill there.  But yeah tele totally isn't borked beyond belief atm :PMordekaiser is not a fucking positive.  Get that ap bruiser fuck out of my bot lane thanks.Nah Vayne and it isn't even close.  You can go 0/3 in lane as long as your team doesn't feed you become relevant the instant you get blade.  Most ADCs need IE which is 600 gold more and pd which is another 2800 gold before being viable at all.jinx is just disgustingly good she has incredible turret pushing but can swap to long range for teamfights has a global and multiple cc abilities.eh the biggest issue I have with mf is have to be close and I have no way to peel.  If I'm going to be in close I want vayne because I can tumble around I can condemn I get another cc as my first major item.  Otherwise I'll stick to stuff like jinx trist or even cait who can attack from relative safety by the time teamfights start.ADCs are not weak in an organized team with babysitters who can peal ftfy, also after getting solo lane farm.Uh no it's not at all.  anything over 1% past 50 in either direction should be getting looked at especially with high pick rate.Isn't Bustle a feminist site?

http://www.bustle.com/articles/53536-fdny-wants-more-women-firefighters-but-is-cutting-strength-requirements-the-way-to-do-it

and for the non ny post source of doing everything possible to get more woman firefighters.

http://newyork.cbslocal.com/2014/12/10/fdny-commissioner-vows-to-boost-hiring-of-female-firefighters/

CBS a right wing tabloid now?This I know my point as even a flat tax with no breaks would tax thema higher amount than they are currently paying.Ignored and told people to fuck off.  PR panicked the vast majority of their backers were telling them to ignore the idiots.Because the poem wasn't transphobic it was mocking one of two things the idiots who have transphobia or beer goggles.  If it ended with him killing the person he slept with instead of running off a cliff it would have been transphobic but it didn't.You are in favor of dropping the strength requirement for firefighters are you serious?Yes they were they were receiving major outside pressure even though the actual backers for the most part were fine with it.Riotakes a ton of money off new champion bundles if they couldn't be played in ranked that would go down significantly.I mean it could work of you got fed off assists and "kill secures"We also know what the author said it was intended to be which was at the expense of firedorn.Your opinion of what was right in my opinion taking away a backer award is worse than caving into offendatronic idiots who will likely never actually play the game.Yes her long political history is why I distrust her and so should anyone who actually looks at it.  She changes her views based on what is popular she has changed so many times we have no idea of her actual views and that is terrifying.No she really isn't Obama was a lot better than her at least he hadn't served on the Walmart board.  She is R light honestly the closest to a republican canidate that the dems have.It was a fucking backer reward that nobody even had to see it could have existed just fine.  Believe it or not most people who are liberal tend to be against censoring of ideas whether or not they agree with them shocking I know.So is watching people get murdered You should really look into the middle ages sometime which GoT is based on.  The reason people got bent out of shape is they have no idea of history and never read the books and were just watching the show because it was the cool thing to do.Or one is social interactions and the other isn't hence they are not exclusive.Perhaps we aren't the ones who need to get used to not having our every whim catered to ...Boy your face must be red.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PL2Zmye3BkYHere is an idea suck it the fuck up if something offends you don't fucking play it.  Don't cry about it because it doesn't have your perfect female character in it or is triggering just don't fucking play it.  Don't write a review full of bullshit just say my religion would compel to downrate this game unfairly as such I am not reviewing it.  Because yeah it is a fucking religion at this point.Welp guess what some people are offended by non nude women who aren't in the kitchen making food.  *Note this is highly sexist and I do not believe it personally* So in order to satisfy them I guess all women should be nude and making sandwiches in games.  I am purposely taking this to an absurd level because your statement is absurd.No it's her talking how she learned not to point it out to everyone she never said she stopped believing it she just doesn't point out everything she *sees* to everyone anymore.Yes it is rofl do you not know the definition of censorship?Yeah that wasn't how you comment was phrased.  You very simply if you don't care about other people nothing about offense just if you don't care about other people.  Don't try to backtrack now.I have no issue when my every whim isn't catered to was kind of the point of my comment.Reviewers aren't artists there are glorified bloggers providing product reviews.Actually a large majority of devs who I know consider her a complete idiot at this point at best.Feminism/Social Justice has essentially taken the place that religion once held in many people's lives.  To question it is verboten and many people essentially are subservient to it.  The whole idea of listen and believe all of this parallels religion extremely heavily.Hm I wonder what your reaction would be if someone was to say claim the stereotypes surrounding black people are correct ...Yes stuff like Arkham Horror dnd are a lot of fun with friends also Sentinels of the Multiverse but that's more of a card game.If I link the exact source of that quote is it still a rule one?  It's from the GJP logs.I don't think you get just how weird it is for 4 chan in particular to make a topic forbidden especially something like this.They do however have to act ethically.I know quite a few /shrug whether it is the prevailing feeling in the industry who knows but across multiple companies I know a lot of devs who believe it.  The E3 statements swayed a lot of people.Other way around mate GG weren't the one that wanted to make communities bend to their will.Death of the author by s a subset belief and is nowhere near universally accepted nor should it be.Correct it's a different girl who isn't in the TV series and is pretty much just used as a punching bag by Ramses.Being racist against white people is a good thing?It actually works perfectly well both are groups the reason for using them is they are groups you would never dare make fun of.You mean since the bold guard got forced out mainly in the wake of Quinn and the supposed gawker niece suicide attempt.Nope I don't given statistics with a large pool of data things shoudl equal out to be in line with their averages.  It's why you see major needs and buffs to champions in league based on a difference of 1 to 2 percent in win rate not 15.Or people who tend to grind in real life tend to like those kind of games possibly.Why would use an avatar you find fucking stupid that makes no sense.Dollars not clicks.So they don't actually respect the artist's word choice and instead exchange it for their own when they attempt to sing a song that they would call others out who sung it for cultural appropriationBang on point, nicely done.Ows failed because of idiocy like the progressive stack.  They weren't violent though they also didn't go around calling those who were on their side racist sexist ect.  At least they didn't like to the stack idiocy becoming big.More that we don't care how people with a vested interest in allaying suspicions of media corruption portray us.I would be one of the most popular streamers on twitch if I had boobs and my skill level just saying.How do you type and breathe at the same time; it seems like it would far too great a strain for your brain.Do yours and look at her positions 5 to 10 years ago.  Also look at her flipflopping on credit after companies funded her election.I prefer CCGI don't think that statement is dripping with enough sarcasm it needs a gif or something.Well according to this story the after life is real so theoretically one could be watching ( \u0361\u00b0 \u035c\u0296 \u0361\u00b0)Why is sitting around nude considered performance art ....Shall we talk about the disgraceful behavior of pretty much every major media outlet in regards to the suspects in the SB attack?  Specifically how a member of the media tore down the plyboard and MSNBC broadcast the suspect's mothers SSN and pictures of family and friends unrelated to the attack.  Oh how about how they posted a picture of the asshole's brother rather than him a brother who happens to be a navy vet.  Almost like in the rush to be first they have completely forsaken actual fact checking.Pretty sure I have said they are bad actors on both sides I don't think I have ever said anything positive about Milo and have in fact ripped on him many times ....Spoiler alert dumbfuck homeless people have cell phones now if you live in a major city you tend to have access to free wifi.  You need the internet to apply for jobs now very few major companies even have written applications anymore.Shouldn't you be spending time discussing that or does being able to do two things at once only apply to you?The internet is more white simply due to how many more white people there are particularly in the US.  We are also on a site which is heavily biased towards English.  On the other hand if we were on say 2 chan the vast majority would be Japanese on Inven Korean.  Reddit is by and large a site that falls within standard US demos.  Reddit is big in the US and parts of EU other countries have their own anonymous boards that are big there.  

Having the internet is not a privilege it's a necessity in the current world.   More and more chains no longer even have written applications.  Many homeless even have cheap smartphones now because it allows for access to the internet via city wifi.  The internet is pretty much a necessity now public libraries are also a thing.You mean assholes like Child Predators and those who defend them like SRH and Valis and their defenders Ghazi AS KC ect?How is it a non sequitur to post an example of corrupt media?  BTW U not E for when you next try to dodge at least spell it right.You are a: Socialist Non-Interventionist Humanist Libertine

Collectivism score: 67%

Authoritarianism score: 0%

Internationalism score: -33%

Tribalism score: -67%

Liberalism score: 100%

I do find the authoritarianism scores of certain "progressives" funny :D
&gt;Authoritarianism score: 83%

vs

Authoritarianism score 0%

Which of us is the liberal again?You mean the "threat" that the FBI deemed illegitimate that most people besides your group went who the fuck is that guy?  Also I'm sure you can cite my fucked up opinions right since I am apparently the devil incarnate.  There are no games that don't get it "right" games are art if you don't like a specific piece of art don't consume it but it doesn't make it wrong.The word you are looking for is quota :DIt was self censorship and it's unfortunate since there is a lot that points to the Darth Darth Binks theory having actually been a thing at one time and that could have redeemed the entire set.  It's not like it made the prequels any better if the assumed twist was actually a thing it likely made them worse.I know right :PThe issue is it should be left/right for their liberalism.  Liberalism and Authoritarianism are one axis.  The issue is the left has become synonymous with liberal but many of the far left really aren't liberal.? The theory is that it was dropped from attack which is why Dooku feels phoned in.  &gt;because it allows for access to the internet via city wifi.No you really don't, honestly I do just fine in streaming I'm just not huge.  Also I'm not one of those who watches stream just because boobs those would be the people who are sexist.  I just can observe viewership and see a cute girl who is gold or even lower gets more views than a pro on one of the non big teams.Or that the top 1% don't give a shit about the other 99% no matter what they skin color/chromosomes.You noticing horrible creep block since the preseason patch?Sure it's a crap piece of art but it's still artI've noticed really bad creep block least shiv and rapid can't double hit now so pd is viable.True but top lane is really bad atm with how much larger the average champ is.If you live in a major city there are places you can access the internet without actually having it at home.  School, the library and public wifi come to mind.  Now what we could do is look at how many white people live outside the city in comparison in places where that access would not be possible.  For an example of this phenomenon in Korea PC Bangs are hugely popular people use the internet in public spaces sometimes more often than at home.  This is despite having access to cheap 100/100 lines and higher.   The internet in the US is astronomically more expensive.Thought yall thought that political compass wasn't valid?&gt;Whoa. Did South Park acknowledge white privilege?

AHAHAHAHAHAHAH omfg you are an idiot.  Cartman is a. poor as shit and b. is the closest to a villain archetype in south park.  In fact Cartman this season and last season has been the perfect representation of SJWs he takes advantage of legitimate issues and uses them to benefit himself.  After he finishes getting his benefits he then loses interest it's an amazingly on point representation of selective justice warriors.  Also the most privileged person in South Park by far is Token the single black character whose family lives in a fucking mansion vs Cartman whose mom is a literal crack whore.  The least privileged person who is a regular would be Kenny who is the only person who lives on the "bad side of the tracks" and is a white kid /gaspPerhaps people just find it disgusting how due to being trans people are willing to ignore that she killed someone.  It has nothing to do with being trans at least not for me; it has to do with the fact that she killed someone.Should have been the Daeshbags in that case.Closing borders making people mistrustful of those of a certain relgion causing one of the largest terror events in recorded history inspiring others to follow in their wake.  Unfortunately ISIS is extremely influential.Yup she was even on the cover of Crack Whore.

http://southpark.cc.com/blog/2013/05/14/on-the-cover-of-crack-whore-magazineOr you know growing up poor geez you are a pathetic sack of shit.  If I cribbed a story from a character I wouldn't draw attention to it.  I realize you constantly lie but not everyone does honest.&gt; suspicions of media corruption

Pretty sure what I just said is evidence of media corruptionYeah that isn't what Matt and Trey said that is what SJ idiots claimsActually it could be argued one is more privileged to be in a place where they aren't forced to spend money to have an internet connection.Why would you ever download porn?  There are so many sites with free content unless of course you are into non mainstream stuff.  That could explain your user name, projection as usual.Stop projecting mate.nah I just watch you idiots downvote pretty much every post to sub -4 then go make a crack about the niners in nfl and get it all back.Why not it's completely logical getting the internet out to say a farm can cost an astronomical amount of money when there aren't lines already laid.I noticed you dodged the projection comment good to know that's why you think people dl pron gross as shit but good to know.Am I supposed to care about what an open source document that has days specifically for editing with a feminist viewpoint thinks?I was insinuating that he was a pedo hence the projection comment in regards to his name.&gt;"with atypical self-awareness" 

Is what SJ idiots said.  It's just Cartman being Cartman it's pretty clear he is just using the situation to browbeat Kyle into shutting up much like he used transgender rights last season to get his own private bathroom.&gt;that has days specifically for editing with a feminist viewpointIt's seriously broken I have no idea why they released it like this.It's an AWP that costs 850; in terms of power and accuracy it's fucking absurd.B1G 10 refs as well lol I pity the playoff teams and am totally not jealous.I don't think that can be done until the face stops growing unfortunately :(Yeah chans in general tend to go after fucks who hurt animals or kids.They had a way better logo before :(Or because I am liberal and I'm just mocking judge for showing his authoritarian tendencies.Geez they are good.oh man I love this one.Goalie probably shouldn't have left gone on his knees if he dived forward he had a way better shot just saying.CLOUD NINE HAD TO SEND THEIR THIRD BEST JUNGLE JUST SO THE REST OF THE WORLD WOULD STAND A CHANCEMORE IMPORTANTLY WHEN IT'S REK OVER NIELS /PUKEI mean if you wanted to assure people that you couldn't infiltrate them why not send a Mr. Bean in every now and then just saying.1. Refs who give Duke national championships

FTFYhttp://www.si.com/college-football/2015/11/22/wisconsin-northwestern-ending-jazz-peavy-touchdown-complain

http://www.sbnation.com/college-football/2015/11/21/9776264/wisconsin-northwestern-alex-erickson-punt-return-touchdown-invalid-fair-catch


Yeah ...... noWe actually got two that were worse this year :(There is no right one in this draft closest is the Memphis kid and he really hasn't been tested.What is this first round you guys are talking about?BB will kick him to the curb before that happens we all know it.Line and then start Johnny next year and hope Watson is worth it.Well I mean then he couldn't send nukes there right.No it really isn't.It's easier to put on layers than to peel off skin which is the real reason in the UsMaybe he likes you ;)They have actually given multiple updates you know with as much time as you spend here it might be a decent idea  to check KiA once every other day or so then you would know these things.You mean Valslis77?  Also known as the source of the vast majority of AS's footage.You need to add unless they are made by my friends/people I agree with politically to the end of all those.Shoulders and height as well.There are even ones talking about wanting non binary link ffs.They don't play the fucking games.Mod on Antia's stream as well as the source of the vast majority of her footage via his longplays oh and a convicted predator.He deserves two :Dlol yeah he isThat would explain why he disappeared from the internet judging by how long it took him to break one breaking 2500 would take him years.FOR KABUM!!!!!YOU REALIZE A LOT OF DAYS WORLDS STARTED AT AROUND 3 AM FOR US RIGHT?  WHEN IT STARTED LATER WAS BETTER FOR NA.LOL EVENT VODS BRO ALL THE ACTION NONE OF THE DOWNTIMEbarb jungle is a thing now?Come on next basketball owner buy one of the two remaining spots and buy Flame.Lol yeah because 14 year old kids and up totally aren't in the bathroom jacking it with their phone while "drying their hair" :PSneakySo was amazing just blow your bans on him and laugh when he does literally nothing.Bro did you not see that sweet bard jungle.Can we stop giving them ideas to make that fucker more popular pleaseIt's the left wing version of conservapedia in other words it's trash.Except there isn't going to be a Heisman winning QB in this draft :DEven if he wins he can't come out til the 2016 season, also it's going to be either Henry or the Stanford RB about 95% sure heavily weighted towards Henry.lol noDon't give ideas roflYeah this isn't over yet.PC isn't necessarily bad the issue is taking it to extremes with shit like microaggressions and the regressive attitudes towards sex and sexuality.   As well as the propensity to want to silence speech one doesn't agree with even when it isn't actually harmful.  Basically Selective Justice Warriors are the issue not social justice in general.It's also not over the ending scene very clearly shows that.  Garrison is going to be huge next season.The biggest issue is it was 10 episodes I think they needed one more the ending one moved too fast with everyone randomly getting guns because reasons.It's not extreme to want to trample on the bill of rights?

Also the Caitlyn Jenner parts weren't bad, I don't like how fucked up they made her look.  However the continual pointing out of she fucking killed someone and people ignore it because she transitioned is pretty on point.Incarn seems to have cleaned up his act and I'm hoping it stays that way for obvious reasons.SRHButts, and Valis77, who is both the source of Anita's footage and a mod on her stream.   Why do you defend these people; are you a weird creepy dude with no social skills?

For the record I wouldn't mind if Hebe was purged with fire however the reason GG is on 8 chan is due to shitastic new janitors at 4 chan and the inability to talk about ethical issues in the major gaming subs.  That said there are far more people on KiA than 8 chan.She killed someone due to texting and driving and it's ignored due to her being trans.  The idea of restricting speech that does not directly incite violence does trample on the bill of rights yes.The first amendment only protects speech from government interference we are all clear on this.  However it is also meant to provide a guideline to how speech should be treated; people other than the government can be tyrants and they can lie.  It's quite telling that people will flat out make up shit and then pass it off as fact claiming it's justified because there is a problem see Jackie and the reaction to it.  People who want to restrict speech beyond that which directly causes harm are not in favor of freedom of speech, anyone who claims not to see that is either lying to themselves or an idiot.It's not done.The enemies of liberty are those who will lie to get their way which in some cases includes those people.  It also includes people who would try to restrict speech.

For example Jackie or [this particular person](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/grade-point/wp/2015/12/01/threats-against-black-students-at-kean-u-were-allegedly-made-by-a-student-activist/)https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/grade-point/wp/2015/12/01/threats-against-black-students-at-kean-u-were-allegedly-made-by-a-student-activist/

Pretty sure that this person is far more of a special snowflake then I will ever be and it's probably something you would try to justify.  Nice try at ignoring the whole Jackie incident though.

Also when did I ever say restricting speech is against the law?  Do I think it is wrong oh fuck yeah it is but it isn't illegal.You kind of suck at dodging.  I never tried to justify it there are people who are racist transphobic fuckheads even in your own circles.  The way to end racism is not with more racism something SJs really don't seem to understand.  The entire idea of a safe space essentially comes down to segregation yet people cheer it, it's utterly terrifying.  College should not be a safe space it should be a place where your preconceived notions are challenged.  

The issue is there are extremists and charlatans who use social justice to benefit themselves.  In the context of south park that would be Cartman a real life example would be someone like Jackson or Sharpton people who go in exacerbate situations make money off them then get the fuck out.  Basically it's the new version of televangelism.That's not a False claim but believe w/e the fuck you want as for Jackie there is no fucking way in hell you missed this

https://www.washingtonpost.com/local/education/u-va-dean-sues-rolling-stone-for-False-portrayal-in-retracted-rape-story/2015/05/12/2128a84a-f862-11e4-a13c-193b1241d51a_story.htmlhttp://claremontindependent.com/safe-spaces-segregate-the-claremont-colleges/ 

yeah I'm totally offbase /sYes someone who is obviously heavily into selective justice missed out on a several month long controversy that started with portraying frats as the devil, and was on every major news site and station .... khttp://www.yelp.com/biz/motley-coffeehouse-claremont?sort_by=date_desc

sort by newest note the positive review includes this 

&gt;Anyway, I haven't been there in almost 10 years, but I hear they hosted a very important discussion tonight.  **I would not have been included**, but that's perfectly fine.  It's not always about me.  Some people aren't down with that, and they need to chill.  Believe me, you will mellow with age.  ALL of you.  Sigh, youth is wasted on the young.You mean the single claim that was massively pushed for months and resulted in school activities being shut down?  Shall we talk about Duke Lacrosse as well?  I'm not denying there are people who are rapists however approximately 90% of rapes are commited by 3% of people there is not a rape culture.  You want to see a rape culture go to Saudi Arabia.

https://rainn.org/news-room/rainn-urges-white-house-task-force-to-overhaul-colleges-treatment-of-rapeI linked the source roflI didn't mean in south park I meant in rl.The ends justify the means doesn't exactly fit good guys just saying.1. Be attractive
2. Don't be unattractiveDepends where you go for foods and how much you make.  A minimum wage job isn't going to pay for a nice steak in an hour of work.You can't escape it; the number of places I'm running into it is astounding.Oh I agree I'm just saying that the reasoning isn't valid.  Course I love ramen sooooCome on Vikings.Pepsi and skittles sounds pretty good right now.You are a heathen.Anyone who says coke &gt; Pepsi is no friend of mine sorry.dasDJKLA;SHJUDASOK;LDAS GOD FUCKING DAMN IT YOU FUCKING IDIOTSIt was a horrible playcall 5 step drop are you fucking kidding me.The issue is it wasn't a quick pass it was a 5 step drop they should have had 2 short routes at the sideline and 2 going deep from the shotgun.The playcall was thoughMind sending some of those our way pretty please.  Cheese curds are the greatest food on Earth.It was a seven step drop that isn't even on Teddy Norv set him up to fail.How about no.The fuck son did you not want the division?Until Carson retires :(  I actually like Carson I really wish we could have seen what he could do with injuries I honestly think Cincy would have a super bowl by now.Yeah but you can't expect a young qb to do that.  This is a mega pressure spot you put him in the shotgun tell him if he has no open target in 2 seconds throw it away if even the slightest hint of pressure is coming.  Norv put him in a fucking seven step drop just wtf.Games are art they are certainly more art like than collecting shit in cans.It was a terrible play call.  Norv put him in a posistion to fail calling a 7 step drop just wtf.  Shotgun, if nothing is there and there is any pressure at all throw it away.More than just losing three in a row other games have to go our way as well was playing with the playoff predictor on espn we would need to get over them in strength of victory.However I'm pretty sure we need the Vikes to win the north to win the division and the two seed lolUh no that would be the very definition of self censorship due to outside pressures.Yeah that would have been nice :(  Wouldn't have had to deal with the fucking bus's coming home party sighSeriously anal isn't my thing but we just finished watching the guy stab sam through the chest with what I believe was one of the girls legs.  Also the fireworks blow up of heads.  America has fucked up priorities nothing wrong with consensual sex whether in the butt or not.There was at least one random sex scene in an alley but I don't think it was the end.LSD in reality they are about to crash into a tree :PGeez you want an essay a fifth as long as the story.  Any hints on the prize so we can decide if it's worth?I came from disadvantaged as hell circumstances yet I still managed to crawl out.  Yes after 4 years at a roughly equal level with everyone but the super rich hiring should be done on a meritocratic basis.There are hierarchies.  If they weren't half the reason humanity has to push would be gone.  Yeah there are some people who would still work but if there was no hierarchy a lot of people would lose their drive.  That is assuming you could stop corruption which has never successfully been done. The Duluth model makes me incredibly angry sigh.A lot of current media especially in games journalism comes from SA/weird twitter it's actually rather interesting.Very few men ever see themselves as being a CEO or MP also.  You are complaining about literally .01% if not lower.9/11 was a huge tipping point in our country.  Both in terms of level of religiousness and restriction of speech.  What's interesting is while atheism/agnostic numbers have risen an incredible amount so to has attempted restriction of speech which seem to be things that shouldn't go together.I'm quite educated in what feminism is currently pushing and I'm not a fan.  Feminism promotes the usage of the fucked up duluth model, terms such as microaggressions, and stifling of speech.  That isn't a good thing.I wouldn't consider that something feminism is currently pushing sorry.Can confirm I know some people who use a mod for elise that change her skin.

http://leaguecraft.com/skins/15301-waldgeist-s-spider-free-elise-mod.xhtml

Great custom skin and Riot has said they are fine with it.That's still a money issue there is a reason modding tools are a stretch goal on kickstarters.Yes this is a pet peeve of mine.  Cutscenes need to be skippalbe but not accidentally it should be a 2 separate button or key combo.Transmog is a thing in most mmos.  Some use that wear boobplate others like myself use it to wear full t3 with face of death and hungering cold :D? Wearing full t3 or t6 doesn't change you into a dude.  Always disable helmet.  I like looking like an actual warrior but I tend to play female characters because I hate male anatomical proportions and giant shoulders in most mmos.

http://wow.zamimg.com/modelviewer/transmog/1/1/688.png - T3 warrior

http://www.wowczsite.net/image/gallery/t3_mage_human-female.jpg - T3 Mage

http://media.wow-europe.com/shared/wow-com/images/basics/armorsets/tier6raid/warlock/human-female.jpg - T6 warlock

http://www.wowtransmog.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/08/warriortier62.png - T6 warrior

What mmos have you played?  I'm linking Wow I know it's in wildstar ff14 as well.  Transmog is basically costuming gear so it has a different appearance.It's like putting on the Vader helmet it's so wrong :(Bro C9 welcomes all let your faith be restored.We need Rush more than aphro tbh.To coach he goes :DSneaky Niels Fury Bang Imp Uzi DLift Freeze NL Pray Forg1ven OhQ I'm so fucking ready for worlds next year hopefully ADCs aren't nerfed to shit before then.GET THE FUCK AWAY FROM HAIMOBAs I would argue are the new form of RTS where you simply control a single unit and are much easier to get into.  They are flourishing and are entirely ludocentric.  DOTA 2 League Smite even HoTS are enjoying massive success.1. Yes
2. Yes
3. There are attempts yes.  However the most popular games currently are heavily ludocentric even including the casual market games like angry birds have no story.  So w/e their attempts it isn't going to change.  
4. Absolutely.  I consider Gone Home not to be a game due to the lack of a failure state.  That isn't why I think it's bad though. I enjoy plenty of not games I just have issues with gaping plot holes when literally all you have is story.1. Call of Duty: Advanced Warfare (360, XBO, PS4, PS3, PC)
2. Madden NFL 15 (360, PS4, XBO, PS3)
3. Destiny (XBO, PS4, 360, PS3)
4. Grand Theft Auto V (PS4, XBO, 360, PS3)
5. Minecraft (360, PS3, XBO, PS4)
6. Super Smash Bros. (3DS, NWU)
7. NBA 2K15 (PS4, XBO, 360, PS3, PC)
8. Watch Dogs (PS4, XBO, 360, PS3, PC, NWU)
9. FIFA 15 (360, PS4, XBO, PS3, Wii, 3DS, PSV)
10. Call of Duty: Ghosts (360, PS3, XBO, PS4, NWU, PC)

Here is a hint every single one of those games but two are selling almost entirely due to multiplayer.  Trust me very few people buy CoD for the story.  The only two that are arguable are GTA V and Watchdogs.   Also the list is inherently flawed.  It's based off of buying the game the largest game right now is free but allows cosmetic spending for skins ie league.  CSGO as well incredibly cheap to buy into but they make money hand over fist via crates.League is a huge example of example of this in fact the moba genre in general is.Lack of a failure mechanic.No it isn't.  A failure mechanic in this type of game would be like hitchhiker where if you fucked up certain things it was literally impossible to finish.  Or simply the ability to die which is far more common.The Church of Sneaky is currently accepting new converts.I mean it was the TSM announce as well ....That's like changing from the Sox to the Yankees why not come to the church of Sneaky instead.Thats why I want Rush jungle over Aphro support if possible.  Hai can teach and direct and he already is very used to warding.top fucking kek.No telltale games have flat out fuck this up and die with qtes.I don't believe there is that law for woman there might be one saying 10% must be women so theoretically it could be 100% women if people were inclined to vote for the policies of however many who happened to be female.I have a rather non American sounding name and that is as much as I will say.Uh The best 3-4 team really now?You can be raped without penetration ....No it doesn't.  Rape means being forced to have sex against your will whether it's forced enveloping or forced penetration.No it's not semantics your definition says females can't rape.When a definition says one gender can not rape that is not a semantics issue.  It also isn't a semantics issue in the US.  One of my best friends was raped in college and pretty much told they couldn't do anything because it was a girl who raped him.  He was near blackout drunk and forcefully enveloped.  If this is a girl we are talking about a campus wide manhunt.Good thing that isn't what I do.We also have Russell Wilson, Michael Bennett, Earl Thomas, Beast, Kam, Sherm, Bwagz, Graham, AvrilYou can drown :Dwhich is fucked.not necessarily.  Say a woman forces a guy to go down on her with a gun no penetration involved.  Also penetration is in reference to recieving penetration not being forced to penetrate.  I agree it's fucked but currently envelopment is not considered rape.Currently it doesn't sadly it's considered aggravated sexual misconduct or some bs and carries a much lower sentence than rape.An attractive young white girl who recalls being raped against her will while blackout drunk.  Yes there would be a campus wide manhunt.  Hell look at the shit that has happened even when there most likely wasn't rape.  The vast majority of the time when cases aren't prosecuted it's because the victim can't identify their attacker or their attack is in sports.  While that is fucked up as hell it's radically different from what you said.How about the ones trying to justify why envelopement isn't rape sighActually there is forced envelopement is considered aggravated sexual assualt not rape in most of the USIt's rather hilarious when you have to dig through comments to try to discredit someone.  Insufficent evidence aka lack of physical evidence and unable to positively identify attacker.  IE what I said.You haven't intellectually curbstomped me in any regard.  I doubt you have the intellect to curbstomp anyone out of high school tbh.  It's good that you can dismiss males not be able to receive justice after being raped as KiA circlejerking though simply validates that selective justice is indeed a good term for SJWs rather than social justice.I mean could be Mata :P then Hai could retire after this split once Mata gets used to shotcalling in English.Like I said 4 years at college pretty much everyone except the super rich kids are on roughly the same level.  We are all dirt poor working crappy jobs and in debt up to our heads.Uh no S1 doesn't count because it was NA EU and SEA in Phreak's Mom's basement.  No KR no CN.It's about as relevant as a "study" in a tiny localized area.Didn't go to good schools in youth dealt with racism kids who were both black and white do at a 50/50 school.  Did have extra curricular activities but didn't have shit for role models.Blizzard hasn't or Valve or for that matter Activision, Nintendo?  All of those are pretty damn old and all have created successful esports to various degrees not on the level of league except for SC but absolutely successful.
So uh is Bitino up for sale?Sound like you guys are completely blowing up your team tbh.  I mean you have two of the best oline in the league on your trade block.To be fair they wouldn't be wrong quite a few of the streamers invited already moved back to their primary games.what fresh bullshit is this nfl sighOh fuck off he took multiple stepsGood thing it doesn't.  In fact I would have to say when women actually run they tend to have a higher chance of getting elected then men because people actually subscribe to your warped way of thinking.I mean I'm never seen a lateral to a ghost not called a fumble so it's kind of new.Yup and that should have been a catch.I've complained that it shows she is attacking con goers and midnight release attendees I have no objection to plush mushroom hats.  I do have an objection to attacking those who wear them.  But good try at at a twist.

Also she is in the journalism equivalent of siberia now so her employers apparently agreed.BothWTF LOCKThey were both catches.  You just don't care about this one because it benefits you,seriously this is fucking absurd.Does it feel to anyone else like football is just there to interrupt commercials now?Offworld is Siberia literally nobody but your group gives a fuck about anything that comes out of it.  Who cares who owns it the site itself is a fucking joke.Damn close one :(FFS TOO MANY FUCKING COMMERICALS GAHRemote area that problems were exiled to in order to keep them out of the public eye and punish them for stepping out of line.  Sounds pretty damn accurate.I don't give a fuck if you sleep with 50 thousand other people.  I do give a fuck when you can't be bothered to break up with someone before fucking someone else especially when you then proceed to have sex with the person you are supposedly with after.  Frankly it's fucked up as all hell to do that just break up you obviously don't love them since you are willing to fuck someone else; so break up.Uh no they aren't link source from SPLC specifically denoting GG as a hate group.  As for the FBI they specifically said that USU was not credible.You mean like ghazi making a safe space thread for a predator?  Or how apparently every single post not topic but post on ghazi has to be moderator approved now post that thread.  Sure seems a lot like trying to restrict speech to a specific view.  Which sounds really weird for a group that is supposedly liberal.I like the term someone used called selective justice saying social justice is flat out wrong because they only care about "justice" for their friends and clique.Happened during relationship shoo.  If you don't like someone enough to not fuck others then break up it's really not hard.  Exceptions obviously being an open relationship.So uh get him to take vet min Megatron with Graham and an actual line that could be fun.  You got Tate from us after all :D16 more qbs to add to the Cleveland graveyard why not.Seattle was like that a long time even the Kingdome pretty much always sold out just now we actually have a contender to route for.  I wouldn't mind seeing Cleveland just randomly hit on a QB and make the Stealers cry for the next decade.Happened during on phases as well at least 3 times shooMost of them played it for a day and went back.  I think people would be a lot more understanding if it was mainly csgo and tf2 pros.If streamers are playing games they are streaming.  It makes no sense not to it's a direct opportunity cost for them to play games and not stream.Or I care about scumbags who cheat.Uh yes they did I can't link it because of rule 5 but they absolutely did.Even if you don't interact with the audience and are just bullshiting on skype with friends it still makes sense to be streaming.Yeah I wasn't even thinking about SC2 I was thinking about broodwar WC3 you know what kind of got esports huge especially brood war.  It's a huge reason why SK dominates league they already have the structure from broodwar days.People who cheat are scum can we agree on this yes or no.Please can we hold onto this one please.I have things I'm far more worried about than ZQ as far as GG goes.  I'm just baffled as to why people would defend an emotional abuser and say she did nothing wrong.1 more play please pleaseYeah he was looking around going no whistle guess I should get in :(We won so I'm okay but we did not look good doing it ugh.&gt; I'm just baffled as to why people would defend an emotional abuser and say she did nothing wrong.

Nearly as baffled as when people create safe space threads for predators nearly.Nyberg.Source SPLC link it.How is that creepy?  I despise people who cheat I don't care if I know them personally I consider them scum.  Also I wasn't the one who brought up ZQ I simply said if you want to fuck someone else then break up in response to claiming that infidelity shaming = slut shaming.  If you aren't in a relationship fuck whoever the fuck you want.  If you are than break up before fucking someone else it isn't hard.  You obviously aren't that interested in a relationship anyway if you want to fuck someone else.Uh the IRS doesn't give a shit about PR they know they are hated.I have an intense reaction to cheating because I both have been cheated on and know others who have as well.  Much like I have an intense reaction to male rape being downplayed because one of my best friends was raped by a female.No you are acting completely irrationally because you want to downplay how fucked up cheating is since someone is doing that you like.Linking pictures of their 8 year old cousin in a two piece goes beyond just doing gross shit.I have a strong reaction because I know what it felt like to be cheated on and that was nothing like the games that were played with EG.  That shit was actually twisted.The one your RB cleary caught then lateraled to a ghost while attempting to switch hands.I just find it incredibly disturbing that people are willing to overlook actions of a heinous nature.  Simply because someone sides with them on the ultimate first world problem.10 is best :DI don't give a fuck what Milo had to say I looked at the logs Milo posting them after doesn't somehow discredit him no matter how much I may dislike him.I have no idea what Milo writes because just like poly I expect it to be stupidly biased.  I actually looked through the logs myself to confirm what people were saying.No I would prefer people acted empathic rather than sociopathically.  Doesn't mean I want to ban it.  Also how it being an authoritarian and sex negative puritan to not care what people do either outside a relationship or in an open one but simply not to want them to hurt their SO more and simply break up first?He is making fun of the people who say Sherm can't shadow a number one not detrimental towards Dez at all I believe.I want them to crash hard and for Frost to somehow get fired and be our new OC :(Actually it has a high degree of relevance.  One of the things that gg posits is that certain games are being pushed due to politics of either the game or the creator rather than merit.  if people are willing to overlook such horrific things as predatory behavior in regards to children, that lends credence to the idea they may do something far less insane for politics such as pushing certain games regardless of merit.I mean at least you have hope.  Unless we make major changes to the line we are going to finish around 500 not high enough for a good pick and we wouldn't use it on oline anyway.  Instead we will draft a dlinmen and try to convert them to Oline sob.Just curious if I'm part of this list since I know I'm rather blunt and at times can go rather doggedly at a point when others don't want to.3rdPerhaps we should move to WCO :(So Turtle is not going to try for either jungle or support for sure then?I had never heard of it before /shrug.  I can only thing of about 7 who I think have zero interest in discussion.yeah maybe idkYeah it's real fun to watch a region where one team is head and shoulders above the others :PI never said Dez didn't catch it?  I found that to be a fucking travesty of a call.I didn't speculate on anyone's mental condition.  It shows sociopathic tendencies to cheat sorry.  Doesn't matter who is doing it.  To cheat one tends to need to not give a fuck about how their SO feels.People got tired of fencing on a tilted field dealing with constant shit posting and mods who would actually attack them in mod mail you mean?I wouldn't say it's tribalism at least for myself I will absolutely call out the behavior of certain pGG personalities.  I watch others do the same as well I can't speak for antis but at least here it seems like pros have no issue with calling out other pros.fuck noSo where am I?No head mods just get burned out Shoden I don't have an issue with if he brings on someone like Hokes though I will jet the fuck out.  I miss Bill I wish we had a neutral that could be head mod.Except it doesn't at all and the person you are referring to is anti since I have seen them spam that idiocy multiple times.No the dumbest shit ever is expecting people to know other's pronouns and getting bent out of shape when they don't.  If you want your pronoun used get it put in your flair.We went through what 4 head mods in aGG and that was frankly when gg was a lot smaller.  There also weren't established people who would get spam reported at that time.

Bill was the closest to a True neutral in AGG or at least that is how he posted whether he actually felt that way idk.  Choob had a noticable anti lean.Unless both parties agree to an open relationship you are obviously not interested in a relationship if you fuck someone else during. Yeah I was asking in terms of reports and you aren't a mod here.Let me tell them you they don't even have to be Oline.  Dline and TEs work just as well /s God I hate Cable.27 autos even at 2.5 attacks per second is still 10.8 seconds and that's if you can stand still and never miss an aa that is an eternity in a team fight.A cuckhold is someone who gets off on it.  I despise people who cheat whether men or women it's scummy and shitty to do.  Just fucking break up if you want to fuck other people.Yes to the first one no idea to the second one.Nah I'm not talking about Jimmy one of our starting Tackles was a TE in college.Are you still going to be coast or becoming Sacremento Kings?Was making a joke relax mate.Bengi isn't a carry jungle he is a supportive jungle.Tbh I would much rather live in Cali than CNMore importantly Hai can teach Rush since he likely wants to eventually retire.  Then we can look into getting a heavy mechanical support once Rush is good to roll solo.They should talk to whomever makes hockey masks.  Those are comfy maybe they should look into using hockey style masks that lock in place. College level not pro.Hm kind of hoping this is real at this point.TBH only way I'll be down for Force Awakens is if this fan theory ends up being True.  I still have mega salt at Heir being invalidated.  I consider the Heir trilogy to be on par with the OT.  I really wanted it to be the next set of movies if they ever made them.  I mean I'll still see it I'm just less hyped than most, because I saw Abrams latest attempt at sci fi :(The first one I've heard, never heard the second but that is a rather interesting thought.

On the subject of HP fan stuff ever seen this one?

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OGHBwk0quxs

The production values are actually pretty darn good.Does Slack take down ip info like most irc clients?  Just being paranoid as usual.What's your Btag after all there must always be watchers; so you can't be allowed to have beta.  Sorry :(The number of nopes currently in the world is not high enough for me express how many nopes are needed.Yeah just reading the url not clicking that.For fucks sake PL there are 700k trans people in the US I will even go up to a million.  To expect people to use they/them for everyone is utterly ludicrous.  Hence why I said if you want a different pronoun than just your name have the mods put it in your flair which got downvoted to hell but w/e.  That isn't transmisogynstic.  If I'm misunderstanding it than fine explain.  To assume that people must use they for everyone is beyond stupid.I couldn't care less.Not in comparison mate no offence.That isn't dehumanizing.  Certainly no more dehumanizing than simply dismissing others pov because they are white and male.I know of one person who wants they and them used.  They don't post here except to try to stir up drama.  If everyone was to suddenly want different pronouns used I would simply use names because frankly I'm not going to remember them.  It's also authoritarian to try to enforce it you can ask someone to do it but they don't have to.  To try to force them to is authoritarian.  I mean I tend to do it even though the one person who wants it is one of the few people I actually hate in this whole mess.K what he said was neutral in nature how he behaved was neutral but yeah I'll let you who has tried to use a mod getting threatened as ammo to tell me what he thinks.

The big part is there weren't established people if I make a post I can count on it hitting -3 or lower within a few hours because of the pathetic scrubs who follow my every word.  I already know I get chain reported because I've been told so.  RB is similar so aree a few others.  Way more frivolous reports and bs to deal with than the early days of AGG.How does it not logically follow? You are reducing someone down to their race and gender ignoring their life experiences.  Pretty sure that is the definition of dehumanizing.Just so you know being out of game for a minute is enough to lose lane at that level.  Not defending his behavior but a minute is a long time at that level.Isn't it anyone who has played for 2 years in a region can declare that as their home region now?  Including going forward.Only way that would make sense would be if Balls was stepping down and we were going after say Flame, I don't see that happening.I mean lyte didWhat she did went beyond just cheating.  It's sociopathic level behavior cheating has some elements of that.  But what she did went far beyond just cheating.  She did have an actual twisted game it's the only thing that tailors with her behavior.Yeah I've heard that one as well.  The thing that goes against it is how much of the story doesn't involve Cameron.  If that was True we would expect that the scenes without Cam would be far less emphasized.  It's an interesting theory though.What part? Well it depends how you define childhood.  Personally I had way worse shit happen to me.  But from the age of say 2 to 10 it's quite possible that could be one of the worst moments they remember.I mean what is he supposed to do.  1 v entire team all he can do is wait for baron to get low and try to flash tibbers it.  Says nothing about his laning ability or for that matter teamfighting.Unless Balls is stepping down and we are picking up someone like say Flame god I hope not.Perhapes you should learn them.  Most people who would be considered liberal don't want to control speech or limit artistic expression.  I know that is a crazy thought.  Also games have been continuously changing and not just in terms of tech.  The reason tech is important is it effects what stories we can tell.

Also it's not it's a very common idea in sci fi especially stuff like anime.  SAO Accel World Log Horizon ect.

The current limitation as far as vr is we can't just read brain signals.  As such a huge open area is needed for any non stationary vr program or a specialized treadmill type device that holds one in place.  That is incredibly expensive though.  So the logical step is eventually to jack directly into the brain or full dive to use SAO speak.geez medical resident or just insomnia?Shh don't say that Reddit doesn't like it when you say Rek is just a better Cop with a way better team around him.Because he is fucking cop.Lol no not at all.

Tier 1 - Sneaky, LiftLift, Forg1ven Niels, MAYBE Freeze need to see what he does with a real team

Tier 2 - Hjarn, Piglet, Rek, Altec, WT - Though he can vary wildly from Tier 1 skill level to sub t3.

Tier 3 and below the rest.

This is for west only obv not including the east.not opposed to new ideas or ways of behaving that are not traditional or widely accepted

Pretty sure that fits with what I said.

Also you should look at some of the stuff in old sci fi that we now have sometime.  I find it hilarious that you consider yourself progressive yet deride people for enjoying anime btw.Actually I grabbed it from webster.  

Full VR is not fantastical at all.  Hell surgeons now essentially use games to operate in some of the higher end medical centers.  Machines are simply safer and can basically be paused if need be.  That would have been unthinkable even 10 years ago.  SpaceX uses projections that can be manipulated in real time just like the iron man movies again something that was pure fantasy even 5 years ago.  Within the next 20 years more than likely we will be able to jack directly into the brain via rather invasive means and within the next 20 it will miniaturize like tech always does.  That isn't fantastical at all it follows the amazing advances we are constantly making.  Believe it or not I can be excited about what run away tech budgets will allow us to do even if people don't have computers in third world countries.  

Hell just think about lasik we are using lasers in order to correct vision problems that is insane yet it's something people now take for granted.  Also weeaboo was absolutely intended to be derogatory don't bullshit please.got nerfed to hell :( I miss 2 shot silver bolts :(That isn't a lie Rek = Cop get over it.Cop was by no means a bad adc he just wasn't going to pull off shit like dlift does occasionally.  He would stay safe and deal damage from the backline and had great KDAs even when curse sucked.I never said gamers were oppressed.  I can't do shit about the third world what I can do is hope that as tech increases quicker and quicker we can gain the ability to distribute food there which is the big issue.  We have plenty of food the issue is distribution before it goes bad.Look at how many women run and compare it to how many get elected.   Than do the same thing for men I guarantee you a lower percentage of those who run who are male get elected.I said total number of men who run this includes those who don't win.I'd like you to use logic for once a lot more men run than woman in general.  If a woman runs it tends to be highlighted I am including more than just the winners here.Cheese curds if you don't know what they are look em up they are the greatest pub food ever.  Also to stay afloat you are likely going to have to do more than just league look into stuff like CSGO and others or else even during lcs you will only have content every so often.Check out some of the flavored zero cal waters.   Vita ICE is a good one I'm sure there are others as well but it's a great alternative to soda if people are trying to watch caloric intake as well as sugar for that matter.Just a thought but you could do a set replay time assuming people weren't watching them live.You tend to charge for console time or people can buy a pass for a day a month or even a year.  Yeah I totally don't want woman in gaming after all why would I want a gf who actually shared my interests.  Nah I would much rather have one who hates that I work making those damn kids games and come home and play more.

Do you have any idea how ludicrous you sound?  

I don't pray to shit the issue is one of distribution we have more than enough food and waste a ton.  The issue is it's not economically viable to send say all the burgers that are wasted at the end of the day to africa.Honestly it's simply logic.  Look at how many men enter even say an election for mayor lets say 8 conservatively and there might be one or even two women.  Even if a Woman only wins every 6th election there is still a higher percentage getting elected relative to how many are trying to elected.Keep up Scar it's now R + L = J &amp; MNiels goes above Rek and really above everyone but sneaky and maybe DL.  I don't give a damn about history I care about level now.Now this is quality BSReckful got banned for sharing because he was essentially boosting his friends.If you don't want a secondary market have an open beta.  I guarantee anyone with the money to burn is in beta by now.Why would I be ranking them on a time other than today?  Also rek has never been tier 1.So trust fund?  Or how the hell can they afford to go non paying job to non paying job.Well yeah but if they don't want a secondary market for beta they need to let people in.  For league yeah diamond accounts ect sell for Overwatch that isn't really an issue yet.This I know but the way he is making it sound sounds more like an unpaid intern not immediately getting promoted to salaried idk.Wow that got weird lolAh k was just curious ty for answering.No mention of Brett Favre 0/10I mean guys tend to not mind being told we are hot /shrughttps://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cJo8JIkqKHA

Seems to be asking about sexual desirability right there.

Or you could just google Eddy Lacy FatYou do realize OP's video is fake right?You realize there are links of nhl all stars getting asked the exact same question in this thread right?Do you understand what misogyny actually means?  It isn't a 20 dollar word for sexism.  It means hatred of women much like misandry means hatred of men.Uh the outcome would not be good.  That would literally be the death of women's sports completely.  The Woman's national team tends to train against the U17 and top high school teams and they often get smoked.Maybe the U17 the pro level wouldn't even be funny.I would love to get Hauntzer but I don't think Balls is going to step down.During champ select in the lcs just throw a fit toss the keyboard into the crowd and walk out.https://www.reddit.com/r/FanTheories/comments/2usu70/

This one is in the same style about basically all the Simpson's post April Fool's in season 6 being Homer in coma which is when they went really far off the reservation.How is it breaking the rules as long as they are on their own account?  I have absolutely duoed with lower friends to get them gold on my smurfs.  They were playing on their own account andi was on my own.Still not against the rules.  The rules are account sharing hence why I disbelieve they will do anything about Duo q.It's not as horrific for your teeth and doesn't have the added stuff that just makes you thirstier.Too much wave clear in your opponents.Very few of the people who will be pros in OW have beta right now outside of former TF2 pros.I would bet it was Coast tbh.  Not C9.  Coast supposedly now has a billionaire owner.Geez you want an essay a fifth as long as the story.  Any hints on the prize so we can decide if it's worth?I came from disadvantaged as hell circumstances yet I still managed to crawl out.  Yes after 4 years at a roughly equal level with everyone but the super rich hiring should be done on a meritocratic basis.There are hierarchies.  If they weren't half the reason humanity has to push would be gone.  Yeah there are some people who would still work but if there was no hierarchy a lot of people would lose their drive.  That is assuming you could stop corruption which has never successfully been done. The Duluth model makes me incredibly angry sigh.A lot of current media especially in games journalism comes from SA/weird twitter it's actually rather interesting.Very few men ever see themselves as being a CEO or MP also.  You are complaining about literally .01% if not lower.9/11 was a huge tipping point in our country.  Both in terms of level of religiousness and restriction of speech.  What's interesting is while atheism/agnostic numbers have risen an incredible amount so to has attempted restriction of speech which seem to be things that shouldn't go together.I'm quite educated in what feminism is currently pushing and I'm not a fan.  Feminism promotes the usage of the fucked up duluth model, terms such as microaggressions, and stifling of speech.  That isn't a good thing.I wouldn't consider that something feminism is currently pushing sorry.Can confirm I know some people who use a mod for elise that change her skin.

http://leaguecraft.com/skins/15301-waldgeist-s-spider-free-elise-mod.xhtml

Great custom skin and Riot has said they are fine with it.That's still a money issue there is a reason modding tools are a stretch goal on kickstarters.Yes this is a pet peeve of mine.  Cutscenes need to be skippalbe but not accidentally it should be a 2 separate button or key combo.Transmog is a thing in most mmos.  Some use that wear boobplate others like myself use it to wear full t3 with face of death and hungering cold :D? Wearing full t3 or t6 doesn't change you into a dude.  Always disable helmet.  I like looking like an actual warrior but I tend to play female characters because I hate male anatomical proportions and giant shoulders in most mmos.

http://wow.zamimg.com/modelviewer/transmog/1/1/688.png - T3 warrior

http://www.wowczsite.net/image/gallery/t3_mage_human-female.jpg - T3 Mage

http://media.wow-europe.com/shared/wow-com/images/basics/armorsets/tier6raid/warlock/human-female.jpg - T6 warlock

http://www.wowtransmog.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/08/warriortier62.png - T6 warrior

What mmos have you played?  I'm linking Wow I know it's in wildstar ff14 as well.  Transmog is basically costuming gear so it has a different appearance.It's like putting on the Vader helmet it's so wrong :(Bro C9 welcomes all let your faith be restored.We need Rush more than aphro tbh.To coach he goes :DSneaky Niels Fury Bang Imp Uzi DLift Freeze NL Pray Forg1ven OhQ I'm so fucking ready for worlds next year hopefully ADCs aren't nerfed to shit before then.GET THE FUCK AWAY FROM HAIMOBAs I would argue are the new form of RTS where you simply control a single unit and are much easier to get into.  They are flourishing and are entirely ludocentric.  DOTA 2 League Smite even HoTS are enjoying massive success.1. Yes
2. Yes
3. There are attempts yes.  However the most popular games currently are heavily ludocentric even including the casual market games like angry birds have no story.  So w/e their attempts it isn't going to change.  
4. Absolutely.  I consider Gone Home not to be a game due to the lack of a failure state.  That isn't why I think it's bad though. I enjoy plenty of not games I just have issues with gaping plot holes when literally all you have is story.1. Call of Duty: Advanced Warfare (360, XBO, PS4, PS3, PC)
2. Madden NFL 15 (360, PS4, XBO, PS3)
3. Destiny (XBO, PS4, 360, PS3)
4. Grand Theft Auto V (PS4, XBO, 360, PS3)
5. Minecraft (360, PS3, XBO, PS4)
6. Super Smash Bros. (3DS, NWU)
7. NBA 2K15 (PS4, XBO, 360, PS3, PC)
8. Watch Dogs (PS4, XBO, 360, PS3, PC, NWU)
9. FIFA 15 (360, PS4, XBO, PS3, Wii, 3DS, PSV)
10. Call of Duty: Ghosts (360, PS3, XBO, PS4, NWU, PC)

Here is a hint every single one of those games but two are selling almost entirely due to multiplayer.  Trust me very few people buy CoD for the story.  The only two that are arguable are GTA V and Watchdogs.   Also the list is inherently flawed.  It's based off of buying the game the largest game right now is free but allows cosmetic spending for skins ie league.  CSGO as well incredibly cheap to buy into but they make money hand over fist via crates.League is a huge example of example of this in fact the moba genre in general is.Lack of a failure mechanic.No it isn't.  A failure mechanic in this type of game would be like hitchhiker where if you fucked up certain things it was literally impossible to finish.  Or simply the ability to die which is far more common.The Church of Sneaky is currently accepting new converts.I mean it was the TSM announce as well ....That's like changing from the Sox to the Yankees why not come to the church of Sneaky instead.Thats why I want Rush jungle over Aphro support if possible.  Hai can teach and direct and he already is very used to warding.top fucking kek.No telltale games have flat out fuck this up and die with qtes.I don't believe there is that law for woman there might be one saying 10% must be women so theoretically it could be 100% women if people were inclined to vote for the policies of however many who happened to be female.I have a rather non American sounding name and that is as much as I will say.Uh The best 3-4 team really now?You can be raped without penetration ....No it doesn't.  Rape means being forced to have sex against your will whether it's forced enveloping or forced penetration.No it's not semantics your definition says females can't rape.When a definition says one gender can not rape that is not a semantics issue.  It also isn't a semantics issue in the US.  One of my best friends was raped in college and pretty much told they couldn't do anything because it was a girl who raped him.  He was near blackout drunk and forcefully enveloped.  If this is a girl we are talking about a campus wide manhunt.Good thing that isn't what I do.We also have Russell Wilson, Michael Bennett, Earl Thomas, Beast, Kam, Sherm, Bwagz, Graham, AvrilYou can drown :Dwhich is fucked.not necessarily.  Say a woman forces a guy to go down on her with a gun no penetration involved.  Also penetration is in reference to recieving penetration not being forced to penetrate.  I agree it's fucked but currently envelopment is not considered rape.Currently it doesn't sadly it's considered aggravated sexual misconduct or some bs and carries a much lower sentence than rape.An attractive young white girl who recalls being raped against her will while blackout drunk.  Yes there would be a campus wide manhunt.  Hell look at the shit that has happened even when there most likely wasn't rape.  The vast majority of the time when cases aren't prosecuted it's because the victim can't identify their attacker or their attack is in sports.  While that is fucked up as hell it's radically different from what you said.How about the ones trying to justify why envelopement isn't rape sighActually there is forced envelopement is considered aggravated sexual assualt not rape in most of the USIt's rather hilarious when you have to dig through comments to try to discredit someone.  Insufficent evidence aka lack of physical evidence and unable to positively identify attacker.  IE what I said.You haven't intellectually curbstomped me in any regard.  I doubt you have the intellect to curbstomp anyone out of high school tbh.  It's good that you can dismiss males not be able to receive justice after being raped as KiA circlejerking though simply validates that selective justice is indeed a good term for SJWs rather than social justice.I mean could be Mata :P then Hai could retire after this split once Mata gets used to shotcalling in English.Like I said 4 years at college pretty much everyone except the super rich kids are on roughly the same level.  We are all dirt poor working crappy jobs and in debt up to our heads.Uh no S1 doesn't count because it was NA EU and SEA in Phreak's Mom's basement.  No KR no CN.It's about as relevant as a "study" in a tiny localized area.Didn't go to good schools in youth dealt with racism kids who were both black and white do at a 50/50 school.  Did have extra curricular activities but didn't have shit for role models.Blizzard hasn't or Valve or for that matter Activision, Nintendo?  All of those are pretty damn old and all have created successful esports to various degrees not on the level of league except for SC but absolutely successful.
So uh is Bitino up for sale?Sound like you guys are completely blowing up your team tbh.  I mean you have two of the best oline in the league on your trade block.To be fair they wouldn't be wrong quite a few of the streamers invited already moved back to their primary games.what fresh bullshit is this nfl sighOh fuck off he took multiple stepsGood thing it doesn't.  In fact I would have to say when women actually run they tend to have a higher chance of getting elected then men because people actually subscribe to your warped way of thinking.I mean I'm never seen a lateral to a ghost not called a fumble so it's kind of new.Yup and that should have been a catch.I've complained that it shows she is attacking con goers and midnight release attendees I have no objection to plush mushroom hats.  I do have an objection to attacking those who wear them.  But good try at at a twist.

Also she is in the journalism equivalent of siberia now so her employers apparently agreed.BothWTF LOCKThey were both catches.  You just don't care about this one because it benefits you,seriously this is fucking absurd.Does it feel to anyone else like football is just there to interrupt commercials now?Offworld is Siberia literally nobody but your group gives a fuck about anything that comes out of it.  Who cares who owns it the site itself is a fucking joke.Damn close one :(FFS TOO MANY FUCKING COMMERICALS GAHRemote area that problems were exiled to in order to keep them out of the public eye and punish them for stepping out of line.  Sounds pretty damn accurate.I don't give a fuck if you sleep with 50 thousand other people.  I do give a fuck when you can't be bothered to break up with someone before fucking someone else especially when you then proceed to have sex with the person you are supposedly with after.  Frankly it's fucked up as all hell to do that just break up you obviously don't love them since you are willing to fuck someone else; so break up.Uh no they aren't link source from SPLC specifically denoting GG as a hate group.  As for the FBI they specifically said that USU was not credible.You mean like ghazi making a safe space thread for a predator?  Or how apparently every single post not topic but post on ghazi has to be moderator approved now post that thread.  Sure seems a lot like trying to restrict speech to a specific view.  Which sounds really weird for a group that is supposedly liberal.I like the term someone used called selective justice saying social justice is flat out wrong because they only care about "justice" for their friends and clique.Happened during relationship shoo.  If you don't like someone enough to not fuck others then break up it's really not hard.  Exceptions obviously being an open relationship.So uh get him to take vet min Megatron with Graham and an actual line that could be fun.  You got Tate from us after all :D16 more qbs to add to the Cleveland graveyard why not.Seattle was like that a long time even the Kingdome pretty much always sold out just now we actually have a contender to route for.  I wouldn't mind seeing Cleveland just randomly hit on a QB and make the Stealers cry for the next decade.Happened during on phases as well at least 3 times shooMost of them played it for a day and went back.  I think people would be a lot more understanding if it was mainly csgo and tf2 pros.If streamers are playing games they are streaming.  It makes no sense not to it's a direct opportunity cost for them to play games and not stream.Or I care about scumbags who cheat.Uh yes they did I can't link it because of rule 5 but they absolutely did.Even if you don't interact with the audience and are just bullshiting on skype with friends it still makes sense to be streaming.Yeah I wasn't even thinking about SC2 I was thinking about broodwar WC3 you know what kind of got esports huge especially brood war.  It's a huge reason why SK dominates league they already have the structure from broodwar days.People who cheat are scum can we agree on this yes or no.Please can we hold onto this one please.I have things I'm far more worried about than ZQ as far as GG goes.  I'm just baffled as to why people would defend an emotional abuser and say she did nothing wrong.1 more play please pleaseYeah he was looking around going no whistle guess I should get in :(We won so I'm okay but we did not look good doing it ugh.&gt; I'm just baffled as to why people would defend an emotional abuser and say she did nothing wrong.

Nearly as baffled as when people create safe space threads for predators nearly.Nyberg.Source SPLC link it.How is that creepy?  I despise people who cheat I don't care if I know them personally I consider them scum.  Also I wasn't the one who brought up ZQ I simply said if you want to fuck someone else then break up in response to claiming that infidelity shaming = slut shaming.  If you aren't in a relationship fuck whoever the fuck you want.  If you are than break up before fucking someone else it isn't hard.  You obviously aren't that interested in a relationship anyway if you want to fuck someone else.Uh the IRS doesn't give a shit about PR they know they are hated.I have an intense reaction to cheating because I both have been cheated on and know others who have as well.  Much like I have an intense reaction to male rape being downplayed because one of my best friends was raped by a female.No you are acting completely irrationally because you want to downplay how fucked up cheating is since someone is doing that you like.Linking pictures of their 8 year old cousin in a two piece goes beyond just doing gross shit.I have a strong reaction because I know what it felt like to be cheated on and that was nothing like the games that were played with EG.  That shit was actually twisted.The one your RB cleary caught then lateraled to a ghost while attempting to switch hands.I just find it incredibly disturbing that people are willing to overlook actions of a heinous nature.  Simply because someone sides with them on the ultimate first world problem.10 is best :DI don't give a fuck what Milo had to say I looked at the logs Milo posting them after doesn't somehow discredit him no matter how much I may dislike him.I have no idea what Milo writes because just like poly I expect it to be stupidly biased.  I actually looked through the logs myself to confirm what people were saying.No I would prefer people acted empathic rather than sociopathically.  Doesn't mean I want to ban it.  Also how it being an authoritarian and sex negative puritan to not care what people do either outside a relationship or in an open one but simply not to want them to hurt their SO more and simply break up first?He is making fun of the people who say Sherm can't shadow a number one not detrimental towards Dez at all I believe.I want them to crash hard and for Frost to somehow get fired and be our new OC :(Actually it has a high degree of relevance.  One of the things that gg posits is that certain games are being pushed due to politics of either the game or the creator rather than merit.  if people are willing to overlook such horrific things as predatory behavior in regards to children, that lends credence to the idea they may do something far less insane for politics such as pushing certain games regardless of merit.I mean at least you have hope.  Unless we make major changes to the line we are going to finish around 500 not high enough for a good pick and we wouldn't use it on oline anyway.  Instead we will draft a dlinmen and try to convert them to Oline sob.Just curious if I'm part of this list since I know I'm rather blunt and at times can go rather doggedly at a point when others don't want to.3rdPerhaps we should move to WCO :(So Turtle is not going to try for either jungle or support for sure then?I had never heard of it before /shrug.  I can only thing of about 7 who I think have zero interest in discussion.yeah maybe idkYeah it's real fun to watch a region where one team is head and shoulders above the others :PI never said Dez didn't catch it?  I found that to be a fucking travesty of a call.I didn't speculate on anyone's mental condition.  It shows sociopathic tendencies to cheat sorry.  Doesn't matter who is doing it.  To cheat one tends to need to not give a fuck about how their SO feels.People got tired of fencing on a tilted field dealing with constant shit posting and mods who would actually attack them in mod mail you mean?I wouldn't say it's tribalism at least for myself I will absolutely call out the behavior of certain pGG personalities.  I watch others do the same as well I can't speak for antis but at least here it seems like pros have no issue with calling out other pros.fuck noSo where am I?No head mods just get burned out Shoden I don't have an issue with if he brings on someone like Hokes though I will jet the fuck out.  I miss Bill I wish we had a neutral that could be head mod.Except it doesn't at all and the person you are referring to is anti since I have seen them spam that idiocy multiple times.No the dumbest shit ever is expecting people to know other's pronouns and getting bent out of shape when they don't.  If you want your pronoun used get it put in your flair.We went through what 4 head mods in aGG and that was frankly when gg was a lot smaller.  There also weren't established people who would get spam reported at that time.

Bill was the closest to a True neutral in AGG or at least that is how he posted whether he actually felt that way idk.  Choob had a noticable anti lean.Unless both parties agree to an open relationship you are obviously not interested in a relationship if you fuck someone else during. Yeah I was asking in terms of reports and you aren't a mod here.Let me tell them you they don't even have to be Oline.  Dline and TEs work just as well /s God I hate Cable.27 autos even at 2.5 attacks per second is still 10.8 seconds and that's if you can stand still and never miss an aa that is an eternity in a team fight.A cuckhold is someone who gets off on it.  I despise people who cheat whether men or women it's scummy and shitty to do.  Just fucking break up if you want to fuck other people.Yes to the first one no idea to the second one.Nah I'm not talking about Jimmy one of our starting Tackles was a TE in college.Are you still going to be coast or becoming Sacremento Kings?Was making a joke relax mate.Bengi isn't a carry jungle he is a supportive jungle.Tbh I would much rather live in Cali than CNMore importantly Hai can teach Rush since he likely wants to eventually retire.  Then we can look into getting a heavy mechanical support once Rush is good to roll solo.They should talk to whomever makes hockey masks.  Those are comfy maybe they should look into using hockey style masks that lock in place. College level not pro.Hm kind of hoping this is real at this point.TBH only way I'll be down for Force Awakens is if this fan theory ends up being True.  I still have mega salt at Heir being invalidated.  I consider the Heir trilogy to be on par with the OT.  I really wanted it to be the next set of movies if they ever made them.  I mean I'll still see it I'm just less hyped than most, because I saw Abrams latest attempt at sci fi :(The first one I've heard, never heard the second but that is a rather interesting thought.

On the subject of HP fan stuff ever seen this one?

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OGHBwk0quxs

The production values are actually pretty darn good.Does Slack take down ip info like most irc clients?  Just being paranoid as usual.What's your Btag after all there must always be watchers; so you can't be allowed to have beta.  Sorry :(The number of nopes currently in the world is not high enough for me express how many nopes are needed.Yeah just reading the url not clicking that.For fucks sake PL there are 700k trans people in the US I will even go up to a million.  To expect people to use they/them for everyone is utterly ludicrous.  Hence why I said if you want a different pronoun than just your name have the mods put it in your flair which got downvoted to hell but w/e.  That isn't transmisogynstic.  If I'm misunderstanding it than fine explain.  To assume that people must use they for everyone is beyond stupid.I couldn't care less.Not in comparison mate no offence.That isn't dehumanizing.  Certainly no more dehumanizing than simply dismissing others pov because they are white and male.I know of one person who wants they and them used.  They don't post here except to try to stir up drama.  If everyone was to suddenly want different pronouns used I would simply use names because frankly I'm not going to remember them.  It's also authoritarian to try to enforce it you can ask someone to do it but they don't have to.  To try to force them to is authoritarian.  I mean I tend to do it even though the one person who wants it is one of the few people I actually hate in this whole mess.K what he said was neutral in nature how he behaved was neutral but yeah I'll let you who has tried to use a mod getting threatened as ammo to tell me what he thinks.

The big part is there weren't established people if I make a post I can count on it hitting -3 or lower within a few hours because of the pathetic scrubs who follow my every word.  I already know I get chain reported because I've been told so.  RB is similar so aree a few others.  Way more frivolous reports and bs to deal with than the early days of AGG.How does it not logically follow? You are reducing someone down to their race and gender ignoring their life experiences.  Pretty sure that is the definition of dehumanizing.Just so you know being out of game for a minute is enough to lose lane at that level.  Not defending his behavior but a minute is a long time at that level.Isn't it anyone who has played for 2 years in a region can declare that as their home region now?  Including going forward.Only way that would make sense would be if Balls was stepping down and we were going after say Flame, I don't see that happening.I mean lyte didWhat she did went beyond just cheating.  It's sociopathic level behavior cheating has some elements of that.  But what she did went far beyond just cheating.  She did have an actual twisted game it's the only thing that tailors with her behavior.Yeah I've heard that one as well.  The thing that goes against it is how much of the story doesn't involve Cameron.  If that was True we would expect that the scenes without Cam would be far less emphasized.  It's an interesting theory though.What part? Well it depends how you define childhood.  Personally I had way worse shit happen to me.  But from the age of say 2 to 10 it's quite possible that could be one of the worst moments they remember.I mean what is he supposed to do.  1 v entire team all he can do is wait for baron to get low and try to flash tibbers it.  Says nothing about his laning ability or for that matter teamfighting.Unless Balls is stepping down and we are picking up someone like say Flame god I hope not.Perhapes you should learn them.  Most people who would be considered liberal don't want to control speech or limit artistic expression.  I know that is a crazy thought.  Also games have been continuously changing and not just in terms of tech.  The reason tech is important is it effects what stories we can tell.

Also it's not it's a very common idea in sci fi especially stuff like anime.  SAO Accel World Log Horizon ect.

The current limitation as far as vr is we can't just read brain signals.  As such a huge open area is needed for any non stationary vr program or a specialized treadmill type device that holds one in place.  That is incredibly expensive though.  So the logical step is eventually to jack directly into the brain or full dive to use SAO speak.geez medical resident or just insomnia?Shh don't say that Reddit doesn't like it when you say Rek is just a better Cop with a way better team around him.Because he is fucking cop.Lol no not at all.

Tier 1 - Sneaky, LiftLift, Forg1ven Niels, MAYBE Freeze need to see what he does with a real team

Tier 2 - Hjarn, Piglet, Rek, Altec, WT - Though he can vary wildly from Tier 1 skill level to sub t3.

Tier 3 and below the rest.

This is for west only obv not including the east.not opposed to new ideas or ways of behaving that are not traditional or widely accepted

Pretty sure that fits with what I said.

Also you should look at some of the stuff in old sci fi that we now have sometime.  I find it hilarious that you consider yourself progressive yet deride people for enjoying anime btw.Actually I grabbed it from webster.  

Full VR is not fantastical at all.  Hell surgeons now essentially use games to operate in some of the higher end medical centers.  Machines are simply safer and can basically be paused if need be.  That would have been unthinkable even 10 years ago.  SpaceX uses projections that can be manipulated in real time just like the iron man movies again something that was pure fantasy even 5 years ago.  Within the next 20 years more than likely we will be able to jack directly into the brain via rather invasive means and within the next 20 it will miniaturize like tech always does.  That isn't fantastical at all it follows the amazing advances we are constantly making.  Believe it or not I can be excited about what run away tech budgets will allow us to do even if people don't have computers in third world countries.  

Hell just think about lasik we are using lasers in order to correct vision problems that is insane yet it's something people now take for granted.  Also weeaboo was absolutely intended to be derogatory don't bullshit please.got nerfed to hell :( I miss 2 shot silver bolts :(That isn't a lie Rek = Cop get over it.Cop was by no means a bad adc he just wasn't going to pull off shit like dlift does occasionally.  He would stay safe and deal damage from the backline and had great KDAs even when curse sucked.I never said gamers were oppressed.  I can't do shit about the third world what I can do is hope that as tech increases quicker and quicker we can gain the ability to distribute food there which is the big issue.  We have plenty of food the issue is distribution before it goes bad.Look at how many women run and compare it to how many get elected.   Than do the same thing for men I guarantee you a lower percentage of those who run who are male get elected.I said total number of men who run this includes those who don't win.I'd like you to use logic for once a lot more men run than woman in general.  If a woman runs it tends to be highlighted I am including more than just the winners here.Cheese curds if you don't know what they are look em up they are the greatest pub food ever.  Also to stay afloat you are likely going to have to do more than just league look into stuff like CSGO and others or else even during lcs you will only have content every so often.Check out some of the flavored zero cal waters.   Vita ICE is a good one I'm sure there are others as well but it's a great alternative to soda if people are trying to watch caloric intake as well as sugar for that matter.Just a thought but you could do a set replay time assuming people weren't watching them live.You tend to charge for console time or people can buy a pass for a day a month or even a year.  Yeah I totally don't want woman in gaming after all why would I want a gf who actually shared my interests.  Nah I would much rather have one who hates that I work making those damn kids games and come home and play more.

Do you have any idea how ludicrous you sound?  

I don't pray to shit the issue is one of distribution we have more than enough food and waste a ton.  The issue is it's not economically viable to send say all the burgers that are wasted at the end of the day to africa.Honestly it's simply logic.  Look at how many men enter even say an election for mayor lets say 8 conservatively and there might be one or even two women.  Even if a Woman only wins every 6th election there is still a higher percentage getting elected relative to how many are trying to elected.Keep up Scar it's now R + L = J &amp; MNiels goes above Rek and really above everyone but sneaky and maybe DL.  I don't give a damn about history I care about level now.Now this is quality BSReckful got banned for sharing because he was essentially boosting his friends.If you don't want a secondary market have an open beta.  I guarantee anyone with the money to burn is in beta by now.Why would I be ranking them on a time other than today?  Also rek has never been tier 1.So trust fund?  Or how the hell can they afford to go non paying job to non paying job.Well yeah but if they don't want a secondary market for beta they need to let people in.  For league yeah diamond accounts ect sell for Overwatch that isn't really an issue yet.This I know but the way he is making it sound sounds more like an unpaid intern not immediately getting promoted to salaried idk.Wow that got weird lolAh k was just curious ty for answering.No mention of Brett Favre 0/10I mean guys tend to not mind being told we are hot /shrughttps://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cJo8JIkqKHA

Seems to be asking about sexual desirability right there.

Or you could just google Eddy Lacy FatYou do realize OP's video is fake right?You realize there are links of nhl all stars getting asked the exact same question in this thread right?Do you understand what misogyny actually means?  It isn't a 20 dollar word for sexism.  It means hatred of women much like misandry means hatred of men.Uh the outcome would not be good.  That would literally be the death of women's sports completely.  The Woman's national team tends to train against the U17 and top high school teams and they often get smoked.Maybe the U17 the pro level wouldn't even be funny.I would love to get Hauntzer but I don't think Balls is going to step down.During champ select in the lcs just throw a fit toss the keyboard into the crowd and walk out.https://www.reddit.com/r/FanTheories/comments/2usu70/

This one is in the same style about basically all the Simpson's post April Fool's in season 6 being Homer in coma which is when they went really far off the reservation.How is it breaking the rules as long as they are on their own account?  I have absolutely duoed with lower friends to get them gold on my smurfs.  They were playing on their own account andi was on my own.Still not against the rules.  The rules are account sharing hence why I disbelieve they will do anything about Duo q.It's not as horrific for your teeth and doesn't have the added stuff that just makes you thirstier.Too much wave clear in your opponents.Very few of the people who will be pros in OW have beta right now outside of former TF2 pros.I would bet it was Coast tbh.  Not C9.  Coast supposedly now has a billionaire owner.sub 7 with jinx is absolutely possible.  I would bet the winner will be nearer to 6 then 7 or even lower.You tend to make friends with people you see consistently.You have to choose two roles ... Should let you do one just warn you that your q might be long.Hint none of the above for this challenge.At high elo you see a lot of the same people consistently.except if you go say adc/fill it could well put you in fill.  TBH I will likely duo with friends and we will just put our friends role as second so we will get those two roles and just swap if need be.See it's a win win we get our correct roles and we get to read scrubs making drama I need another donezo manifesto damn it.  Dyrus said he was going to but didn't follow through.Agreed I spam Cait Ashe and Jinx.  Sometimes Vayne most others adcs I'm not great on I don't know the numbers as well.That is not a compromise.  That's just accepting aGG as not being a group which doesn't work for one reason.  The entire reason it's pushed is aGG insists on tarring pGG with the actions of a few while saying those in their corner don't tar their side because they aren't a group.  Basically it's the hypocrisy if yall stopped trying to tar all of pGG with the actions of a few it wouldn't be an issue.

Also pGG has never been allowed to be defined by it's own terms including on this sub.pGG has at least 6 distinct factions that I can think of yet people insist on clumping it all into one.3 while in relationship 2 while out supposedly.  Also I do not have an alt.  I have heard very little condemnation of harper or nyberg for that matter I have watched people dance around and say it doesn't matter if you were a predator 10 years ago though.  In fact I've seen people do it on this very forum specifically /u/apinkgayelephant
 
Harper doesn't equal nyberg btw.  The dox was 4 years ago that harper did.

https://archive.is/HV3MM

Notice all the justification of it can't be removed from GG context despite it being 4 years ago.  Also the claims that a debt collector was illegally harassing her by doing their fucking job and as such the dox was justified

http://archive.is/UWLWGHow many subs does politics have.  Let's be honest politics is nearly entirely US and entirely liberal.To an extent it's not necessarily a "toxic brand" in my experience most I know who are in large part pro avoid taking a stance simply due to controversy.  You are always interviewing for your next job and all that.  So basically just avoid controversy so that you don't end up getting tossed to the bottom of the hr pile.  It's the same as taking a position on any controversy.  This one though comes with major risks of doxing whichever side you may be on.Far more anti meltdowns in the comments then have ever been linked of pros.The majority of people here agree with the concepts that are supposedly at the root of feminism.  Including myself; I and others just don't see that feminism is currently pushing for it's stated goal anymore.True I haven't started really working to get down my time and am sub 6 currently a lot of it is going to be finding sweet spots.Really?  You think the Ayy Team are the same as the people in KiA?Accusations aren't dodgy when there are literally gigabytes of proof.Well Hokes is the one who pushed rule 6.Look up Auerbach's guide to ending gamergate I would argue there are even more tbh but some have crossover.Auerbach, Liana K, Erik KainYou could judge individual members by their actions possibly.I was born into catholicism I am no longer catholic not really an excuse.  Now a legit excuse would be you can be fucking killed if you renounce Islam in certain cultures.  But again that seems more an indictment of Islam than anything else.Slut shaming still not equal to infidelity shaming hasn't changed in the past year.Honestly I don't get the fried chicken and watermelon thing.  Who the fuck doesn't like fried chicken and watermelon they are fucking awesome foods.How about we just don't fucking punch and be actually good people for once?You would have to be pretty pants on head stupid to think below a certain income level it isn't better to be born as a race class combo with far more access to scholarships.You aren't making equivalent comparisons.  The politics sub is a default and tends to eschew conservative views.  Why would someone sub to liberal when politics is already pretty much entirely liberal.There are plenty of anti ones usually involving trying to rationalize things that cannot be rationalized by intelligent people.Because a vision softly creeping

Left its seeds while I was sleeping

And the vision that was planted in my brain

Still remains

Within the sound of silence
Well I mean those interested did specifically have to check the beta box just to be a devil's advocate.I never said they were worse I said they were more numerous.The issue is that people who aren't signed up are getting it.  You had to actually check the box to be "signed up"Uh no she hasn't.  We have no idea if she has repeated them or not.  She attempted to avoid taking responsibility by claiming to be a teenage edgelord.  She never said shit about sharing photos of their cousin and essentially doxing them.  People knew who she was and she gave more than enough info in the logs for people to figure out who the fucking 8 year old girl whose pictures were being linked to them was.  Seriously she was linking pictures of an 8 year old in a 2 piece to who the fuck knows who and gave enough info for her to be doxed.  I'm just really glad nothing more that we know of happened but it absolutely could have which is fucking terrifying.

If I was to print out all the logs we are talking about a compendium about the size of war and fucking peace plenty of evidence.Not participate in creating a fucking safe space for a predator actually call out the bs ghazi is doing in that regard.Why not reach out to EG or people like Meow?You forgot AS who has also posted emails without blacking out senders.If they really want people give them say 3 to per game in those roles in a season that might be 2 skins maybe.Yes?I can just about guarantee that I had better SATS ACTS and just grades overall than 95% of the people on ghazi if not higher.  I still didn't go to college immediately I didn't get a crap ton of scholarships and I had just well run away basically the week after my senior year.  I ended up working a variety of crap jobs then going to school a few years later still working crappy jobs.  So yeah that is quite possible.

Not mention anyone posting on Reddit complaining about shit is more than likely more privileged than over 70% of the world if not more.  Yeah I was born in a rather shitty family but I wasn't born in one marked for death via genocide.  I wasn't born somewhere that due to my skin color any land my family owned would be taken away.  Course that would assume having land but I digress.  Yeah my family sucked but I was able to overcome it by working my ass off.  I have friends who went through the military to get their education.  I highly doubt very many in aGG did or they wouldn't say shit about privilege in the US after going to the Middle East and seeing actual misogyny.

Which might explain why they look at everything from the perspective of American cultural norms.Shibboleth is a great word you ever see the west wing episode using it?Despite my upbringing and what some may believe here I am absolutely an intellectual, so are many in pGG I would say it's more a clash between for the most part lower class and upper to middle class.Gaming is one of the cheaper hobbies you can have if you are only getting a few games a year and they are used.  Console once every 8 years at say 400 is 50 a year plus maybe 100.  How many hobbies can you spend only 150 a year on and still get an incredible number of hours out of.Newsflash Criminals who are working for mass murders are likely to be the kind of the people who would rape someone and enjoy it.Not that much since the person who posted the files basically directed them to what to look at.  After all it's not like more people have come coward from ffshrine and said she was serious and it was rather disgusting.  Nope not at all oh wait they have.It wasn't in the US it was in Canada.  Either way it's disgusting however I know what else was hosted on th e same server as the sjw wiki so I have a hard time believing things just happened to be found.  More importantly work to make the law more strict that is one area I will absolutely support.  As long as it isn't an attempt to fuck with things that don't involve people getting hurt like loli.  I don't like loli buti have no issue with it being made actual cp on the other hand is a fucking problem.Uh no they aren't.  These are bad fucking people.  Why don't I see you pitching a haircut for when tarantula literally raped nightwing?  That wasn't threats it just fucking happened.My browser archive add-on has Breibart and Ralph on it just in case I accidentally click a link to one or the other The issue is that is what a lot of people claim.It's not a one time thing.  Multiple males have been raped in comics and it's usually played off as a joke they have also been forever ect.Yeah no I really fucking don't need it.  I can guarantee I have overcome far more than the vast majority of people on here despite being a dreaded white male.  I have run away from home, am I on the asd spectrum though extremely high functioning and have various tics that go with that.  I also didn't have shit while growing up.  It's an idiotic read and is for people who for the most part have faced very little adversity in their lifes.  There are none at least none that are actually reliable.  The study that was trumpeted about high school kids was spread via twitter and had no checks to actually ensure the correct age range was filling it out.  In fact many people far over high school age were tweeting at the creators when they had issues.Uh that's a dox mate.  Also the emails she posted were not threats at all.Wtf are you talking about?  That's still 3 people while in relationship if you assume the other 2 were out of relationship.A lot more than one.  I do hate what Dan Olsen does I'm not trying to shut down a site because of one board I just want people to not fucking excuse a god damn predator.  It's like being a one issue voter except it's in regards to the ultimate first world problem.

I never said to shut down ghazi I said to not make a safe space for a fucking predator.Well no duh everything is caused by Darth Darth BinksNot unless Han and Leia are married and their kids got kidnapped or something.Mean he can come back in the cartoon that nobody actually knows about :Dneeds a lightsaber also not sinister enough.The entire point of the posters are the Rey Kylo and Fin ones.  Put Rey the middle and either on the bottom or top.  They line up too perfectly to not be intended.I didn't I never said to close ghazi I said to call them on their bs.If you want to fuck someone else while in a relationship just fucking breakup it's not that hard.  In fact it's really simple.  Hey honey I want this guy to fuck my brains out is it okay if we break up.  The guy will probably be quite happy about it in a few days.Again I've never claimed to be a victim I just find it fucking hilarious that check your privilege is often used to attempt to shut down lines of argument by middle to upper class people.Or you could just break up and be less of an asshole it really isn't hard and you are just going to hurt someone worse.Well actually it does if people watch their fucking map and don't give up more deaths.Holy crap are we 5?  If you can deal with somebody being harsh just mute all you can still see pings.He misgendered meow and has been around long enough to know that.No Jacen Jaina Anakin Zek Ben Lowbacca TK Tahiri Mara do not exist in disney's world because apparently heir wouldn't be a good enough trilogy.  Yes I have salt :(Kyle Corran and Mara as well as really the whole rogue squadron and academy series and the heir trilogy for me anyways.  Can do without the Vong.Redhead with large breasts who can outcode me and beat me in vidya would be the dream.  Also who loves fantasy novels.  What can  I say I like redheads also the lights on.  Yeah I'm rather vanilla compared to the rest of yall sorry.  Brunette also acceptable, frankly the outcode and beat me in vidya either or, are more important than breast size as well /shrug

edit: I screwed up I mean someone who is on my level not who consistently destroys me basically 50/50Does wanting someone who is smarter than me and can actually beat me at games count?I mean one can get better at sex and even vidya but intellect there tends to be an upper limit on.Yeah you have never lived in a 50/50 area I'm clear on that.&gt;But again that seems more an indictment of Islam than anything else.Hm should in the ideal world they get the number one pick and then have it taken away for failing to meet standards of competition or something and end up with nothing for their season.  Also we somehow still win the super bowl at levi plox.And SF will give Gabbert a 60 million dollar guaranteed 100 million overall deal for the next 5 years on the strength of that performance.  I like this plan.Team chaos needs to hit a lot of teams for us to somehow get homefield so I'm right there with ya.I would go with at least 6 I figure he should be good for one pick six.Uh just so you know he did it in mod mail as well.How about no.  Hokes has zero interest in debate and only wants to attack people they have even done it through modmails previously.  Their hypocrisy as far as enforcing and creating rules is a huge part of the reason this sub exists.Scar you should watch my voting totals sometime even in AGG they weren't this consistently nuked course I was never linked to BoOC before daring to compare current feminism toa religion.  That is what linking tends to lead to heavy vote manipulation.If you don't that's fine a lot of people on here spend a lot of time on ghazi.HoTS had dynamic q and eliminated it ...Casual gaming is exactly what I'm talking about?How hard is it to watch the map and actually ward :DThat's when people get pissed when people don't ward and overextend and die.  Or even worse have wards but don't look at their map while the jungler is sitting on one.HotS alpha was much easier to get into.Hides posts, unless people specifically expand them can also kill receiving replies when a top level post is downvoted to the bottom.  Same thing with brigading upwards.President of Earth - No betaNo it won't different teams will be working on the console port won't take any away from char and level design.It's also extremely unlikely PL.  I got a job in AAA due to my internship work so the number of people in my age bracket who are better than me is frankly small.  Then you further subdivide by people who are actually better than me at vidya.  Multiple world firsts Diamond season 1 league stupid high mmr 48 in halo 2 before I got sick of modem idiots ect.  

I mean someone who could keep up with me and actually beat me say half the time.  For someone to flat out be better than me at games we are talking pro level.  I didn't phrase it right I guess someone who wouldn't just get stomped I guess and could actually play with me if that makes sense.8.6 is impressive period, and 5.6 is impressive for bronze.True, but if you push right that isn't as an issue.  His KDAs are all also high I don't get how he is still in b5 honestly.I do not understand this reference?See that is why I hate people who lie and scam others.  They make someone just a bit more reluctant to help out next time and if it happens again and again well :(Uh not at all.  I just want someone who can actually beat me at vidya every so often.  Uh boxers, no thank you.  I really don't want to think about that damage.Are you sure that isn't Phara?Yeah I phrased it wrong I want someone who can actually play and code at the same level of me and yes it's night impossible :(  I would settle for a cute girl who likes Tolkien and games though and is intelligent of course :PThere is a big empty chunk on the main stage for one hour after the opening ceremony just saying /shrugSee this is why you buy online also you shouldn't buy now.  They will be 350 at the end of the month at a few different places including online.Maybe it includes overwatch beta :PI mean I got into HotS alpha after buying the online stream sooooooNow see this could actually be interesting a reboot with humans is just so blase.Nah bro play smash for the next hour of the movie and they get the 5 gods of melee to play the parts.  Now that I would watch.Plus Gravity also had Clooney Sherlock movies he hasn't done much outside that and marvel because he is in so many marvel movies.  Also tropic thunder.  The thing is iron man was a 3rd tier super hero he wasn't batman before RDJ got ahold of him and is now one of the most popular super heroes in the world which is why he gets paid megabucks.Sorry spam downvoting doesn't disprove what I said.For fucks sake can you stop lying for once?  I said Bailey Jay was not identifying as trans when she was using the trap moniker.  She dropped as soon as she came out as trans.  You can cross dress without being trans shockingly enough.Yes because I haven't remarked on other statiscal anomalies /s. Get over yourself and use they not hard.  It would be incredibly unlikely for all 4 to be either male or female.Or when aGG runs off to BoOC or ghazi or even AGG to cry ;)Someone should link the no button here I'm on phone sadlyI had a much simpler reaction just never trust ea again.Not really at least not on the major sites pc viewpoints and feminism in particular are pushed pretty much to the exclusion of all else.Look up Darth Darth Binks I want it to be real so badly.The term you are searching for is zombielike.  Zero emotion and monotone might as well have Hawking's machine reading off a script most of the time.It's totally left wing to try to censor speech /sThe issue I have is they promoted a freaking quest giver because trans.  They didn't even delve into any of the struggles a trans person would face in Victorian England either.  If you aren't specifically dealing with challenges faced, most trans people I know tend to prefer people just think of them as the gender they present as.  It's not something that you tend to just get told.It's actually a fan theory about Jar Jar originally being the main Villain and a with lord.  There isn't much phantom like about Palpetine after all we already know about him.  The blowback against him was so bad though that Lucas scrapped the idea.  The thought is that Snoke might be Jar Jar as he was intended to be though.I don't I'm not a fan of ODN beyond Gawker which openly violates the ToS of AdSense consistently.Or AS or Wu who have both screenshots threats within seconds of recovering them with no search open and without being logged in ;)What sells better woman are under attack by those evil gamers who are responsible for shootings, or there are ethical concerns of cronyism in enthusiast journalism.  One will draw people who don't give a shit about games others do notYes she is.  If you think video games cause misogyny you are an extremist.  For them to reinforce people would already have to hate women most don't honest.You still don't seem to know what misogyny means sigh.Uh yes she does.  Claiming that games cause misogyny is completely baseless.  Also she wants to ban certain things from vidya see her cry over dying light.Citation strongly fucking needed that isn't Ayy team trying and failing to troll.That isn't made up Google it.  Look at the screenshots she posted and the timestamps on them.She said reinforce for it reinforce people would have to hate women in the first placeThat isn't an assumption that is the definition.  People trying to make it a 20 dollar word for sexism doesn't make it so.

Also to reinforce something it has to be there in the first place.https://i.imgur.com/p6eaary.jpgWell I mean they didn't say when people would get in beta just that they would.  Don't get get why they wouldn't, they would make a crap ton of money.People basically want the smite god pack which unlocks every good that will ever be released.http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/misogynyhttps://twitter.com/femfreq/status/504718160902492160/photo/1

Any other tries to dance?Meh I eat w/e I want I just make sure to exercise more.  Course my favorite food is meat especially steak since I didn't get to have it much as a kid.  So my favorite food is relatively healthy.no it's notCoast supposedly got bought by a billionaire who owns an NBA team they might start throwing crazy money at people.Excuse me while I go vomit.Dude Sai thoughStep 6 can still happen next year :DNah Faker = Madara.  Faker is too calm and collected to be Naruto he would be the guy pulling the strings while others dancedHow the hell else do you think C9 went to worlds ;)Except that Vader literally translates to father in dutch.But do you have an insanely gorgeous and devilish fiance.It's the browns calm down there mate.  I wouldn't mind seeing cincy win it all if we can't pull our shit together though. Even our limies are better than that shit.Yes it is.  I expounded upon it because you didn't like my phrasing.  I  said she wasn't trans when using the trap moniker and she was not presenting as trans.  Your claims are the same thing as saying gay men are in love with women because some of them were married before coming out.  Yeah they were always gay but they were in denial.  As soon as she came out as trans and actually transitioned she dropped the moniker; go lie elsewhere.Work on champs they don't usually use.  Who knows it could be time for support ashe to see pro play.There is a fanfic waiting to be written ;)They don't have the money if Imp wanted to go to NA would be either Immortals or Coast both appear to have serious cash to go after people now.Okay you are way overestimating the KR mid/lower tier teams.  The LCK except for the top teams isn't that much better than the LCS of either region.  It isn't like SKT was challenged Faker barely played.Large contingent was your wording there are 53k subs to KiA you would be hardpressed to find more than 200 at most who one could actually consider misogynous Then delete his fucking liesSacramento Kings still a billionaire owner though.No people have attempted to moderate what she has said because otherwise they would have to admit she is just another JT but coming at it from the left side instead.Reinforce is a weasel word to get out of saying cause. For something to reinforce misogyny it would have to be present before.  Most people don't hate women honest.  We have her crying about how it's 2015 and game devs should be embarassed to have DiD in games.  Sure seems like she doesn't want it to exist at all.  Finally the court of public opinion which she attempts to sway can be just as damaging as an actual court.Who says it has to be a non group hobby?For something to reinforce misogyny there would have to be misogyny in the first place within a person which is not common.  It's a weasel word she uses to avoid saying causes and you are correct they don't mean the same thing.  However she is using one to avoid saying the other.  Also please explain the dying light comment if people should be embarrassed to do x thing in 2015 pretty sure that means she doesn't want to see it at all.Except they aren't you can't just make someone hate someone via media especially when their life is contradictory in regards to the message you are attempting to force.  You are doing the exact same thing she does trying to dodge using cause.

Just because you respond to something doesn't mean I have to agree with you.  Indeed I can find the attempted explanation to be the height of idiocy if I so choose.Yeah 2v5 bots were sooooooooooo much fun /sOr I just don't agree with your claims even after having read them.  Humans do have free will after all and I disagree with your "reasoning" as such I decline to accept your assessments as being correct.40 ms is huge try playing on 0 then playing on 40 you will miss skillshot straight up.It's more about breakpoints than anything going from 0 to 40 is big business t nothing like going from 60 to 100.Good blog name :DThat isn't in contention.  The contentious point is that AS uses reinforce to avoid saying cause even though that is what she means.  Given she is now trying to redefine harassment that isn't that shocking.

https://archive.is/aZY9Q

&gt;We need to broaden the definition of online harassment and abuse. For example, someone will post a YouTube video that defames me, and then thousands of people will reply to that video and tweet at me \u201cYou liar\u201d or \u201cYou dumb bitch.\u201d That\u2019s not a threat, but it\u2019s still thousands of people coming after me, right?Can he be a gunner?  Seattle might want to take a look at him if so dude looks like he could blow some people up.You are blatantly lying make sure to link the actual conversation so I can point out the expansion which is saying as soon as she was actually identifying as trans she dropped the trap moniker.  Previously she used it when simply crossdressing.Hey man Selective Justice = SJ :DYou mean like this kind of stuff?

https://witchwind.wordpress.com/2014/10/07/utopia-what-would-a-womens-society-look-like/

To be clear yes it is a joke the thing is what would be the reaction to #killallwomen started by a dad who never got see his kids because of our draconian custody laws or male survivors of female rape.  How about #notallwomen started by victims of domestic abuse who get brushed aside due to the abusrdity that is the duluth model?

Hint the internet would explode with fury.So you have never actually read the zoe post then.  Eron said literally nothing about reviews or even coverage.  All he did was lay out what had been done to her.  The original reddit thread started due to the DMCA that ZQ used against MM's video and TB's post about it.  False DMCA's are a big deal right now in vidya since companies like activision use them to try to hide glitches.  The censorship occurred because the mods liked zq more than eg and it turns out tb it's that simple.

Or what is the excuse of the mods censoring the posts about TB having cancer return on games that included him disolving a pro team as a result.Going to ignore there are and have been white slaves as well are we?  Hint the world includes more than just the USI'm of Irish descent my ancestors were treated like shit and I am the first person of my family to go to college let alone graduate.  Should I be getting pity placements after all the Railroads were built mainly on the backs of poor Irish and Chinese immigrants.  There is a book you should read sometime called The Jungle.  Black people are not the only ones who have it shitty in the US honest.You realize that white people get disadvantages as well right?  Unlike black people we tend not to be given special programs to make them go away especially white men or for that matter Asian men.fixed added a \ somehow

None of those hash tags are a good thing.  They are pretty damn balanced women recieve many benefits and several detractions for their gender.  Men do the same the key is to get the parts that are far apart closer to equal.  This includes for men rape laws and child custody as well as prison sentencing and domestic abuse laws you can't really argue these are way the fuck out of wack atm.

What real call for violence against women are you talking about?  Ever seen the how can you slap video how about the abuse videos where a male shoving a women and the reaction of passers by is compared to when a women is pretty much hitting a guy by the end and everybody just walks by.  If anything the biggest difference is that people feel the need to protect women which is kind of a biological imperative.Thanks for proving your hypocrisy once again.Women don't face violence because of the system they face it because of fucked up people at least in the USBecause they claimed that race is a major component in reality it's more people who couldn't fight back and were considered inferior are/were made into slaves.  Indentured servitude was basically slavery but it wasn't called that so y'all don't give a shit.Nah it's praying your mid doesn't give up an early kill and go on tilt giving up more and snowballing their mid.  Doesn't matter what elo.You realize that there is also a shit ton of violence against males right just nobody gives a shit.  Hell jezebel has run an article talking about how they beat their boyfriend haha isn't that funny.  They weren't lambasted for it most who didn't just ignore it applauded them.  Then you have stuff like this.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SzfLVyNHJgQ - watch the whole video and compare the reactions of passers by

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gOyrYThlOag - again whole video especially the second half there are people fucking laughing but if he fought back they would likely beat the shit out of him.

We can also go with the how can she slap video where the dude ended up in fucking hospital after

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=V4akMaeZ0-k

There is violence commited against all groups, the thing is when people see violence against women they will actually help.  They won't for the most part when they see violence by women.

But yeah it's totally okay to beat up a women so says culture after all males are the ones supposedly protected by your patriarchy malarchy.That you don't give a shit about people depending on the color of their skin?  I mean we could just call it racism.That doesn't make it not racism to not give a shit about people currently in slavery because of the color of their skin.  While harping on about people long long dead.Most people will not commit to buy it unless they are assured the only transactions are cosmetic in nature.  Having dlc maps and heroes not be free will cause player base splits and kill the game.Oh it absolutely is but you don't have to buy new guns as dlc only cosmetic items.No I will call the fact you don't care about slavery if whites are being enslaved racism because it is racism there are no quotes it's simply racism.Disadvantages that would however be minimized by being non white and non male.  An incredible number of scholarships are race or gender restricted.There is no and just saying it's racism and you are agreeing with me you are racist just want to make that absolutely clear.It didn't have as much do with journalism until after GAD prior to that it was about False DMCAs much more so and censorship.  Coverage also isn't nonexistent though it was much more for GAME JAM then for DQ although DQ was promoted over other software and was the only piece of software with an image as well as being the title out of 30 or so greenlit.  At least one of which I'm fairly sure had to have more impressive graphics than a piece of twine software.fixed I provided an archive of anil dash saying exactly what I said as well as removed swear words good enough?I'm waiting for you to get to the part where you actually show that you are not racist but somehow I don't think that is coming.  Has nothing to do with what I see you as.  You do not care about slavery if it happens to people of a certain race that is incredibly racist.Uh no they weren't and no I haven't.  Positive coverage does not equal reviews.  I mean since I have supposedly been pushing that angle I'm sure you can find examples of me doing so right?That's enough to kill the TP meta tbh thankfully.It's kind of hard to tell skill right now in overwatch tbh.  You have people like Sneaky being invited, but then you also have personality streamers like Towliee who blow at pretty much every game so it's hard to tell.  The beta is also incredibly small right now.Mobility is massively effected by being able to afford school something you apparently didn't have to worry about from the flippant way you speak about it.http://www.bbc.co.uk/newsbeat/article/34667100/poor-white-boys-get-a-worse-start-in-life-says-equality-report

Uh oh better not look at actual stats.

BTW the country is 78% white or so.  Now how about subdividing those scholarships by male specifically.That would be awesome but it isn't going to happen I don't have an issue with AA for getting into school I do have an issue with AA for anything post bachelors whether jobs or getting into med school.  Pretty much everyone but the super rich end up working while in school to make ends meet.  The issue in this case has nothing to do with AA and everything to do with restricting scholarships to specific groups.The thing is league is F2P this game has a B2P model cosmetic micros are fine gameplay is not.  If they try that it will end up like evolve a great idea that dies on arrival because of greed.Unless they change names and appearances the way this movie will go down will likely open them up for defamation charges.  Since well over half will be flat out lies.Except for the whole going the evolve route which will kill interest in the game.  The overwatch sub right now is going nuts hopefully the powers that be notice.Seriously ugly skin I mean I'm getting it but seriously fucking ugly skin she has derp face :(That's how you learn to run really fast :DYou mean when she wasn't presenting as trans?  Are you going to hold what someone does before coming out of the closet against them as well?  Would fit you to a tee.Koo honestly is way more fun to design stuff for than skt oh wells :(https://www.reddit.com/subreddits/search?q=WHYISTHEREALWAYSASUB

there ya go.If someone isn't presenting as trans holding actions they take against them or against trans people is bigoted as fuck.
I miss that mastery :(Apparently not since I can't get a response.Take a look at evolve sometime.  There is a reason it never became an actual esport.  Gating gameplay content behind paywalls beyond intial purchase just doesn't work well with esports.Then tell them to stop lying and don't tell me to go to modmail when I can't get a freaking reply in modmail.I've actually gone from D3 all the way to masters promo and all the way back down to D3 twice :(  I give up and will sit on D3.  I don't want to see if I can tilt harder :(what happened?One might even say beautiful and brave :PSo  Stave still sucks did Bart really do that bad starting?  At least he made plays.  Could at least give him a chance maybe :(Let's just not talk about that.Way the fuck more let's be honest.That is one book I will shamelessly torrent just to quote all the bullshit but I sure as fuck won't give her a dime.So Brave So Beautiful.Yeah they won't look at who bought the rights lol.I mean it would imply the film somehow getting funding which isn't going to happen after the book flops to hell and back.Stave is starting at QB does that answer your question?Speaking of the L word I've been told by others that a large part of the plot of the first season consists of banging the straight out of a girl so to speak.  How is this any less bad than the idea that you can force people to be straight?Don't worry come basketball season they will all be diehard fans :PWait til summer you will want to move back north lol.Ive been diamond every season I want a new shiny border :(  Honestly just need the time to grind never have it anymore sigh.1 ticket every 3 days is less than many people spend on coffee at Starbucks daily.Da fuck dogs &gt; allSmile bro even if it's fake it helps a lot in how people view you.  Even when I want to punch someone I just keep smiling at them.Them wrinkle lines damn bro :( The thing about smiling is you don't need to mean it you just need to look sincere.  I got really good at taking it because frankly I had to.Nah they just claw if you try to pet them.  Dogs &gt; cats fact.  Especially Samoyeds.Not really think about it like this.

2 million apply to x exclusive school

10k get in and geez they must all be really smart right.

Within that 10k though you are going to get people who are getting Cs because they are being compared to the top 200 who ace everything, and then within that group there are even people who are better.  That is what Diamond is like.Even D1 there are people who stream for a living same with masters there are limits that can't be surpassed just with practice.It's still a dodge if they were listening to the community the answer would flat out be we will not charge for additional heroes or maps or any GAMEPLAY related items.It is not a valid response it's dodging flat out saying yes.  They said they are listening to the community.  The community right now is screaming at the top of their lungs no gameplay dlc or this will turn into evolve 2.0.  Something that could have been great but was handicapped by greed.Or they fund new heroes and maps via cosmetic purchases /gaspI can't wait for defamation the movie to come out will be reefer madness 2.0 and everyone involved in making it will get sued to hell and back for defamation.  Going to be fucking hilarious.So are people just off limits for discussing even True statements or what?&gt;A woman cheats on a man with multiple people which according to her own personal definition is rape.  Following this she gag orders  said man with an incredibly broad order in violation of first amendment.  Meanwhile friends in the journalism industry to run a smear campaign.  

&gt;She also attempts to extend the gag order in another state when it becomes clear it would be vacated due to first amendment violations.  Her reasoning for this is that because she set up a notification system for whenever said man talked about her he was causing her distress.  Thankfully this judge was not an idiot.

FTFY

On the subject of harassment shall we talk about how said woman spread the doxs of multiple people?

As for Milo and a tech site frankly it will likely be no more shitty from polygon just focusing on it from a more conservative perspective instead of a pc one.  Both are utter trash in other words.I had to heavily modify statements I made because they weren't polite.  It's the way I talk in RL as well kind of a side effect of where I grew up.  In this case what you did seems fine but the direction the mod team has been pushing lately is rather disturbing to say the least.I simply hold people to their own standards not my fault that they can't fulfill them.Well you don't have to reveal your voice there are voice changers that should work just fine.  Are you using skype or is there a voip on the site?  I might be interested I just really don't know my schedule atm it's rather variable.You think they won't?   EG has literally nothing to lose and everything to gain by suing for defamation.So just don't plug in the webcam then, how hidden are ip on it?It's rather important to figure out ahead of time given how people have been attacked on both sides of this.  Will try to look into it tomorrow.Why start with Sony?  Why not start with the author of said defamation?She has never disputed what EG has said **EVER** how the fuck do you not get that.  Gag ordering someone is not the action of someone with a clean conscience.Actually it's the exact opposite of what you should do.  Gag ordering someone simply makes people think you have something to hide.  Now if you want to further spotlight yourself than an unconstitutional gag order is absolutely the way to go.

When are you going to understand she knows exactly what she is doing and gullible idiots give her money which give her incentive to do it more.I've known people exactly like her but at least they had the excuse of having to do it to survive.Holy crap this thread is getting brigaded rofl.Because he has people backing him up this thread either got linked to BoOC or one of the ircs look at the vote totals.If someone says that cheating is tantamount to rape and then does it themselves it speaks volumes as to their quality of character.can take a look at my voting totals most of them when I went to sleep were 3 or higher all are now around -7 which means at least 10 downvotes.  For a sub like this that is highly unusual.Meh honestly don't have time I have today off then work for the remaining two days and no idea what time I will get home on those days.It's not indiscriminate it's agitated since when is swearing against the damn rules.

Shockingly enough I don't like being called a bigot especially when it's a damn lie.Play something that can either crush early or hard carry late.  Even if you just focus on cs you can carry yourself out of bronze.  Most bronze people will have around 70 cs at 20 mins you can easily double that if you just focus on cs and not dying.So sorry that where I grew up offends your delicate sensibilities sir.Higher up people tend to take advantage of mistakes much better and a single mistake can easily become multiple and lose a game.  Players like Fabby are emblematic of that feast or famine.  Maybe 10% of my games if that are even the rest are one sided stomps for either side.Nah I don't get actively trolled most of the losses I consider my fault a fuck up here or there in team fights can cost you the game.That is real I have know people exactly like her.Yeah like I said take something that can crush early get 3 kills in lane and you likely won game because people will be flaming the shit out of the 0/3 person.Neither does someone like ASTo try to shut someone up yeah it absolutely makes you look guilty.  Especially when you provide no alternative explanation and are just using a gag order which oversteps constitutional limits to shut someone up.  Make you look guilty as hell.Why would I sue someone with no money it would cost more money to sue her than one could possibly make off her.  Now on the other hand someone who got a crap ton of movie for a movie deal and comes from a wealthy family would absolutely be worth suing for someone who currently has no prospects aka EG.I would suggest getting top or mid in bronze if you can carry.  ADCs come online too late and are to easy to kill you aren't going to get peel in bronze avoid the duo lane.That's a fucking giggle.  Anti's are more likely to be on BoOC because they have literally nothing else in many cases such as the dude who talked about Ghazi being his fucking life.If you think that cheating is tantamount to rape, or have the gall to claim that it is; yet are still willing to do it with multiple people while working to make your partner think they are going insane.  Well chances are you are not a good person /shrug.If you can find someone who is actually worth duoing with yes it is worth it to duo when trying to climb.geez that is fucking terrifying.Nah cause you go down that road I move to nyberg and that is stereotype you really don't want applied.   This is an observation based on the almost fanatical fervor that can be observed in places like ghazi.I used that one person as an example there are plenty of others I could point to including people in this sub.That would be because it isn't logical in any sense of the word.Did you ever actually read the Zoe post?  I'm curious because I don't know how people who have read it or done research would have any thought of there being reviews for a literal nothing that had to ride an outrage wave to get through greenlight on it's second attempt.  Given the state of greenlight currently that's kind of pathetic especially since it was free.They have to be rather blind though to ignore that the person they are defending spreads doxs and harasses others though.Which is bloody stupid if you are clicking somewhere your champion should either move to that target or move to that spot then shoot.No I'm not full of it.  It's a decision that would make a lot of sense in Eron's eyes.  That is assuming the movie would ever be made the book will tank ergo no reason to make the movie.  If the book becomes succesful EG will sue her for defamation.  You have to look at this logically.  

She will use his name and in order to make herself a sympathetic figure she will have to lie.  If she doesn't lie then she would lose her current gravy train.  The only question on Eron's part would be whether to sue if the book is a success or wait for the movie and sue for royalties involved with that as well.  Eron appears to have saved everything he would absolutely have a strong case and people would be willing to take it because the amount of money possible could be insane.

Again this isn't emotion this is simple cost benefit analysis.  EG has literally nothing to lose the people he thought were part of his social group hate him at this point.  He engaged in callout culture but due to not being the female it backfired on him also due to zoe being a longtime SA/weird twitter personality.  The cost for him will be pretty much nothing he will be able to find someone who will work on the promise of pay only if they win because the benefit for both them and EG could be insane.Again he will be able to find people who will work only if he wins.  Personally I would sue if the book was a success first it won't be but that is when I would sue if someone was making libelous statements about me.Read the whole thing there is not a word about reviews or even coverage.  Personally the most important part is the so called game that EG said Zoe essentially played on him if you look at her interactions in the form of a game to see how much she can get away with it makes a lot more sense.Bash is gone so is WS so I'm assuming something went down I have no idea what but I'm assuming it's related to the attempted loosening of rule 5 fiasco.  I could be completely off though.Eh it's more just annoying when things are downvoted sub -5 people tend to reply/read them less.  Also while it's amusing to see idiocy voted to the top I'm not a fan.There is exactly one candidate who doesn't make me terrified for what will happen behind the scenes once they are President and that's Bernie.Supposedly supports equality except when it comes to fixing things like the duluth model custody laws guilty until innocent rape assumptions.  Oh wait we aren't talking about feminists my bad.Now now they could be upperclass as well.Yeahhhhhh noooo

The only social lag at this point is waiting til everyone gets fed up with hyper pc bullshit again.  Unfortunately last time it only stopped because the Repubs won the white house plus 9/11.  Really hopeful that kind of stuff doesn't have to happen to stop the idiocy again.I would be willing to bet I am in the top 4 for deleted posts that are not blatant trolls.I don't feel threatened by shit but idiots try to use certain terms to shut down an argument.  Since they can't actually argue, misogynist is one of the more frequently used terms in this regard.Either you are for free speech or you are not it's that fucking simple.You mean a sub that a friend used to motivate them to lose 150 pounds over the last few years?  Such horror.  Ban the brigaders and leave people in their own sub.  Hell the fempire brigades more than FPH ever did.I'm sure you can name a ton of fat guys that are held up as being sexy in video games right?As in every person should die of obesity before being told their lifestyle is unhealthy and to change it?It's where the whole big is beautiful crap comes from.  You don't have to be supermodel skinny but for fucks sake when you are pushing over 30 on your bmi you aren't fucking healthy.  You are directly increasing your chance of death in fact.Do I really need to link her talking about how excited she was to spend the last few months of the year in Europe before GG was even a thought?I didn't say it was I said some used it for motivation.  Ban the people who brigade no matter what sub something reddit doesn't do.  There was no reason to ban the actual sub.  If anything there is far more reason to ban places like SRS that actually directly encourage brigading.Someone who has no interest in discussion and is only here to score points with their internet buds ie not me.: a proper or reasonable way of thinking about or understanding something

Distinct lack of that is demonstrated by Wazula's statement.You are assuming ZQ will win.  Eron has copious amounts of evidence and can prove she lied when she does so to cast herself in a positive light.  ZQ was already wealthy but there is a difference between what you can do to someone for a live interview and for what they write in a book.  Especially if by some quirk of idiots being idiots it actually becomes popular.  The way corporations win is they outlast others money.  When you have the level of money possible that EG could win off this we are talking millions here not Ks you can find people willing to work just on the possiblity of winning who normally wouldn't.

I don't expect Zoe to end up destitute she has family money I do however expect her lies will be exposed if this movie was to ever be made.  It's cost benefit if I have no money wtf do I care about more debt?  Especially when the possible outcome is to make me a fucking millionaire.

The people who Cerno has threatened with lawsuits frankly have no money there is no incentive other than vindictiveness to sue them.  Cerno also isn't a particularly good lawyer.

She really can't breeze over her infidelity because it is the subject of the manifesto.  Then there will be the temptation to attempt to cast EG as a villain like she did to the judge who didn't even let EG speak.

Again there has never been an incentive like this to sue all of this is assuming the book doesn't bomb.  Frankly outside of ghazi it will sell about 10 copies and that will be to gg people who want to laugh their asses off and quote it.You insult me I will respond and explain my reasoning, then I will watch the usual routine of I don't care but I have an insane number of posts on this topic.  But I totally don't care and am too cool for school ect.Or just maybe maybe people prefer to play and look at attractive people no matter what the gender.It's probably someone who can't actually debate so they resort to constant reporting I can think of a few zzzSooo basically going to become AGG 2.0 sigh was nice while it lasted at least.How the fuck is it offensive to state a group is calling for mass censorship when it's provable as a fact.  Get your fucking mod team in order /u/Shoden or become AGG 2.0 and have no neutralish space for discussion.How about one side defends people like Wu doing that kind of shit while a large number of people found Milo's article disgusting including myself.How so?  Implying someone is to much of an idiot to read a dictionary is now not a direct attack?  Yes I reported this one specificially because I wanted to see if YOU would dismiss it

paging /u/Shoden fix this shit.I'm looking at the current moderation by a specific individual and I can not currently share that rosy outlook sorry.  I'm seeing the same kind of thing ignoring blatant violations based on side.Considering you were overruled and it was deleted and I've seen the other things you let pass by I'm going with no especially after what Bash said.Or I've interacted with Malky for months and knew exactly what they meant.The thing is it didn't effect the people crying about it unless they went there.  Frankly I have seen a lot more actual hate towards fat people on reddit since the quarantine zone was closed.  Ban anyone who brigaded from there but they had a much smaller effect than the fempire prior to being bannedThe duluth model is the standard model used whether it's sexist is disputed however it pretty much always gives the benefit of the doubt to a female.

http://scholarship.law.umt.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=2027&amp;context=mlr

can start with this linked even from wikipedia which I know yall like to consider as being good it's source 12 on the article.Problem solved after having to tell me I can't read minds because apparently intent isn't clear when someone implies another can't read dictionaries.It absolutely is it's the primary model for domestic abuse many states only use it.  Again this isn't from MRA sites this is from Wikipedia which is supposedly a reliable site according to how much I see it's gg article cited.You mean like ghazi or any sub which uses the bad think bot to pre ban people?  Most of whom also brigade.Do you want me to provide documented proof of her lying because I have no issue with doing so.I mean Scar could view it as a Monster type role show she can play more than just super hot who knows /shrug.How about answering the fucking question here where others can see.Oh noes people do caricatures and nobody goes because they now know they are idiocy w/e shall we do.Dude those races are shredded I would have given you gobs but the three you mentioned in yeah there is a lot of r34 about them.How about answering right here /u/shoden do I now need to source either opinions or widely known facts because this is getting absurd.Or the rule was implemented to attempt to cut brigading from srd/BoOC/SRS possibilyAgain this has nothing to do with gay people it has to do with concept of you can't offend certain groups and certain groups should get priority in the job market ect.I'm talking about the sheer amount of r34 especially for Thrall.Yet EG bashing is absolutely allowed nay encouraged?throwing hypocrisy in your face by pointing out the places you browse are just as bad as chans but go after acceptable targets is not trying to score points.  Not that you could understand that.  Nor is pointing out that Zoe is in fact not a saint in any regard.  I've freely said what eron did wasn't great the behavior that caused it to get to that point though was far worse.Are swear words now of limits yes or no I want a very simple answer where everyone can see.

If so why?

Secondly there is a marked difference between how accusations against EG and ZQ are being treated why?  If I need to link a source everytime I say something I will but I'm not going to bother if even with sourcing things are going to get deleted.

This sub is going to be a hostile place get over it you have people who are extremely far apart the sub serves as a DMZ and not one that is fully demilitarized.  Even topics such as whether the duluth model is actually in use are argued over.

You also have people linking to both meta subs and ircs this place is not going to be a nice fun happy place.  It just isn't going to happen the subjects discussed are too contentious.  Rule 5 isn't going to stop that people will use alts.

A huge issue is it seems like you guys are trying to enforce r1/r2 as someone said something "nasty" who cares if it's True it's mean.

Also you need pro mods as much as anti's hate it you should beg razor if he will even do it.  He actually has experience moderating a large sub and as much as aGG may disagree is for the most part far more rational than most on either side.The thing is both should be allowed if they are backed up if I have to source everything I will.  I'm not a fan of how EG reacted but after looking through history as well as the Zoe post and other resources I do think he was abused emotionally to a significant degree.  Now one can absolutely argue that his reaction was not proper.That isn't going to work parties will be aggressive to each other but best of luck.So basically the PFM Russ I would be down with that.The person who was downvoted in that thread has no posts in the past 12 days on KiA I didn't feel like scrolling past 4 pages.  But don't let facts get in the way of your oh so righteous indignation.Where are you seeing GG complain about it I haven't seen anything about it on KiA.  A large portion of the people there will never touch Mass Effect again after 3 including myself so we couldn't give a damn about any trailers for it.Sorry I replied to the wrong person typing on phone :(  Also I agree with you it's blatant bullshit to claim that gg gives a shit about that.  It's a lot like the wow mods claiming KiA brigade when it was wasn't even linked to KiA before the brigade tag was put up lol.Why is that an oh lord.  Razor is a pro they need pros and he moderates /r/nintendo which is far larger and frankly more contentious than this sub.  Would you prefer I volunteer rofl I'm pretty sure that would cause even more anger.ahahahahahaha funny jokes are funny :(Pro Football Mock for an example, http://profootballmock.com/facebookchat/nfl-qbs-facebook-goodbye-farewell-amen/

read all the way to the end of the conversation trust meOn the other hand people who like to continually lie don't really get under my skin Mr Gawker Writer/Millionaire Hedge Fund Manager/who the fuck knows what else.  Also the reason this sub won't work is moderation when arguments get heated.When there is a lot of R34 a character tends to be though of as hot.  Also shockingly enough a lot of r34 is drawn by women.Rule one means this won't work get rid of it and maybe it could kind of work idk.  Moderation of blatant shitposting is kind of necessary for any productive dialogue to occur.How the fuck can misogyny be selective you either hate women for being women or you don'tBy promo pic you mean kickstarter video when she is supposedly playing?You appear to assume people don't find certain aspects of those characters attractive for some reason.  There is rule 34 of everything the question is how much.  That's why it's r34 if it exists there is pron of it.

There is something called Vore I suggest not looking it up but there is a fetish for literally everything.Again not a pic it's a section of the video where she is supposedly playing a game.  Hell if I was making that video I'd keep fucking up that section in some way to keep playing; I certainly would not have the xbox off and have to fake enjoyment.I can use multiple languages yay.Oh when was that?See the thing is I tend to believe people who I haven't witnessed lie yet over those who I have i'm weird that way.Nah just went nuts and deleted your account when Razor jokingly said you must work for Gawker because you defending them so hard.

Stay classy person who I totally believe is a millionaire and not a dropout desperately seeking approval.Oh let me clear it up for you then.  I have seen you lie many times.  I have not seen him lie at all.

There I even I made it all one syllable words for you.  Oh crap just screwed that up; well hopefully you can get the gist of it. Considering I could fake that up in 2 minutes I'm going to go with no rofl.Eh during the winter the space heater would be nice but during the summer way to hot.You deleted your account and cried about supposed doxing after razor joked you must work for gawker.  Then you come back with the story about being a bigwig at a financial firm.  In fact this is your third account that I know of.  Basically the vast majority of what you say does not fit together.Nah I don't have the inability to read though you must to ignore the logs posted about your friend nyberg.  Either that or you are simply a horrifically fucked up individual who knows /shrugFor you to pay me I would have to dox myself I found an image of a balance within a minute it wouldn't take long to match fonts and recreate it.

http://www.schwab.com/public/schwab/nn/articles/Stock-Settlement-Why-You-Need-to-Understand-the-T-3-TimelineScroll down for image it's from their site I don't have an account with Scwab so I don't have access to an actual login so I simply went off their site.Are you blind?  There are two images both of which one could easily copy or edit in photoshop.I seriously don't get how people can think someone likes games when they have a golden opportunity to play them but aren't just wtf.They show a balance which is all that one would theoretically need to do.I already did hence why I specified amount there are pages and pages and pages of thrall plus insert random here.  Just because you don't find something hot doesn't mean a lot of other people don't.It's panty sniffing to be horrified that you make a safe space for a child predator, okay then ........................................Okay Malky your video includes a scene where you are playing games to show your love of them.

Do you.

A. Pop in one of your most loved games and go to town possibly fucking up a few takes to play more.

B. Pop in an okay game that you enjoy but you won't purposely fuck up to play more.

C. Not even have the controller on and fake enjoyment while moving your hands in a very strange way to anyone who has used a controller.

If you answered C chances are you don't enjoy gaming.Why would you fake playing a game rather than just playing a game if you actually like vidya?  Please explain it somehow.Given that a moderator recently was doxed and had their family threatened leaks could be a big deal depending on what is discussed in mod mail.No it's in astonishment at how fast this has become more of a hugbox than fucking AGGThe controller isn't on this is a simple fact.  The people in car commercials aren't claiming to be lifelong gamers who love gaming; they are paid actors.  Now if you want to say AS is an actor who doesn't give a fuck about gaming and is only in it for the money hey that is your choice.Again people find goodra attractive why is this so hard for you to get?  Though I'm guessing given the size of goodra it's more likely a vore type of crowd. People find MLP ponies attractive hence why there are many many gigs of clop out there.Nah this skin is ugly I think there will be a lot less salt than usual now mid to high diamond/plat/master unless you are pushing to get higher just don't play there will be salt there.Hm a gold version off fabbyy well that's just a fucking terrifying thought.You claim because there are picture of goodra r34 that means people don't find thrall attractive I explained that just means people find goodra attractive.  FFS there are people who find jabba attractive.Again easy to fake you would have to dox yourself for it not to be easily faked.That isn't an answer.I'm not flying off the handle I'm exasperated because while PL is smart once he has made up his mind about something he won't change it no matter the evidence.Who is to say I won't get people to brigade this one?  There are no rules about brigading and losing could piss hokes off a lot.  Hell I might even tell people to upvote hokes so they end up positive.  Or I might not who knows /shrugHow so?  I could easily stick in say Shadows of Mordor enjoy it have authentic reactions and not want to fuck up to play more.If it makes you feel better I have literally zero attraction to her.  Someone not being a sociopath is high on my list of if they are attractive or not.Plot Holes

Crappy Design in terms of level singular

Good atmosphere but no payoff

Cliche writingmore like

https://usatthebiglead.files.wordpress.com/2014/04/cleanthony-early-face-plant-during-dunk-contest.gif

Seeing how much people actually saying what they think about e celebs gets cried about.A lot of people find Hokes to be an abhorrent human being if it would actually piss them off you could get far more than you think.  The question is if I care enough to do so.https://www.reddit.com/r/myfriendwantstoknow/Sorry to break your masturbatory fantasy but I'm clean shaven.So /u/StolenHodor2 any other lies to post today?It didn't last I think I hurt poor little hokes and SH2s feelings sorryShe ran away big fucking whope cliche beyond belief.  The atmosphere had no payoff.  As for plot holes what parents fucking go away when their marriage is already fixed up and they know their daughter is coming home who they haven't seen in a while.  Oh that was more just an excuse to a call a sociopathic manipulative abuser out don't worry you have no idea what my dick thinks ( \u0361\u00b0 \u035c\u0296 \u0361\u00b0) Well If I'm playing on say steam or just from where I left off on a console save 30 seconds max.  I would bet they spent way more time trying to fake it.Now this is highbrow humor good chum.Btw what public gamergate buddies?  I'll fake up an account statement if you want to send say 1000 dollars to a cancer research institute I choose what type but it won't be until I'm home which will be quite a bit latter.I have played the game their trip lasted past your original arrival time.  One of those things you do together is spend time with the spawn you created together.

As for happiness I'm curious how great a life do you think two people who ran off with no skills one of whom is a deserter are going to have.  Especially since it's a high school romance there is nothing to say that like the vast majority it won't flame out.

I never said running away was a plothole I said it was cliche.  Within 10 minutes of starting that game there was around an 80% chance she would run away since the journalists wouldn't be going nuts over it if she died.I've interacted with people like her all too often especially in my youth. both men and women.Again it took longer to try to fake enjoyment then simply booting a game and playing it more than likely.Because they are literally just out a high school?  I mean I ran away myself due to home situation.  It took me a while to get my life fully on track wasn't exactly a great life until the last year or so honestly.  I also didn't have the whole army deserter thing to worry about.That's brilliant roflVader means father in Dutch just going to let you think about that for a bit it might lead to another.Huh that surprises me you guys have like 16 mods.And faking it would likely be 5 minutes or more.  You have to think about how to put your hands and fake an expression of enjoyment which in this case ends up looking far more slackjawed than anything.  Whereas you could start up the game and load a fight while someone is setting a camera up.Again the people in stock photos are paid actors.  Now if you want to compare AS to a paid actor hey you said it not me.Actually I didn't even think about that the sister hadn't even graduated high school yet had she? I remember the gf being older.  In the US that would be a big issue.  A high school degree is pretty much required now.  As for desertion 

http://military.findlaw.com/criminal-law/failure-to-report-for-duty-awol-and-other-charges.html

It's not good let's put it that way.  So the gf couldn't actually use her real name or bad shit could happen.Typing on a phone sucks okay I fixed it, it was missing one word.  Also there is only one robot that can fake being human and that is Russell Wilson don't forget it.Has very little to do with cheating actually has far more to do with other stuff, like the wizard chan lies and even prior to those.I also talk really fast :D  Also Darth is the word that translates to Dark the closest translation is Dark Father.  Also Snape killed some guy whose name rhymes with rumblecore[Step out from in front](http://hominicious.com/wp-content/uploads/decoration-marvelous-designs-of-wall-mirror-decorative-designer-mirrors.jpg)Oh I think cheaters are absolutely scum but the lying and manipulation of others are far more disturbing.How many duties are there?  CSS, Thread approval, setting up AMAs, standard moderation, not sure what else.Now see if you wanted to insult me you could simply have used another language rather than trying and failing to be clever.

For example, illiteratus stultus the scientific designation for a member of aGGYou seem to think that I believe Eron is a good person I do not.  He shows many of the same traits as ZQ just pronounced to a lesser degree he is also a great fan of callout culture.  Make no mistake EG is absolutely an SJW he just didn't realize just how many friends ZQ has in that group or the propensity to base judgements along gender lines.Ah makes sense.It is entirely too difficult to find good scrappy doo gifs, though I suppose I should be grateful that the spawn of satan isn't more represented.Saying someone isn't a good person is sucking them off interesting, btw today is Monday I hope that thinking it was still the weekend did not adversely effect your employment.Diamond 3 in league got to masters promos twice then tilted hardcore.  World/region first in multiple mmos kind of waiting on content now though.  I'm decent at DOTA but many I know play league or shudder HoTS over it for the most part.  Other than that lately I've been playing Van Helsing though I will be playing FO4 a lot this weekend.   Also TF2 lots of TF2 and TF2 like games.Yeah GG certainly didn't donate to send kids to science camp nor to help TB when it became clear the cancer wasn't gone just tit obsessed lesbians /s

It is actually if you aren't stupid enough to send them nudes.  Hell a girl managed to take down freaking DNT by fucking her way through their officer core for loot and pitting them against each other.  The last thing guys want is less girls in gaming a top flight guild bringing a scrub because she was hot should tell you that.Ah the rengar syndrome.typing fast on a phone equals fuck spelling and hope auto correct doesn't screw me :DPeople in gold don't cs well enough to be fabby tbh.  When fabby is on he is scary in gold I can see someone getting ahead and just throwing hard.There are sick fucks in the world aka don't trust anyone.  That kind old granny healing you is probably a serial killer thinking about mounting your head on spike if you stand in breath one more fucking time.  Voice changers they work.Matt Taylor fundraiser was used to send kids to science camp.

https://www.indiegogo.com/projects/matt-taylor-rosetta-project-scientist#/

Originally was planned to be a gift and dinner for his team but he wasn't comfortable with that so it was donated to http://www.unawe.org/

24k in 21 days.Pretty sure I decided to never buy a bioware game again after me3 briefly recanted and bought DAI which black screened to hell and back so I got a refund.Indeed it's rather saddening sighOkay walk over to a console press the on button and check how long it takes you to load a save it isn't going to be more than a minute.Meh tbh even if I was a moron I would rather be a moron than make excuses for child predators because they agree with me on the ultimate first world problem.Money was raised to thank him for his contributions to science which were greater than anything the piss ants crying about his shirt had ever done or will ever do.  He choose to donate it instead of having a dinner for his team since there was so much.If illegals count you have to include emulators then nobody can win :(You won't wreck me in wow period.  Let's put it this way I cleared fucking naxx when it was highly relevant not the baby mode version.hm 52k vs half a million plus w/e con and rebel have gotten nope gg still hasn't been scammed as much as a much smaller population.I never got foot fetishists.  I'll go down on a girl quite happily the vast majority tend to clean there but feet they were just walking on those just ew :(No the question is enough dislike hokes to do so if they thought it would piss them off.Says a lot about antis if you look at my comment history :POr I'm typing on a phone and I think faster than I can possibly type on a phone unfortunately.Fatal of course, sheesh there are some freaking plebs in here.So Rev60?You mean how she tried to extend it in a different state and was denied when it became clear she would lose the appeal?You realize the fund linked was the one linked in their local paper right?Eh I guess.  Everyone has a little Vayne in them :Pit's missing one if get a life grammar tard.I'm not involved because I can't confirm or deny whether I have access to a fully unlocked steam account since that would be a lot of narrowing down doxing wise just thought I would point it out.I work with a AAA company I don't want to narrow it down further.No she dropped the gag order after she was denied extension in another state and it was obvious it was going to be overturned.That doesn't change what he said.I enjoyed your speech about mods being the police and above the law now that was drama causing.Damn right son.  You gotta clean there.Within the time of setting up a camera you could turn on a console and load a fight.great then it becomes obvious who not hang out with.It failed because they brought in other people who undermined and the just got straight up burnt out.  Not like AGG is any better.Uhm it did .... League is a rip off of the original DoTAThe thing is the first few weeks were great then it started getting linked to BoOC and shit while mods were getting burned.  So they brought on people they didn't fully vet.Meanwhile it's been discovered that AS had another pedo as a mod on her stream one who was infamous enough somebody recognized their name and went wtf.How is the Gettysburg address at all relevant here?But asshole circumference is vitally important to rpgs.I'm not trying to justify anything I just find it interesting how so many faces have ties to underage sex on aGG side not condemning aGG as a side just those specific people.Nah bro has to be EG people attack his character as though it would somehow make ZQ's not shit.Because I have a fan club of lonely people who like to pretend they are making an impact in the world.They weren't applying it to your posts so ....I've never claimed he was a good person I just consider ZQ to be far worse.  EG is absolutely an SJW right down to engaging in callout culture.We could add it to the list of concepts you willfully misinterpret to attempt to score points.  However honestly it would be easier to to just make a list of ones you don't try that with, that would be far smaller.Depends whats talked about in modmailAw I feel honored sorry you don't even make my top 3 of most pants on head retarded aGG posters maybe top 8 maybe.&lt; multiple world firsts

&lt; Diamond from season 1 on

&lt; Play on the invite servers for CSGO

&lt; 5ksolo mmr in secondary game DoTA 2 - not pro but still a fuck of a lot better than the vast majority of people.

&lt; Played in gungame tourneys in css

&lt; Played in Soul Caliber tournies

&lt; 48 in Halo 2 before I got sick of modem bullshit

What was that about being more hardcore?indeed it's like people thought pro would actually run from rule one crap being gone.Okay I resent the implication that anything could kick my ass even a hypothetical ship :PGenerally accurate?  This is the same sub that defended medival poc's tripe isn't it or was that a different history sub?Did you miss the second sentence specifically starting as for plotholes?  I realize that reading more than one sentence is hard for you but you should try.There is only one correct response

Your mother was a hamster and your father smelled of elderberries. 

In your general direction we all fart.She just spends 24/7 on twitter looking for anything to try to make gg look bad no matter how few follows or retweets.  As for what she did she posted crotch shots of her 8 year old cousin in a two piece.eight year old

ftfyYou mean the Wil Wheaton who most nerds hate and hated his role on star trek the one who helps legitimize bullshit like big bang as being the image the public has of nerds?

Or the same prime minister who isn't doing shit about the TPP?Most people don't; he was describing his own conditions hoping people would have pity on him.Except it doesn't?  Haven't you noticed more and more people are getting in on the bash selective justice wagon hell South Park's new season is all about it.Nah I just hate idiocy most antis I honestly feel pity for they are easily duped simpletons for the most part it isn't their fault.  There are a few I legit hate because they aren't easily duped simpletons and should know better.Who said I was currently pushing?  You can maintain rank by playing 1 game a week for league.  I did push on the weekends but I hit masters promos twice then tilted so I'll sit on my d3.

Worlds firsts were in previous years I haven't been raiding for a while for one thing no new contents in months.  Also work.

CSGO is my main vice atm

Source isn't a thing anymore I meant css for that not csgo :(  I checked my old server list the other day none exist anymore.

Halo 2 again YEARS ago.Or most of this I did years ago back when gaming was an escape from hell essentially.[Shut up Wesley](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=afhMMcAHlKw)

Also there is no might as far as the TPP, it contains SOPA I suggest you look into it and call your representatives.Sorry to break it to you but I'm kind of the opposite of fat I believe it's called fit.  I find the HAES idea to be beyond abhorrent and the continuously rising obesity in the US to be quite alarming.Wait this idiot has a girl friend somehow?AHAHAHAHAHAHAHA oh wait you are serious let me laugh harder.There is only one response, also most nerds look like normal people if you saw me on the street you would have no idea I was DS.  

[Shut Up Wesley](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=afhMMcAHlKw)Not for quite a few seasons actually because you lunatics haven't been an issue since the 90s.You don't even make the top 10 don't post enough.No I'm not south park attacks everyone until the last season and a half or so SJ people haven't been target recently because frankly they haven't been relevant.I don't hate fat people I hate the culture of complacency being pushed by shit like HAES.  I really dislike the whole idea of everybody gets a ribbon.  The entire point of giving out ribbons is to push others to strive harder.  Maybe if people are told that no it isn't okay to have a BMI over 30 they might not have a heart attack in their early 30s.Top two shouldn't be hard to guess, obviously after leaving out the faces making tons of money anyway.Hey man I've laughed so hard it hurt before I could barely breath by the end of this the first time I watched it.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eExfV_xKaiMHokes we all know that your fantasies include both razor and I at once don't deny it.That would imply he wasn't lying.pretty much zero yawn

Now the real question is just how many people in the aGG faces set excuse child predators.  Well we have Kluwe talking about underage girls having sex in the vikings locker room.  We have Nyberg who just yeah.  We have AS who has a known pedo as one of her mods.  We have Izzy who lied about the logs and did everything possible to try to make them look not legit before Nyberg admitted it.  We have the entire moderation staff of ghazi creating a hugbox thread for a predator.  You really want to go down this road?I mean I could post pictures of dudes dicks if that would be perceived better.  This is pretty standard shitposting material haven't even had any gore yet.What you linked doesn't say that at all.  It merely says that it's weird someone would go to the trouble of faking footage of them playing a video rather than playing one if they supposedly like vidya.It's rather unlikely over 30 is considered clinically obese.I just find participation culture absurd it encourages complacency.  Honestly if I had a good family and was able to just coast through school rather than working jobs to make money and save up I doubt I would have done anything tbh.  I had to overcome a lot of shit circumstances pushed me to overcome rather than simply relying on family money specifically ASD if I could just chill and not have to worry about money I don't know if I could have dealt with that like I have.Not including actual faces guessing the top 2 on my these people are scum list shouldn't be hard.It isn't advice though it's the your fine the way you are crap.  It isn't as simple as stop being fat you are right.  You need to follow a diet and exercise routine and yeah it's work and time.  Things like interval training though can be squeezed into small time slots.  That is what people should be spreading, not you are just fine the way you are when your body is at a heavily increased risk of heartattack ect.2 people :DWe aren't talking about kids we are talking about full grown adults.  Agreed when you are still growing there are major issues but outside of body builders as an adult it's a pretty decent system.You do know they are few and far between right?30 seconds could give me a pretty decent boss fight or even a speed run of a level.I often start a program on steam while waiting 30 seconds for a build many platformers a level can be beat in 30 seconds.then do it on computer?  Shockingly enough computer games can in fact be played with an xbox controller.Then go by fucking waist size as your example suggests.  It won't change that the vast majority of HAES proponents have a rather unhealthy body shape.  The human body is not meant to have fat crushing down on it that can lead to major leg issues later in life.  I'm not saying you have to be ripped just work to be healthy.  The great thing is the vast majority of people do not have conditions preventing them from getting fit beyond a lack of self control and drive.Paired with an xbox console da fuck you talking about mate?  The controller for a pc and for an xbox use different recievers.  In fact there was a DIY earlier about how to allow your pc to use your xbox controllers it involved taking the freaking board  out of the xbox.  Even if we go with all your stuff that still doesn't explain why not even turn the controller on.Yes we invented a personality that has been around for at least 7 years ...Because it is.  Misogyny is not a 20 dollar replacement for sexism it's a term that has a very specific meaning.  If you want to talk about sexism then talk about sexism it's not in the vast majority of cases misogyny.https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/14/8a/47/148a47d34477ed48e938f8445df700a7.jpg

The classics don't go out of style however most of the people currently wearing them are not Matt Bomer as such they tend to look rather foolish.in the manosphere rofl just rofl.Ryan Reynolds probably.  Dude loves comics actually pushed for Deadpool to be made right.  He is shredded hot as hell and seems like he would be a fun guy to hang around with.  One of the guys that hey I might give a try who knows /shrug

However people may not have a male ideal because they feel no attraction whatsoever to the male form like they do the female form.You forgot Step 6: World Domination

Do you even cloud 9 bro?except for the fact a lot of those groups hate each other roflThere is this thing called sleep but fine it's tremor and hokes I despise both.  Their level of hypocrisy is insane as is their level of bigotry.Where has he said he isn't an SJW?  He engaged in textbook callout culture.Huh no blood oozing from the tip step up your game yo.Talking about multiple MMOs also the US used to get world firsts back when people were still playing.A. Troll

B. Level of intellect is indeterminate because of A

C. It is hilarious to watch aGG jerk themselves raw over a troll thoughNo in this case he is right.  Saint just continuously swept issues under the rug.Except the Teuth actually booted said mod whereas Saint just kept trying to sweep it under the rug.I'm sure you can tell me about a medical condition that effects the 30% of the country that is currently obese.AlwaysIf it's you I really doubt he gives a fuck frankly I really doubt anyone gives a fuck besides your anti pals.This is basically a chan board if you can't handle it go back to pillow fort ghazi.I've never actually played them send the 100 to a prostate cancer research institute to chemo butthurt please.If it gives me bayo 3 faster don't care long as she still has an awesome combat system.He kind of did now that we know what his old account was.You appear to assume she has watched from the beginning.Except I'm not rofl holy shit you are a fucking idiot.  I just believe in actual equality not giving lip service and then discriminating against acceptable groups.I like to think this is your attempt to turn pillow fort ghazi back but we have a tree fort sorry.Really Sarkessian hasn't been donated half a million?I actually don't get it either there are a few guys I would try it with maybe Milo is def not one of them.  Now Ryan Reynolds on the other hand ripped as hell and actually knows comics I might be open to trying something with him.Except the groups they are talking about are not the same.  PUA and redpill have violently different philosphies.  PUA is as far as I can tell about sleeping with as many woman as possible.  While red pill appears to be about finding one who can be molded to your world view.  I don't agree with either but those views are not the same at all.Dude rat pack does not go out of style if you actually have the body for it.You make the top 8 but get dings because you lie enough that I'm not sure if you are real or someone doing a long con troll.Not really it's a chan board laws of decorum are out the window that isn't a good or bad thing it's simply a fact.  If you can't handle that then go somewhere that every post has to be approved by mods.Nah bro seriously

https://s3.amazonaws.com/rapgenius/Arba_domo_en_la_parko_de_la_Chateau_de_Langeais_02.jpg

It's pretty fucking cool

vs 

http://i.imgur.com/CbMMRJM.png
http://cdn.meme.am/instances/500x/54000970.jpglolPretty sure that's the 49ers offseason you can't use the same gif for two things sheesh.Rule 5 bans go 7 then 30 then perma and can overlap.  Frankly I'm amazed the dumbfuck hasn't gotten themselves permaed yet.Pretty sure that thread was when a lot of people quit for a while and when it flared back up that was one of the issues that was pointed back to.I don't really give a shit I judge people by their actions not what they say.Says the person okay with trolling people to suicide.  Gosh you know I really don't care about your opinion weird that.Hate him.What the fuck is wrong with you?  Also AS had a pedo mod on her stream, ghazi created a hugbox for the person who did what you said.  Kluwe has said he knew about underage sex going on but didn't stop it.  Like wtf how is sharing picture of your cousin in a two piece complete with crotch shots less horrific than calling someone a liar.I think posting pictures of your cousin in a two piece specifically crotch shots of an 8 year old in a 2 piece would qualify one as a child predator.Yes Milo who GG is divided on is a more substantial association than an individual ghazi created a approved posts only thread for and that aGG people on twitter changed their names to butts to stand behind.  Certainly more associated than someone who AS's publicist specifically tried to cheer up.  Yeah .....How's nyberg doing enjoying her curated safe space?  I don't go on hebe a large number of people here go on ghazi.  How about the mod for AS who was an infamous pedo rofl.In GGD I talk about unequal modding because it matters to the sub if you haven't noticed I'm more than happy to verbally joust with you fuckheads here.She calls black people hood rats and hood men there now you know some more :DI never claimed it was original geez you are saltyThe thing is I can see why people get tilted I watch a few streams of people clawing for gold even if they went say 2/0 in lane there would almost always be someone feeding 8 kills in lane.  It was kind of absurd.Aw it's cute dumbfuck is trying to make illiterati a thing now.  Go protect more child predator's dumbfuck one was a mod on AS's stream you should make sure to make a thread so they can say they were just being an edgelord.  The sad thing is you are most likely reasonably intelligent you are just a bigoted fuckhead oh wells.Did you miss the rest?  Comic Nerd who loves deadpool but is motivated enough to stay physically attractive, also just seems like a fun guy.

Also where the fuck are you getting your second sentence from have you just gone completely insane?  You asked for a male ideal I gave you one.  Yeah being attractive is included in being an ideal get the fuck over it.No Rush is ours damn it.I really hope that isn't your order rofl.I would love if we somehow got Adrian and Rush and Hai alternates back and forth while teaching them shotcalling and is finally able to retire with two people to take his place.Uh no just noI mean I could talk about how they are more than likely a dropout living in their parents basement; but that's supposed to be the stereotype about gamers not SJ twits.Why would it matter?  I may find it gross but drawings don't fucking hurt people.  If there are photos of kids or of rape that is a different matter.Loli not equal to photos dumbfuck.  Drawings don't hurt people.&gt;i dnt car bout gramer

Seriously dude I misspelled every fucking word in that sentence on purpose yet in a way that could still be read phonetically.Drawings don't hurt people dumbfuckHi lets talk about ancient Egypt.&gt;When you stub your toe, you would blame racists

To be fair they would be correct after all they are a racist fuck :DYou really don't understand the concept of dunking but that isn't surprising.Oh we are allowing urban dictionary to be used in arguments now in that case.

http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=SJW - top defintion

http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=gamergate - top definition

http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=Zoe+Quinn - top definition

That was funSo Bahar Mustafa should have been fired then according to you, correct?  Side note I don't believe so I'm just applying you "logic" consistently.The Zoe Post was not 307 pages try finding an equivalent document in size and I will read it.  It is hilarious to know for a fact you have been spouting off for over a year without even bothering to read TZP.No I defend freedom of speech.  As others have said democracy is horrible but currently it is the least horrible option.  We also don't live in a True democracy or else our elections would be based purely on popular vote not the electoral college and we wouldn't have shit like superdelegates.  Also money wouldn't play the absurd role it does in elections.Considering b on 8 Chan is pretty fucking dead yeah it is.  Course you can just watch 4 Chan for an hour and someone will post cp there or various subs on Reddit or imgur.  After all it's not like people post it fucking everywhere they can /sCough DoAX cough xeno cough PoE cough GTA cough every other Japanese game that gets censored due to American cultural norms.&lt;3 The Producershttps://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/6b/38/80/6b3880f90b77a2492e2dea9262f3df50.jpg

and

http://nationalww2museumimages.org/web-assets/images/mental-insecticide.jpg

vs

http://www.paperlessarchives.com/Dr_Seuss_World_War_II_Political_Cartoon_16.gif

Damn Seuss that hypocrisy :(You still have the owner at least :PWas the CCA censorship a simple yes or no will suffice&gt;The solution is to just express what we think about games and hope our opinions are influential (like everyone else on the internet)

Okay so you want your opinions to be influential and what is it you want them to cause end game?  Because it sure sounds to everyone else like you flat out want certain topics to be off limit aka censorship.No bitter the rules there are absurdly strict atm.I can believe the post without thinking EG is a good person shockingly enough.  There is copious amounts of evidence along with a video Quinn has also never disputed anything he said.  In fact she gagged him for a while so he couldn't say more.We all know just how reliable wiki is :P 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wikipedia:Meetup/ArtAndFeminism

Oh that's right not at all it's ideologically slanted to an extreme degree on anything with any relation to gender or politics.no it didn't they just aren't under obvious names it's impossible to police a site the size or reddit without obvious sub names.I don't think it actually shoves progressive values but apparently people think just having lgbt characters is shoving progressive values now despite us having them in games for years and years.  The only software I consider to truly shove prog shit is stuff that has no actual gameplay and is only recognized because of said progressive stuff.You ever played chronotrigger?How is using a mass block with a 90% False positive rate discretion?You can disagree all you want but when you can't call someone on an obvious lie it's rather bsOr I didn't want to give him a chance to try to dance around it which he still tried to do.However there was no current government intervention.  Therefore we can say with certainty that censorship can be carried out by non governmental agencies.  Which is all I wanted to point out.  Also the CCA was heavily relaxed after spiderman went against it in the 70s or I can think of multiple books that couldn't currently be published in the CCAs original form.From the first trailer it became rather obvious tbhI'm going to have to disagree here.  Sherlock is on netflix elementary last I checked is not.  A huge amount of people simply watch netflix now outside of sporting events.You need to add both netflix and streaming.The issue with Jack Ryan is they will never do the two most interesting books. They will not show the entire US government getting decimated and then Ryan picking up the pieces.  Executive Orders alone could easily be 2 movies.Killed his wife was in about a third of the movies and is the consistently parodied villain including both Never Say Never Again and the Austin Powers series.  He is absolutely iconic to not know Blofeld you are not a "huge fan"There was no current intervention therefore entities other than the government can censor that is all I wanted you to admit and you did so thanks.Except it was the B board and he said he searched for it.  Also there are only about 4 boards on 8 chan of actual size so saying something is the biggest is the difference between 1 and 2 users concurrently on most.Lol you are such a fucking idiot.  You already admitted that entities other than governments can censor and now you are trying to backpedal.Elohell is the point where you are better than your opponents but not so much better that you can carry every game.  Most people aren't in it but it does exist.Weird because here I thought he got kicked off of WC because of having sex with a woman.  I haven't said that there isn't CP in fact I have said there is CP everywhere on the fucking net report it or nothing will be done about it.  Side note I find the attacking of his disability highly amusing since it's coming from someone who claims to be progressive.  Also I thought only AHW was fucked up enough in the head to come up with this kind of shit maybe Hokes.Do you defend reddit, facebook, imgurs right to exist?  If so you are defending cp according to your "logic" report it or it won't get fixed.How is that a dunk?  All they said is it was an individual's opinion they didn't say they were wrong.Stop projecting.  Read the statement they didn't disagree with the employee they simply did not confirm.  If they heavily disagreed with them there would have been noises about punishment possibly even firing for misrepresenting the company.https://archive.is/gO6Q2

Just for you dumbass from Marie Rose's english VA.It's the fucking voice actor saying it's due to idiot rad fems that she isn't getting work for this localization lol.k?hey /u/surfpro do you consider yourself progressive yay or nay?Except if he was wrong he would be receiving discipline for misrepresentation of the company and they would have made it very vocally known.Illegal content gets removed I am not illegal no matter how much you may wish it.However they don't mention punishing the employee for their egregious misrepresentation.  So I'm thinking it wasn't a misrepresentation it just wasn't phrases as tactfully as KT would have liked.You should I think she got informed long before they announced that her services would not be needed.  She is a rather prolific voice actor as far as localizations go.Don't forget to mention the latest fake threat that got discovered.http://www.nj.com/union/index.ssf/2015/12/arrest_made_in_kean_twitter_threat.htmlDepends on how big said voice actor is also we are talking about a Japanese company not an NA one.No fuck off you linked CP and didn't even both to report and get it deleted.  Also one of Reddit's default reports is reporting minors I have no idea how you thought this would end.  Also reddit no longer values free speech so it's irrelevant whether it's legal or illegal it goes against the reddit rules.You haven't dunked anyone roflHm you know it might encourage people not to see them sympathetically if their children were constantly having nightmares about them.Tax is the only one to use that stupid acronym and nobody even knew what the fuck it meant.  Seriously dude take a fucking break go dig through Reddit and find the cp hidden away or Facebook.  Or just go back to looking into legitly far  right wing groups.No I don't dumbfuck nor am I transphobic or a doxer though I could be considered a degenerate according to saint Anita because I do love boobs.The only case where being trans is a choice is if one does not suffer from dysphoria. Otherwise much like being gay one is in the closet so speak until they decide to come out.  Which is what I said you are just too fucking stupid to understand it.Except of course that it already has English subs there are no region locks so literally all they have to is toss it up on the ps store.Nah but the gamergate moved my stair muffin one seems like a scene right from certain people's houses.The people who join them?The rams are always spooky but only in the divisionAre you daring to suggest it doesn't?Why would they need to test releasing the exact same game with no changes?  You do realize that ps4s don't have region locks right?You do realize that you can play JP games on the ps4 right now; right?  If you buy them nothing special needed.  I have a friend who imported the new sao game because they didn't want to wait for example.  You can even access the JP digital store though that is a bit more complex.I shipped an indie game while in school which was a massive factor in getting my internship and am working on shipping my first AAA game now though frankly I won't say when it's released because of nutters like Hokes.Lol getting world firsts more than anything in vanilla was a function of time something I had I stayed with friends pretty much every chance I got in high school.  Thankfully wow didn't and doesn't require shit in terms of computing power.I was in a world top 10 guild yes I stayed with friends whenever possible who were marginally better off but more importantly whose parents didn't have the issues I did.My family did not have a computer I did have friends who were slightly better off that I pretty much stayed with throughout high school who did though.High school is government funded I didn't go to college for a few years after for a reason.Correct me if I'm wrong but isn't every single minority group in the US less than 15% of the total pop and no women are not a minority group.Some people don't like to delve into things that literally rip you apart inside.https://www.fbi.gov/about-us/cjis/ucr/crime-in-the-u.s/2013/crime-in-the-u.s.-2013/tables/table-43

It's not 85% but it is disturbingly high vs population segments I think the number of gang shootings has a lot to do with it though which many kids end up where their only chance is joining a gang sadly.  I would be interested to see the impact on violent crime in general if we had free college sadly that won't happen.You mean the person that only rad fems and Canadians know about?I agree with you; this is weird.Oh fuck please tell me this wasn't Daesh.Again we are talking about specific groups unless of course you are saying blacks hispanics and asians are all the same people.  According to judges rule every single one is less than 15% therefore they are irrelevant.  Note I don't agree with this rule I just find it highly amusing also ghazi is just as whitewashed as KiA despite what they tried to pull with their chart.NOOOOOOOOOOOOOO I'm supposed to be safe damn it this isn't /r/nflNo Ghazi is as white their numbers prove it they just tried to use a bar chart that wasn't scaled and cut off at 200 to make it look like minorities took up a bigger chunk of their pop.  In fact GG has more minorities and women for that matter simply due to being a large group and having near equal proportions.No most people in the US have literally no idea who he is; hell few people even know the names of the shooters at Columbine Sandy Hook or Aurora.   That is kind of what happens when you sadly have a shooting a week.Linking cp does not equal a decent person period.You linked cp to win an argument ... We all know there is cp on 8 Chan as well as 4 Chan as well as Reddit as well as Imgur as well as Facebook.  Like seriously dude you actually looked for and linked cp you didn't even fucking report it you just linked it to try to win a fucking internet argument.  Just wtf dude get your prior straight.Why would I complain about a bag of 85% licorice jelly beans it might even mean no coconut.Except ghazi has the same ratio dumbfuck.  Given how much bigger gg is that would mean gg has far more minorities than the progressive hive mind simply going by stats.So all those groups make up one group en masse despite having very different issues?Lol noYou posted cp dude seriously just fuck off you flat out need to take a break.The only time Sherm really went off is when he was still building his brand.  I firmly believe the rant after the nfc champ game was thought out.&gt;Otherwise much like being gay one is in the closet so speak until they decide to come out.

Are you seriously this fucking stupid?
Unlike AS I actually play games for fucks sake even when she was streaming someone else was playing rofl.Fuck off racistYou mean like I did do?  I will never look down on someone for their circumstances because I know what I came from and what I dealt with.  I also know that not everyone could do it.  In one way I'm lucky I didn't have brothers or sisters who I needed to stay for I could leave and feel no guilt.  When you have little siblings you can't exactly just leave.

Also the fact you can look down on people because they don't pay 4k a month for an apartment is disgusting.  If you supposedly worked so hard you should have sympathy for those who didn't have the opportunity or frankly the gift of intellect I assume you have.  I got similar gifts though I'm guessing I started further down the ladder.  If I had siblings I needed to look after frankly I probably would have ended up turning to crime because there would have been no other choice.  That I didn't let me eventually go to college work my ass off and actually get to where I wanted to be.Why would I cry about making six figures I will continue to point out inequality of wealth until every one is receiving a living wage though.  Seriously if you are making six figures fuck off with any complaints you may whine about.  You have food, shelter, and unless you are a fucking idiot who can't control their spending you will be set for life.So don't live in NYC live outside the city again if you are making six figures you can easily do that and you are being a fucking idiot not to, which comes back to controlling spending.So yes you are this stupid.  Calling someone transphobic over and over with zero evidence doesn't make them transphobic; moron.You fall for more ads than you think.  Most of them aren't what you think of when you think of ads though.  Hell the entire front page of /r/gaming is pretty much an advertisement for w/e the hot game is this month; atm it's FO4.  Before that there was a ton of battlefront.  Yeah a lot of content is user generated but there is absolutely the possibility of someone making a post and having other spam upvote it.  Which can make a huge different if upvotes come early due how the reddit voting functions work.

For example there was a group of users controlling what video content got to the front page of the league sub by early downvotes and upvotes in order to drive views to their channels.  Than you have console "deals" the big money is made off of selling games not off of the actual consoles.  So yes when you buy a new console you tend to buy a bunch of games unless you are buying those on sale as well you end up buying full price games.

We could also talk about Gawker Buzzfeed Cracked ect.  Which contain large amounts of sponsored content.  Then of course all the eroticized ads for browser games hint if they weren't bringing clicks they would do something different.  Now do they work on everyone absolutely not however there is a reason stuff like Game of War is paying for Kate freaking Upton because it shows them a tangible return.

Also the vast majority of your comment was an ad just saying idk if that was intentional or not.  I do think people can absolutely get distracted on the internet and go click crazy possibly including impulse purchases.  I did enjoy the blade runner aspect of the new south park though.  Will be interested to see how they finish this season or if it's all just a leadup to the game.KiA just had another thread hit the front page like 2 days ago this thread is weird.Do you not consider it racist to smash all groups together as just a generic minority group who have no indistinguishable concerns from others?Believe it or not grammar literally does not matter in the real world unless you are a writer.  Now Syntax actually matters grammar does not.Daily hell vs being able to retire years earlier and have a solid nest egg to fall back on if something bad happens.If you are making six figures you should have damn good insurance or else you are an idiot.I specifically said grammar as in commas periods ect.  You can still easily understand a sentence even if it is punctuated incorrectly.  You can believe w/e you want but you are nuts if you think people are actually stressing over grammar in notes.  For the most part notes are as short as they can be while still telling what they do.You realize I'm not selling to clients right?  The notes are only being used internally.  For example a random segment might have a note like fixes black screen of 780ti on 350.46.  Now QA on the other hand has to be extremely detailed.Sorry I should have specified for my job grammar doesn't matter for my job which is something I am quite happy with.I can speak quite well I just have issues with grammar because frankly my teachers sucked and I can speak for a long time without need to take a breath.  Communication isn't an issue for me just I write long sentences.Or I suck it up and deal with daily hell since there is no guarantee in my field of having a job in a year.You can and should have a deductible under 3k for oop most standard insurance on the gov health market is going to have a 6k max deductible for an individual and 12k for family.I don't consider living with people who can fly off the handle at the touch of a button to be very safe.  So I avoided it as much as I could.  Again we are talking about as much money or more than many people make on a decade.When have I ever denied there is cp on 8 Chan I have said it's everywhere that includes 8 Chan.Meh honestly I like what I'm doing and if I can do it for 10 to 15 years and not move up I'm good with that by then I might be interested in having a family who knows.I check it maybe once a day spend way more time on the league sub.  The shuffle this offseason is dota level it's crazy.Not just that two NBA owners bought teams and c9 picked up rush.  NA legit has at least 5 teams who could compete for first possibly 6 if rng is for real.Rofl I don't love at home dumbfuck I left home as you call it a long time ago.I also syntax matters dumb dumb.  You don't use punctuation the same in programming as you well know.  There are defined rules not guessing based on pauses.Friend wasn't white but good try.I had shit english teachers and the way I speak isn't conducive to learning grammar.  Programming has defined rules it isn't based on where there are pauses in breath unlike grammar.You could just set up an auto archiver like most do when they want to hear both sides but don't want to give clicks Brietbart is absolutely on mine.If you refuse to intake information and evaluate it you are an anti-intellectual.  In most cases your initial assumption may be correct but it won't always be.  For example this is what happens when I go the article https://archive.is/Av8kI same thing as when I go to an article on gawker or any of its subsidiaries.Why the fuck would you buy a condo when trying to save money.  Geez you think a 3 bedroom is small don't you rofl.All I can say is the plan I am on currently doesn't appear to have those issues and it makes meds much much cheaper.Why the fuck would I focus on grammar?  It had literally no impact in me being able to get a job focusing on stuff that actually did was a far better play.Except of course for when the so called trusted sources do zero background checking in the rush to be first see this exact situation.Sigh I miss NCAA :(Eh the article is actually pretty interesting has an interview with the troll granted they could be making it up but it sounds about right /shrugTroll&gt;I believe Marie, because I believe women."

That line specifically aGG wouldn't say that because that would be admitting to basing judgement purely along gender lines.  It would be some fluff about how the greatest thing you can do is believe.  It wouldn't directly say because I believe women.  Otherwise I can absolutely believe poe.Frankly it's better than it could be they could have gotten Bieber or One Direction /shudder.Fucking ugh I can't hear that song anymore without wanting to smash the speaker fucking playoffs.I'm down for it.The worst part about s the qb choices this year kind of sucj would be great to draft one to sit behind rovers for a few years for you guys http://techintranslation.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/12/futuramanixon.jpgYes Bo comes and leads the Hawks to many super bowls all because nobody came to his bday and it lit a fire under him.  After that he goes on to become president.Feastmode played his real game after the game.Honestly the best part about beating the steelers besides fuck them because of 40 is no more of RW can't win a game where the opponent scores more than 24.  So yeah I get that feel I really dislike that Rodgers gets blamed for McCarthy not having guts.So how does the sub feel about needing to root for the Hawks when we play the bikes?The flag nearly hits him in the face as he is sitting up just how close do you think the refs are?Well yeah because if we manage to beat you this week GB is right back in the division race.You still have Iowa msu game to go so at least one team you dislike will lose, yay?We are talking about the US specifically if you are making six figures you can have fucking health insurance.The fuck are you talking about bayo was critically acclaimed it just appeals to a small audience.  Polygon is not the only reviewer rofl.I am a college graduate dumb dumb I just don't have an English degree.Are you really this blind to when you are being trolled?There is no such thing as every day misogyny dumbass.  Every day sexism I'll give you but not everyday misogyny.What monster gave her that death animation; it was you wasn't it.http://static.tumblr.com/1027882fda3c0c4183972255907f102a/zdb4wbw/xfNmpjno3/tumblr_static_ff-logo-gradient-fin-800px.png

That should work pretty well or I could link CON'sAn aGG man

FTFYIt wouldn't even occur to most people to think it was homophobic ever heard of a rimjob?I mean that is how CNN does it and MSNBC and Fox and the BBC and the Guardian we have seen this over and over.K?  But one who is supposedly on the progressive side which is the only reason this is even moderately worth looking at it.  Also one who frequently posts insanity though so /shrug.How did they not put in Tate and especially Calvin.  Seriously you know it's a hail mary and you don't put an athletic freak in whose job is to catch the ball.Sexism yes misogyny no.  Misogyny is a hatred of woman it isn't a 20 dollar word for sexism.If I was Ben Affleck I wouldn't give a fuck about getting doxed because nobody involved with GG on either side could touch me.  Just saying :PExcept I firmly believe she is deliberately lying.  She has no reason not to and every reason to do so from a monetary perspective.  For fucks sake there is a claim that the 3 videos they made last year cost them 31k in expenses  rofl.  This is after already buying the equipment.  Part of the reason so many people make youtube videos is they are fucking cheap.  Note these so called program expenses do not include salary which is covered differently.

http://www.forbes.com/sites/erikkain/2015/01/24/anita-sarkeesian-releases-kickstarter-breakdown-raised-440000-in-2014/You guys threw flaming garbage on his lawn no shit he got out.Except this entire conversation has been about those making six figures you are the one trying to derail it dumbass.Except I linked my source.So married to Jennifer Garner have over 50 million easy and live in one of the most beautiful parts of the world.  You know I would be okay with that.  However I don't think I would bother with GG if I had that kind of money I would be traveling the world.Get over it and get better.  What the fuck do you guys do in rl when you are faced  with adversity.Meh I just hate that halo has become cod I miss halo 2 :(Except salaries are a different part of the pie.According to their accounting nobody but AS draws a salary so never :DSo I'm lying about thinking AS is a liar?  I sincerely believe AS is a scam artist and a liar that isn't a lie.Dude sounds like fucking hokes roflAgain you are talkijg about someone with a wife and kids who had 80 mil in the bank and was dealing with shitastic ownership I would have placed out to.  Hell the only reason he came back to football is the raiders giving you guys 2 firsts.  I'm just glad to see him living up to the promise of his first two years.could just use sticky keys :PNo there is a user called hokes one who is even more virulently racist than tremor thhey are one of those who pushes that the irish are white and tries to ignore what happened when they came over.  They all claim to be non gender binary.  Back on topic  I don't think this is a hoax I don't know if this individual who was tweeting had anything to do with her disappearing; but it's not exactly common for someone to just disappear for a month when they have close relatives.The actual article they are citing is from People http://www.people.com/article/female-ranger-school-graduation-planned-advance

Granted that isn't that much better.  Frankly it's hard to be sure on anything like this because nobody will actually come forward their career would get destroyed.Soccer as well you know that right?  The common training is to play with either the U17 or top high school boys teams.  Men are just physically stronger and faster on average this is a simple fact.  It is exacerbated at the top end of physical fitness.It's almost like Russ is amazing when he has even a half decent Oline.I mean they could dox someone live oh wait the media already fucking did that.  Seriously disgusting sigh.No because unfortunately the west wing is only a tv show.Other way around I think Flame may find his way to SKT but we will see.They really should adopt the some asshole idea think it was from xkcd.Youur daily reminder that so does reddit so does facebook so does imgur so does 4 chan so does every single anonymous image sharing board on the web.  BTW I'm pretty sure we aren't the ones who roll out the red carpet for predators and make safe spaces for them that would be ghazi.

That said US government laws on photographs should be stricter.You also have twitter employees overturning suspensions of accounts that are telling gg supporters to kill themselves.Except that is what she said she just said she stopped pointing it out to everyone.I get 10 to 15 replies a day either insulting my intellect or my ability to read or just being nasty.  That isn't harassment neither is disagreeing with someone on the internet.  They have never even tried to have a conversation ever.  It would go against their goals to participate in an actual debate because the shit they say isn't defensible.  See JM crying about Osama being killed but saying it's a good thing when Hitch died.  Or his I don't stand with charlie because mean cartoons.  You could also go into how they claim people have to be fucked up to cheer for a doom trailer.  How about the crying over how dishonored 2 has choice rather than only a female protag.Again it goes against the twitter TOS either apply it equally or don't apply it at all.  Rather simple.&gt; associating with open pedophiles

[( \u0361\u00b0 \u035c\u0296 \u0361\u00b0)](https://pbs.twimg.com/profile_images/537804033180700672/fFP13SwW.png)He makes crazy catches but he drops easy ones.  For example the super bowl crazy last second catch but if he makes the 3rd down catch that was in his hands against his chest that catch wouldn't have even been needed.I don't look for cp unlike Nyberg.1. nope but I know people who are including girls it's pretty much the only volleyball series.

My interest is purely from being sick of neo puritans and censorship.  Another company just announced they will not be localizing any game they think would need censorship to be acceptable in the American market.Lol the only market dwindling is those who still think a game being "progressive" makes it good regardless of gameplay.To put it succinctly get a life.  Seriously the game isn't aimed at you here are plenty of games that are.  It literally does not effect you in any regard.Can you point out another volleyball game.Except they didn't they sold better in western markets in fact.It's not a fighting game ............Any game.  Games are art not every game is aimed at every person get over it.  I think gone home is trash I don't try to get it removed from Steam it isn't aimed at me.Except they could release the digital download without adding anything it already has an english sub.  The PS4 isn't region locked which is why people will be able to import it but it will cost them more to import than buying digitally.  You also have two companies offering a total of 3 mil to localize it.  It's because of political correct bullshit not monetary because it those two companies alone would make them make them a ton more than it would cost to put it up for digital distribution.   Please do some freaking research.

I'm sicking of people being disingenuous but I don't see that happening anytime soon.  If you don't like a game then don't fucking play it nobody needs to know that your feelings are hurt just don't play it. There is a market rofl there is a very large market in fact and it would cost next to nothing to put the game as is up for digital distribution because the ps4 isn't region locked.A quarter of a million * 60 without doing anything other than putting it up on the online ps store is a lot though.Hint there aren't any of decent quality which is why I know girls who still play the second.noHow was bioshock infinite a defense of liberalism?So?  At absolute worst it would get an M and honestly should get a T we demonize sex but violence is just fine.I mean ignoring JM works out pretty well his latest vid has what 400 views and a lot of them are probably just from being linked to laugh at him.  That book which AS contributed to has a grand total of 50 sales.  Ignoring them is working pretty fucking well in terms of not having them sell.Why does it matter to you?  You aren't going to buy it.  Also if it's digital distrubtion only you wouldn't even see the cover.  Frankly I would rather pedos jerk off to marie rose than real pictures same thing with loli.  It doesn't involve hurting people.  I don't think she looks 13 personally but I don't look at pictures of 13 year old girls so I'll take your word for it.

Again just so we are clear you are in favor of censorship of a game which you have no interest in playing and therefore have no reason to cry about the cover.  This is correct; right?Before I answer you answer what you have been dodging over and over.

&gt;Again just so we are clear you are in favor of censorship of a game which you have no interest in playing and therefore have no reason to cry about the cover. This is correct; right?Except there is absolutely an audience however there are also neo puritan lunatics.  If you think there isn't a market then I suggest you looking at just how much DoA makes off their costume dlc.How the fuck does quiet have a low IQ.  Do you have any idea what it takes to be a sniper especially one without a spotter.  These people are not stupid they are calculating how distance wind and other factors effect shots half a mile or more away.  Plus she manages to fully communicate without being able to speak.  Also you don't get to become an assassin by being an idiot.

So your first example is not a bimbo next.Except that they were offered 3 million just to localize not even to record lines in english just to localize it and put it on the store.  Hello profits.

Now to answer your question, I honestly don't care.  It doesn't hurt people and they are pixels on a screen with no connection to rl.  Hell if there was an ability to create a robot child that didn't feel pain and give it to sick fucks like Butts I would do it in a heartbeat.  Why because it wouldn't hurt real kids so I don't give a fuck if someone is jacking off to Marie Rose since that doesn't effect an actual kid.  Also I don't think Marie Rose looks 13 but hey apparently you know more about that than I do.https://archive.is/88qWz

Have fun it starts early and continues throughout.It's blatant fan service I've never denied that.  It's not something I'm personally into but it's something that should be allowed to exist.  It's also pretty much the only volleyball game on the market atm.How so?  It's blatant fan service nobody has ever denied that.  I do find it hilarious how people are complaining about a fighting game in this very topic when the game has literally nothing to do with fighting beyond it's char roster.  It's a fan service game that happens to be pretty much the only volleyball game out currently.Uh you might want to look up just how much DLC for DoA costumes particularly swimsuits is sold in the US.  Hint the demo absolutely exists in huge numbers. Lol which is a swimsuits are by far the best sellers even ones which are banned from competition due neo puritans.No it isn't only in your fucked up circle.  Misogyny has a very specific meaning which is hatred towards women not a single women but the entire gender.In the same game there is a black man playing a white man.  It's almost like the VCs were cast prior to the character being finalized because contrary to your claims good VCs don't grow in trees.Yeah that was rather hilarious though the actions after were deeply disturbing.Or people just admit that every single place it can be shared anonymously there is cp.Uh Haunter and bjerg possibly.  DL is better mechanically if yellow can get him  to reign in his over aggression.  Sven is better than reign when playing at the top of his game.  Bjerg and Feb I honestly don't even know bjerg is damn good and had very little talent around him plus he no longer needs to shotcall.   I would say only one position is a definite downgrade and Haunted could get better still.You are a fucking idiot rofl.  Rek isn't even top 3 in EU and he sure as fuck isn't better than Sneaky.Honestly hard to tell especially if TSM is getting yellow.  There is a reason C9 declined all star event NA is going to be brutal this year there are legit 5 possibly six team that could be competing for 3 world spots and there are still two rosters to be unveiled.I would have liked to see IG play with Time the entire touney that could have been interesting.There is better adc competition in NA rofl.  Niels and maybe hjarn are the only ones who are left in EU on his level.  NA is stacked adc wise In other places so called progressives just roll out the red carpet for pedos and predators cough ghazi coughThen make an expansion franchise fuck off with team stealing, give one to LA and one to Toronto don't move anyone.The world appreciates your sacrifice.LOL except Freeze is coming to NA also Piglet.  Rek doesn't belong on the list.  And Sneaky is on level with Niels, even the lower tier NA Adcs are people like WT and Apollo who are better than most of EU.Are you braindead?Except it is a completely unreasonable criticism; the scene doesn't 
need more "diverse" performances a good VA can change their voice to what is needed. Which is why in the same game there is a black guy playing a white dude it isn't a fucking issue.The vikings scare the heck out of me they remind a lot of the 2013 hawks the only area I think we have a clear advantage is qb but I think the vikings secondary is better atm.  Idk should be a really good game.Fuck hold onto the fucking ball.I have to disagree I think it would lead to more parity and there are still players who slip through the cracks.  Look at Rawls dude was a UDFA and is a damn good runnning back.Good job Frank.Sounds just like ours :Psuper stupid /poutsthey kind of have to pull for us if we win they are in the drivers seat for the division.The fuck was that.how the fuck do we have this many losses.... oh yeah we can't hold onto a 4th quarter lead :(I think you would see more mobile qbs like Kaepernick  getting shots people who aren't necessarily crazy accurate but are athletic and can make throws occasionally when needed.  More triple option looks.Wow Russ just wowYou say that like it's a bad thing :DTravel really well a lot of the bandwagon fell off after the first half of the season which is nice but won't last if we keep playing like we have been recently.[Do they though?](http://i.imgur.com/EVmJc4N.gif)You missed a line.Uh the worry kind of makes sense you lost your 3 best D players who I hope are okay but it is a justified level of worry.bullshitUnfortunately that is what happens when you spend a ton on D :(I wouldn't mind seeing Gtech in the NFL you have to admit pocket passers get boring.Ah for us it's just because we have spent over 20 mil more on D than O and that is with the 2nd highest paid QB in the league so that money has to come from somewhere.  In our case that somewhere is the O line :(:Dhttps://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FG0mN1nnXfMNo they asked you to name a bimbo.Wooot go Russ goget up by 40 going into the 4th and I'll feel good.Not this one, the memphis kid is probably the best but he is untested.  Also your issue is the line is letting pressure through.You have to remember we have been up in the 4th every single game this year including up 17 vs cincy.  We aren't going to be comfortable unless we are up 30 plus going into the 4th.Agreed you guys just don't have a line and Seattle is getting crazy pressure Clark is doing great dealing with avril bennet and clark is nuts.  Teddy is fine yall just need a line.Weren't there noises about FNC not letting players stream during the season?  I don't remember if it was them or another EU org but streaming is a huge money make for a lot of pros.No it really doesn't.  It's only an issue when you bother with pandering to viewers which you don't need to do.  If anything you handicap yourself and make it harder by giving the possibility of ghosting.  Facing adversity doesn't tend to make one worse.  If you just stream while playing normally it isn't an issue the issue is when people try to pander to views.Sneaky doesn't have Mithy I really want to see what he can do with Bunny after Hai finishes somehow transferring his shotcalling ability to Bunny.BJerg immensely.Have you looked at the talent around him?  He is far better now then when he first came.You realize mid in NA has gotten a lot better right? **FUCK YEAH**Hey man the vikings could come out pissed and crush the cards who then spiral down and we somehow end up 2nd seed :DDamn it I wanted to post it :(No I'm saying a good voice actor can completely change their accent and tone.  Hence why there is a black actor playing a white dude.  I'm saying race does not matter all that matters is being able to voice the character as is wanted.So the most recent one is 2009 on pc only; previously it was the psp DoA game.  Gosh sure seems like there are a lot of them :PrightNo but I can link to them excusing a predator :PNever gave a cent and run no script ublock ghostery and a few others.A salesman who later became a mod on her stream :Phow the fuck was this rule one.Care to cite this?

&gt;Quite a few people deny sexism exists or is harmful at all.

If you going to do business with someone it's common practice to google them before hand.  Plus he hasn't exactly stopped doing the weird shit since he started giving her lets play footage which was long before she had a stream.Twitch stream; he is infamous across the web to the point he spoke once after he changed the stream to sub only mode and people went wtf.no just no you fucking piece of shit

btw /u/BobMugabe35 I suggest not talking to this piece of shit anymore.

https://www.reddit.com/r/GGFreeForAll/comments/3twn65/im_watching_jessica_jones_and_is_anyone_else/cxaim2i

They said and I quote

&gt;I think apologizing, working to be better, and acknowledging that no real damage was done is a good start.

About nyberg no real damage was done fucking sick pos.Years not weeks, across multiple sites.Because if they actually harassed them someone deep in debt could sue the fuck out of them.  Bill collectors have approved times they can contact people.It sold just fine actually; was it a best seller nope but it sold well to the target audience.  If it was the main DoA series there would have been massive outrage.Good fuck teemo :DAgreed they wouldn't want to run into us.You guys can do it beat the cards go :DI mean if nothing else it would be amusing to see RG3 play with all the picks the Rams got for him.Shh it's just a coincidence that he plays for one of the founders of Microsoft go back to sleep little lamb.Then he is just going to keep sucking on purpose until he can go coach his one True love.You mean besides putting sexual pictures of an 8 year old girl out on the interweb which btw she knows about by now.  Which puts those interactions with cousin sarah as a kid in a whole new and troubling light.  Fuck I would be in therapy if I found out something like that.Not really I wouldn't be on 8 chan if GG could still be talked about on 4 chan however the new janitors suck ass.He is also the source of the vast majority of her footage long before being a mod of her twitch stream.

All the longplays she takes footage from are from this dude.It was a condemnation of everything when it was taken to extremes or did you miss the vox populi section.Except people do buy it rofl.  But glad to know you are admitting to being in favor of censorship for things you don't like.Nah won't get through look at the moderation staff.That's actually fucking pathetic.  Just how much money did she waste getting a literally useless PhD.Just don't leave comments huff post is full of idiots we know this by now.Salty Harrumph?Must be that dang Buffalo Wild Wings.Fucking Apdo man.  God I would love to see him in the LCK.No gamergate specifically was censored when it was being talked about on /v/[If you insist](http://www.totalprosports.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/12/cleveland-browns-new-qb-jersey.jpg)

or

http://www.thedrawplay.com/comic/the-king-drowns-his-sorrows/

or

http://www.thedrawplay.com/comic/sadness-week-3-the-qb-cemetery/

Take your pick mate.Yeah they are god damn it was sweet to beat those arrogant dickheads.Hugs :(We have trash talk threads the pc subs would run away screaming before participating in one of those.Even /r/leagueoflegends does it.Because it's fucking boring.  I would rather watch the WNBA than watch the MLB.Just give the warriors a number 2 * to go with their champion flair while they are at it geez.Wow that one is good least you can laugh about it.Vengeance will be ours.  Also our QB is hotter and has a better smile suck it.I'm scared of 3li until you guys get mathematically eliminated.Except the first two didn't sell that poorly.  A quarter of a million units is still okay especially when you can do it via digital distribution like now.4th including the psp one.  Do you ever get tired of being wrong?Hell nah Russ is objectively hot as hell and isn't stupid tall so who he wins.4chan is a shitheap nowadays it's worse than reddit for example http://boards.4chan.org/tv/thread/63380351/whoa-i-didnt-watch-south-park-in-a-long-while-but

half the comments in a fuckng /tv/ thread are butthurt sjws crying about how sp isn't funny anymore because it went after them.Hm kind of like the logo it's simple but fits the name well.It's trash it's an interesting idea but it loses to much in raw stats to dblade.  It might be okay in guaranteed lane swaps but in a standard 2v2 it's a way to get dumpstered.&gt; Hence why there is a black actor playing a white dude

Also why troy baker can play several dozen characters with wildly different appearances.Some idiot gave her 10k the first month but it was just for that month.Why the fuck is a supposed artist buying an ipad pro instead of either a cintiq companion or a surface pro is just wtf.I think those were supposed to be headphones just whoever made it sucks at drawing.&gt;"No Jar-Jar

And any interest I have is gone because the only way they could redeem the prequels is Darth Jar Jar.  Disney is going to milk Star Wars corpse once a year and killed the EU we can already see it in the new Battlefront game which is just a reskin of BF4 with no single player campaign.

Also no deliberate diversity is fucking stupid hire whoever is best for the role whether they are black green purple orange blue ect.  For nonestablished characters obviously.Hm so your coworkers wouldn't be disgusted by your talking down to those who haven't been as fortunate, interesting.Nah bro the C9 logo is literally perfect.Those are the kind of people I think I might actually deck and I'm really not a fan of violence.  It's utterly disgusting.Oh I knew it was a longshot but it's literally the only way to redeem the prequels.He was also an awesome actor as he has continued to show since see Psych.  In Charlie's case it also would have been very hard to do some of the major storylines if he was white.Doesn't work that way sorry.in that case rengar is best champI mean if R34 is going to be considered canon you could probably find quite a few ahri with a dick picsWhen I grew up John Stewart was the current GL being pushed on TV yet I still thought he was the coolest because of his ring.  Yeah Kyle was even cooler once I found out about him but it wasn't due to skin color it was due to him being an actual artist.Except this appears to be that video ..... and was posted by NetPeople want to believe because it could have been amazing much like The Mule in The Foundation Trilogy which Lucas is a  huge fan of.  So it seemed like it could have been possible but he just lost his nerve, it also would explain the title and why Dooku felt penciled in because he wasn't the original villain.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mule_(Foundation)Or I pointed out that color of skin didn't mean shit to who I idolized and or what I watched.  Static Shock is another example though I would really like to see a decent actor play him instead of Jayden.The thing is we could literally be talking about fallout which is scary as hell.JM has a tweet up complaining about diablo 3 on his dad's place in San Juan hasn't even deleted it yet.  If you can't find it will link when I have access to more than just a phone.No they only ban them against people they agree with, much like twitter.There is an article on the front page you should read.  I despise religion in general I think it is used as an excuse to do horrible things.  However very few religions are as active in marginalizing women and lgbt in comparison to Islam.  Which is why I find it so baffling that sj types side with Palestein and make excuses for attacks like Paris.   These are people who in many cases will literally kill you for being different this is not a religion of Peace.  It's a religion of bigoted fucks who actively work to keep women marginalized.  It's fucking mind boggling that y'all support this shit.Those who post those pictures are scum and unlike ghazi I don't roll out the red carpet for them.That somehow excuses defending what was found in regards to that piece of shit?For years across multiple sites including posting photos of her 8 year old cousin's crotch.  Have you wondered why the piece of shit never shows up here unlike AGG?  Because here she would get nailed to the wall without hokes to protect her.  I've been depressed it doesn't make you start posting pedo shit honest.Russ has better stats than Cam atm especially his last few games.But he has better stats overall as well just the last few he has bee crushing everyone.I consistently see people on your side pushing Palestine and trying to justify shit like Paris or Charlie.  It's fucking disgusting; they are terrorists there is literally nothing redeeming about being a terrorist.  Now do all muslims support this no but a significant chunk do which is terrifying.  The muslim religion fosters bigotry this really isn't disputable women are treated like property and god isn't going to help you if you are lgbt because it's his will you fucking die.

Seriously shit like this are you kidding me.

https://twitter.com/saladinahmed/status/673855412505047040

Or this in the same chain

https://twitter.com/LauraKreitzer/status/673855925216612352We stop calling them our partners in peace and levy sanctions on them like we would any other fucking country that did the shit they do.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cHGN-1Os31U

Unfortunately we don't have the balls to do this.Shall we talk about helldump?I hate to break it to you but guys can be sluts.  Also there is no evidence that he hates women in general.Except the forces which are subverting ethics are twisted version of feminism and social justice.I didn't say declare war I said levy sanctions.  We won't do it because oil but we should also be investing heavily into alternative energy another thing that won't happen.Hm this is interesting.  It could pay off for them since they won't have to worry about relegation but will be able to build chemistry.  Of course that means we are still waiting for two more teams.Why is being a slut a bad thing?except of course you know Gerst, EA in general, and Shadows of Mordor Payola to name a few :PSure college admission.  For example at Michigan you got more points towards admission for being a Native American than for having a perfect SAT.lol if any censorship would occur it would be the cloud in a dress part and it would be due to fears of offending you fucks.  Also Tifa's boobs could be massively downsized for the same reason. Reality does have a liberal bias if you are in favor of censoring speech you are not liberal it really is that simple.I wonder if I care what he thinks of GG, hint I don't.I have however mentioned them in other subs they just don't really come up here because they happened a while ago.  Meanwhile the forced self censorship due to SJW bullshit is ongoing.  Also I have in fact mentioned on this sub that it's quite likely that EA and others have people pushing content to the front page of places like /r/gaming it was in judge's ad thread where half the op was an ad.Russia isn't predictable and frankly we don't fuck with Russia either.  They invaded a NATO nation and nobody did shit rofl.Gerst is part of the SJ bullshit this has been known for a while that doesn't mean I am favor of him being canned for not giving a good review to a shit game.1. The dances around whether or not they want games like DOAX3 to localized or in favor of forced censorship sure points to it.

2. I am not in favor of ODN except in the case of gawker because they actually hurt people.

3.  Speech which causes direct harm or is a direct invitation to participate in violence is not covered by the first this would include CP.That doesn't mean what you think it means.  I was replying to your claims.Everyone knew they were there dumbfuck just like we all know they are on reddit tumblr facebook ect.  Hell AS supposedly got some; and then posted them to her followers maybe it was Valis's personal stash who knows.Advent Children isn't a game dumbfuck and no I was not a fan of the liberties taken with the original characters in it particularly the black leather just wtf.

BTW

http://www.neogaf.com/forum/showthread.php?t=1068308

Note all the crying about boob size.http://diversity.umich.edu/admissions/legal/gratz/gratsumj.html  Sorry I just assumed you might actually have knowledge of a rather famous court case my bad.Nope I am not in favor of censoring any speech which does not cause direct harm or is a call to violence.&gt; Hell AS supposedly got some; and then posted them to her followersNo because this is a shitpost sub dumbfuck now how about replying to your crying over how tifa is unrealistic.meh I honestly can't say you haven't I haven't talked to mine in years so ....By retweeting it rofl are you fucking brain dead.Except I posted about 8 pictures of girls who are apparently too big to exist.Yes and in 2006 Afirmative Action was struck down in general in Michigan.  2008 Nebraska, 2010 Arizona, 2012 New Hampshire and Oklahoma.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Affirmative_action_in_the_United_States#cite_note-68

It's gotten to the point where it is more advantageous to admission to be black than to be a recruited athlete that is fucking absurd. Atheltes are recruited because they bring millions to the school rofl.The links are in the post you replied to though I know you can't read stuff that doesn't conform to your pov.Holy fuck you are an idiot when you are demonizing someone on so called news sites it goes beyond screaming at them on twitter.Hint when you make either massively disparaging remarks or stereotypical ones about a race you are being racist.Affirmative action.I got loans if that is what you mean like every single student whose parents don't pay for a full ride.Make it as hard to get a gun legally as an abortion and step up the penalties for selling illegal weapons.  Also why the fuck does shit like the AR15 need to be available to the general public.Lol no2 more rosters as well nalcs could be crazy this year already at least 5 teams fighting for top 3Seriously if SKT sorts out shotcalling they actually got better over the offseason it's crazy.Huni maybe RO fuck no.  Rush is a literal tier above him.Again what matters is what it progressed to.You can have a hunting rifle or even a pistol there is zero reason for military hardware to be available to the public.Which is why at least 5 states have struck it down and more are starting to look into it.You have watched the videos or at least read the transcripts right?The player cannot help but treat these female bodies as things to be acted upon, **because they were designed, constructed and placed in the environment for that singular purpose. Players are meant to derive a perverse pleasure from desecrating the bodies of unsuspecting virtual female characters.**SKT were not afraid they were polite about western teams just like Samsung was about TSM.  They may well have had a winning scrim record western teams often did even CLG did well in scrims.I don't give a shit about the twitter whine fest when it started going up on actual so called news sites than it became it an issue just like when PoE stuff started going up and Lionshead.We don't need semi automatic weapons period.A weapon which automatically reloads but requires a pull of the trigger per shot.  We really don't need semi auto rifles it takes away anything even semi close to sport as far as hunting goes.Forget it he is a piece of trash liar who looks down on anyone who doesn't make as much as him.I'm a solid liberal along with 15% of the country apparently.

Also these questions could use a lot more nuance.

&gt;Generally affluent and highly educated, most Solid Liberals strongly support the social safety net and take very liberal positions on virtually all issues. Most say they always vote Democratic and are unflagging supporters of Barack Obama. Overall, Solid Liberals are very optimistic about the nation\u2019s future and are the most likely to say that America\u2019s success is linked to its ability to change, rather than its reliance on long-standing principles. On foreign policy, Solid Liberals overwhelmingly believe that good diplomacy \u2013 rather than military strength \u2013 is the best way to ensure peace.

Not affluent though, least not yet.  Sure as a hell doing a lot better than I was a few years ago though.That isn't shocking christian plus islam judaism and other religions easily comes to well over 50% being religious.If I got any scholarships they were not due to being intellectually challenged rofl.  I do love how you push that being poorer than you was a privilege because your parents could afford to pay for you.  Hint I didn't get a dime from my parents.When one engages in censoring of ones art, words, or writing due to a fear of adverse consequences.  Usually caused by heavy outside pressure.You mean like Victoria, or Diana.stain vs stein it's in destiny too run we are in an alternate universe :P  In all honesty the lines in Destiny are just flat out bad there is a reason neither North or Dinklage could make them sound good.  I do agree completely re-recording because of whining is rather alarming and means a huge amount of money wasted.old logo looked way better that one looks like shit.The champion of your region had two koreans and just imported another 2 ....Because you guys can't outbid for the top NA players.  It's not like we are importing the chaff we are buying out the good stuff all stars in other words.  There is no way say Roccat could outbid C9 for Sneaky's contract or Hai's.  Anyone who is good in NA is going to stay in NA because we pay well and you can make shit tons streaming for a top org.  Just like you won't see Uzi going to the LCK the money in China is so much better even though he could replace a large number of AD carries in the LCK and probably be on a better team.Hey I mean EU might get a team in London from the NFL for so some godforsaken reason Roger really wants that.There aren't going to be many teams at that level have you not seen how stacked NA is this split there is serious money pouring in.Well there is also the possibility that ol Rodger is just an idiot :D420 RP to only lose 2 lp sold.I don't think that will be a big issue for NA this split.I mean it's the reason we still don't have full-time refs rather than the brain-dead lummoxes who can't call a catch correctly to save their lives.Cloud doesn't have the muscle mass to use a buster sword now fuck off.  Also a lot more girls than you think have Ds and above.The thing is he could literally do nothing and the NFL would keep growing.  The biggest thing he has done is force the NFL to London which was more a function of the econ people telling him to do it.  He consistently is inconsistent on player discipline, he refuses to just go to full-time refs even though it would improve the on field product immensely.  Basically the NFL will grow on it's own at this point but in improving the on field product he has blown chunks.Just implement an inbuilt extension into chrome that can't be turned off and changes every appearance of ISIS/IS to Daeshbags.Disney could still save it with Darth Jar Jar /hopesI love how they ignore there is also a black dude voicing a white guy in the game as well.  If you want to see them squirm bring up that Kratos's voice actor is black the dude who is literally chalk white and was a spartan before having ashes etched into him.Yup you don't see many fat VAs you actually need to be in shape to VA now for AAA.Is shit we agree on this so?Except he never asked for money unlike your crowd and unlike your crowd he has actually done something of worth in his field.again not the same thing because those things came with rl shit that they had to deal with everyday.  Side note you are a fucking piece of shit for trying to link those kids to professional victims and predators.Nah I would drop him off in Saudi Arabia with no money and no access to money and see how long he could survive.  Might also get people to stop ignoring that 15 out of 19 hijackers were Saudis not from fucking Afghanistan.  Granted the Taliban was fucking horrible but 75% of the attackers were from Saudi Arabia.  I really wish we would grow a fucking backbone and sanction the shit out of them.Frankly he would be killed if he won the nomination as in shot poisoned ect.  There are groups with a lot of money who have a major interest in Bernie not being in the white house.Because she is for sale to the highest bidder.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FwRtyBxoId8

That isn't a secret.  It's actually the only positive Trump has unfortunately he is a right wing nutcase but he has fuck you money.  Bernie needs to win and somehow stay alive I don't think that will happen so we are most likely fucked yay.50 million is nothing compared to the amount of money we are talking about plus there is the whole concept of never enough money.  Didn't you say you lived in NYC and were talking about how one of your friends dropped 1.5 million somehow I doubt you are living in a cardboard box.Nah he is rather spineless against certain elements; I like the dude but you don't let a bunch of dumbfucks get up on stage and call your supporters racist and browbeat them when they want you to speak after.Literally only Bernie otherwise I want there to be some massive fuckup where the votes have to be redone over and over because I don't trust Hillary and Trump is a nut.

Actually you know what here is what I want to know why do you want Hillary to win other than because she is a women.  She has flip flopped on every single major issue throughout her career it's pretty much known that she can be bought see https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FwRtyBxoId8 and frankly she is just untrustworthy as fuck.Lol you have a higher opinion of her integrity than I do.  The amount of backroom deals that will come to light 20 or so years later if Hillary becomes prez will shock and appall everyone here.Hell yes OrgazmoSeriously at this point just get the fuck off github there are other places.They don't actually code so they have the time to do so.K it involved dumping all possible info that could be found about a persons online life they particuarly went after furrys and boasted about a confirmed kill of one.  As in someone killed themselves due to it.  Granted that person likely was highly unstable but it still isn't something one should be proud of.  We could also talk about how ZQ thought that talking about stabbing someone in the eye with a fork was something to be admired.Each of those stories probably gets 20k plus in clicks tbh.Left isn't the same as liberal.  Left and right are one axis, authoritarian and liberal are another.  There is absolutely an authoritarian left.Neither of those have anything to do with the agitators, even after he let them speak and do a moment of silence they would not give back the mic.  I honestly believe their entire purpose was to disrupt the rally and nothing more or else they would have tried to do it with Hillary who actually doesn't give a rat's ass about inequalities.Op is a scrub trying to shitpost and failing.  It's kind of like when a little kid smears shit on the wall and is proud of themselves you almost don't want to break their heart by telling them they fail and then you do it anyway.and Valis and AS and Kuchera and JM and ghazi in general.http://www.neogaf.com/forum/showthread.php?t=1152077&amp;page=3 lol even gaffers are starting to wonder when the new Chun Li costume will get censored.Liberal is someone who in favor of freedom of expression and speech.  Authoritarians are people who want to force certain povs and restrict expression and speech.Norman and Kuechly are just as valuable if not more valuable than Kam for the Panthers TBH.where is Russ?Lol?  Forgetting about Wilson are we?Ugh still pisses me off we could legit be a 1 or 2 loss team if we could just hold onto a fucking lead sigh.  Lost multiple double digit leads in the 4th this year fucking unexcusable.We are coming fuckersI find it very fun thoughthat user name ....mmm I like thisWoot we didn't make the list love you too bird bro.It's their fucking wide receiving core you shut down two of them and third drops 200 on you just wtf.but but :(We all know you jumped ship after 48 it's okay no need to lie :PCould you please shit the bed we would like to play at home.You guys lost 3 of your top 4 tacklers I mean yeah it was going to get ugly.  Speaking of which are they okay if you could smash Zona's face that would be awesome.[Sooooo you're saying there's a chance?](https://media.riffsy.com/images/be074cf8e41d5c5dff785e14ecae6a58/raw)But I like it when we go to the playoffs.They are probably going to get the number one pick and get someone who stops them from getting Watson next year but isn't actually good :(EaglesYou guys just need to tank two years in a row then you can get Watson :DGeralt's swords are too big to be easily used the way he does.  It's crazy how you expect realism in a game with fucking magic.You mean like we have every year except this one when we shouldn't have even been at worlds and still managed to take a game off your superteam with bought koreans rofl?  Seriously talking shit is like Barcelona talking shit to the New York Red Bulls after beating them.every single one should show up that is actually rather large.I'm fine with that lets make some noise.So for a painful 0-3 then?You bought a team that likely won't get to the finals seriously 2 KR gtfoYou do realize that Russia is basically a dictatorship right?  Do you think that jailing people who are gay or support gays is left now?Indeed it's usually a racist caricature but since it's at whites who gives a fuck.Lol no they put her on specifically because she was controversial they wanted to drive views they might not get otherwise.So uh gifts sounds good.Actually I'm really not a fan of it.  It's like the US getting german players to nationalize here to increase the level of our soccer team.I don't have an issue with OG my issue with FNC is the same as TSM.The only reason it wasn't is there was nobody to follow up on the stun.  This play massively impacted the game.Actually I've said communism is a great system if you can remove the human element since you can't it sucks.  The entire issue is human greed same thing with socialism and it's why Russia for all intents and purposes is a dictatorship.Wildcard beat Fnatic guess EU's streak of losing to a wildcard at worlds stays alive then.Year after it will be KR on everyone no EU players at all, and the scene will die just like SCEven KR has slumped Najin was way weaker than either Samsung teams.  KR tends to be very top heavy and a lot of their talent got spread out by the removal of sister teams.  TBH except for TBQ LGD should have been the second most talented team in the tourney outside of SKT.  However communication issues killed them.  It's like throwing together an all star team but half speak a different language great individual talent but communication sucks.No way Brazil could maybe support 2 but not more than that.heh balanced viable in 3 roles yet for some reason people still think he is bad not looking forward to all the tahm bans.You mean like you fuckers are spamming now about c9?Lol no Alliance not ever.Doesn't matter you could win worlds 5 times in a row every comment trying to brag would be replied to with 
&gt;KabumWhat pisses me off is AHQ actually got the draw I wanted.  The one team hai said he never got to face that he really wanted to was SKT.  I wouldn't have cared if we got curbstomped I just wanted Hai to get that shot.That is called a joke.  Also a lot of NA people don't like TSM because likely they will have 2 or even 3 KR next year not sure if lustboy can naturalize yet or not for riots rules.  Also loco and regi really not well liked at all.C9 didn't even exist in s2 rofl.I mean their solution was to import Koreans.  I'm really afraid the scene is going to end up like SC which is pretty much dead in the west because almost all top orgs are mostly KR at this point.No if Karma's a bitch feb will smash his fingers in a door and you guys will go 0-3 because he is the one who started it.Faker wouldn't have a flair much like skins they are unneeded for the demon king.tbh that whole thing is just another reason players should be in booths.  I don't care if it's True they shouldn't be hearing that shit right before one of the most important games of the season for them.I never said that?  I just said I don't consider jailing people for being gay to be left wing I mean you might think differently but that would be my opinion.I mean that's what fnc did soooooIt is used as a good thing personally I feel the author did their best to make it purposely ambiguous and to catch up people who have bigoted thinking but wouldn't say so unless it wasn't obvious.  I could also be giving the author too much credit though idk.Personally I'm always a fan of the games where you want to avoid combat but in some cases it's forced upon you.  Scarcity to me is a key part of a good horror game.Yes but OG would be like Hotshot Dyrus and idk Chauster making a team in NA and being at their peaks again suddenly.  Not likely to happen their experience and massive champion pools have been a huge boon to them.It would explain a lotNo I'm going with what I believe the author meant the comic to do I could be wrong though /shrugBy actually looking at what is mainstream not just what the prof tells you.I mean CLG did double even admitted it they played what they wanted to play because it didn't matter.Curous why can I still see it?True it does suck there wasn't a competent ngo that could invite non harassers and abusers to talk to them rather than censorious hypocrites.The amount someone like Suh gets fined is like being fined 5 dollars for most people.Uh they got a tower as well also lost pressure.Yeah acknowledging it does shit all.If Hai was making as much money as football players that would be a just comparison in reality you are talking maybe 5k likely a lot lower probably closer to 500.Because football you can't just remake a game you could with this.  League isn't exactly a heavy physical sport with possibility for injury.From his pov there were only 2 and he had an escape if they engaged him he was trying to cause pressure on mid.It's a bug that's hard as fuck to detect that absolutely impacted the game would we have probably lost anyway.  Most likely we were tilted to shit but it was impactful.http://www.sikids.com/photos/48406/most-controversial-endings-in-sports/17

That white helmet is apparently a football this is why we now have instant replay.TBH they would probably do better if they went max difficulty because they are playing the notes that actually exist inbetween what they are supposed to.I'm not talking about idiotic studies I'm talking about what the mainstream actually believe as in normal people.  Physics is hard science gender crap isn't.Agreed but I do think a key element of good horror games is scarcity of supplies.  It kind of takes me out of the horror mindset when I have unlimited ammo and giant op weapons idk.IG just took dragon C9 was attempting to pressure to return the objective.  You do realize it's rather hard to pressure when the whole team is hiding in a bush right?https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WcebgKvAoh0 - See video for reaction currently.

Unjustified DMCAs are not justifiable period.  However since it was against a girl by a girl it would depend which one is more pc for the reaction of certain groups of people. Infidelity Shaming != Slut Shaming.  I should make a macro at this point and attach it to every post sighThen the people currently making content like AS should go back and retake it unless of course cherry picking is part of the curriculum in which case it's utterly useless.The tagline is from Eron's original post.I don't like people who have the gall to cheat on someone and then accuse them of cheating and force them to isolate themselves from female friends sorry I'm weird that way.Apparently you haven't been to college recently there are absolutely SRS like wack jobs in rl strangely enough they tend to be male.

edit: BTW SRS you are kind of proving my point for me with the downvotes stay salty now.Yes there is certainly no stigma whatsoever against males being nurses or teachers especially elementary ones outside of gym not at all /sOf course you would appluad a discriminatory director sigh.  For the record I would say the same thing about someone saying that for males.Or they would put their career since many people are far less wrapped up in identity politics than you.You don't get PTSD from fucking twitter if anything that is mocking actual vets.Cracked went dowm the tubes long ago.  Also idocracy really isn't dumb at all it's a possible outcome taken to an illogical extreme.  I can tell you a lot of the dumber people in my grad class already have kids few of the smarter ones do.Except they don't at all if they get degrees they get work.  Women are getting hired at nearly double the rate of their pool by top companies.Depends where you go to school.Lol except he is directly discriminating against males you even admitted it.Once again most media studies course are utter crap.  It's the only if kind of work someone with a gender studies degree can get.Yes they are?Hell in diamond you better believe I'm going for that penta.Theoretically you could hide it in a hidden file and only play when they aren't home not that I'm advocating this of course.  Or just get a decent ehd and stick all your games on that.The second movie is dead which is good because Tatum was supposedly headlining it.  Hopefully the first falls apart and any talk of remakes stops and actually progresses to sequels instead with a passing the torch style.How about posting why you think this.  I think it because of actual experience you tend to just be contrary to be contrary.Awful enough to take a game off the team you most likely cheer for given your two about the omg fnatic bug.Just another reason they should have booths and it's fucking stupid they don't.No what was said is exactly what rito said the nobody was near enough to take advantage of a stun here it directly led to a a major gold swing.So since you are in here what about the op will there at least be an acknowledgement from riot or?That isn't a fucking good thing it's discrimination rofl.Except they are being hired at a rate nearly doubt their percentage of the talent pool.  We are talking over 15% difference in hire rate vs pool size.  There is no excuse that is discrimination flat out.Did you miss the passing the torch style part?  The biggest reason I'm pissed is because it's a remake rather than a passing of the torch.  I'm also not a fan of the casting because tbh I don't find most of them funny.  Part of the reason ghostbusters worked so well was the sheer talent of the cast and frankly I don't think that is there in this iteration.1. Yes but not as much as she claimed.  As she has said to the UN she considered the every day of you are a lair (fact) and you suck (opinion but I would er towards factual this is because I think liars suck).  Even the so called week of harassment she released yeah some was but a good chunk was simply disagreement.

2.  Idk if it was AS or a supporter but I flat out do not believe the USU threat came from a non feminist.   Frankly what they alluded to is not something an average non feminist would even think of especially one from the US they would reference Rodgers or someone else.  Also yeah the twitter one is really sketchy idk.

3.  No more than any other public person, and no I have not.  I believe she lies and cherrypicks data that doesn't mean I condone harassment.  I have never contacted her or any other individual involved in gg directly on twitter.  I do think she reacts in order to get more disagreements on twitter and then pushes them.  She isn't stupid she knows just how much money she made off of the "bomb threat".  Much like Harper's patreon just went up 1k from supposedly being hacked.  It would be foolish not to take advantage of it assuming one doesn't have moral scruples about doing so.You mean besides one of them referencing someone that you would be very hard pressed to find a non feminist in the US who knew about it?  Not saying it was AS but I find it highly unlikely a non feminist sent that one.I feel like I should link the internet lie pic to him.As we get smarter and smarter we start to realize how fucked up the world is and you know what maybe I'll wait a few years to have a kid.  Idiocracy relies on the idea of the world continuing to spiral which is absolutely possible.  Where it breaks from logic is the idea of smart people never having kids.  Eventually you tend to hit the point where biological imperative to pass on genes over rides logic whether male or female.  That is why it's a movie taken to an illogical extreme because it takes a possible situation and heavily exaggerates it.No they aren't rofl.  They aren't inferior but they are not superior.Because I really dislike remakes in general and this is one of my favorite movies it was near perfect the first time no reason to fuck it up.I didn't say Sarkessian herself necessarily I do think a supporter faked the USU threat though.You think the average non feminist especially in the US has any clue about Marc Lepine?   Hell the only reason I know that name is that threat sadly we have a lot of mass shootings in the US.Those would not be lies they would be facts you don't like.In other words censor all you want just as long it isn't the big bad relatively ineffective government doing it.  If google censors the word feminist from appearing in search results nah who cares totally not an issue.I would suggest not drinking a lot it isn't great for your liver and no this is where I link dying light doom ect and you go but but that doesn't count because reasons.  I then sigh deeply and go back to blowing up scrubs so I will skip to the blowing up scrubs part.You realize goats admitted I interpreted them correctly right?No but I don't companies should claim to be pro free speech when they are censorious, but I don't like hypocrisy so.Was your comment anything other than an attempt to have the last word?  Also my comment while flippant contained some of the things I would point out and you would dodge.Actually I didn't make up bullshit I'm referencing intels report on diversity hiring compare the pool vs thee amount of hires.

Bottom of page 9 is the table you are looking for 

http://www.intel.com/content/www/us/en/diversity/diversity-in-technology-intel-2015-midyear-progress-report.htmlThere is actually an interesting fan theory that the jedi order is essentially like the government in equilibrium with emotional control.  While the sith are pro emotion; of course this is kind of ruined by Palpatine being an evil asshat and Anakin killing kids but hey interesting thought /shrugPower fantasies tend to be objectified males that are explained away as power fantasies.  Sonja is a beast but is considered objectified because of her Bikini.  At the same time Conan is a power fantasy because reasons.  It's just a way to excuse hypocrisy.

Much like punching up is a way to excuse being a bigoted fuckhead essentially it's double speak.

To be clear there is nothing wrong with objectified attractive characters.  I just see it as hypocritical to explain away the male version as power fantasies.Or they are circlejerking because Razor didn't make his intent 100% clear.Because most of them are incredibly bigoted but as long as they direct it against the correct target it's okay.  I would also say a large number of them suffer from a savior complex but who knows not a psychologist.It is discrimination the numbers show this no matter how much you try say this is bullshit the numbers disagree intel's own numbers that I linked to you.There is a difference between say reddit or google and some random fly by night blog someday you will learn that or not.You appear to be confusing being an ass with being a dev.  Some people are devs and asses but most aren't.Correct.No I believe bigotry that I have actually seen not bullshit.To the point a site is essentially a monopoly over 70% market shareIt isn't stalking someone was suspicious of what she said on a whim searched europe and found what she said prior to gg.So are people just reporting every single post I make?Or maybe base aid/scholarships on finances rather than skin color/gender and end it after college.  You have 4 years on roughly equal footing with everyone but the super rich and most of them already have jobs waiting for them.  So distinguish yourself from your peers there is this shocking concept called merit it's a great thing.Because that is racist.  What would be your theoretical reaction to black people suck or fucking black people.  Again I don't believe this I'm just pointing out that both are racist.No idea what color hokes skin is they make racist comments ends of story.Holy crap that is just beyond stupid.  In context it would be obvious you are referring to both of you managing to get past the hurdles you have faced due to finances.  It's not a fucking microaggression and if someone was to try to call you out in front of him he would likely put them in their place.  That said yes that is the shit that is referred to as microaggressions and it's fucking maddening. Not pissed at you just pissed a the idiocy that is going around atm.Not really look at tech hiring right now it's happening much more with gender but there are absolutely groups receiving positive discrimination.That doesn't make it good thing in it's present state.  Hell slavery was around for 100s of years and still is in parts of the world doesn't make it a good thing.That isn't True at all just so you know.  I know people who literally do not care about gg who follow you guys because they follow all the outrage subs because they find them fucking hilarious.  They really found the pedo hugbox thread amusing personally it sickened me but to each their own.The broad strokes of the report are utter shit something like 25% of the references are either circular don't exist or literally reference the creator's C drive.  If someone can't even cite properly chances are their report is bunk.  Of those which aren't complete bunk the vast majority are tiny studies like 100 participants or less.The general gist of it is utter garbage.Merit should be what matters most it's why I got a shot despite tbh being the second worst possible gender race combo in terms of what tech are recruiting for vs the hiring pool.  The only one worse is asian male which unless you are literally genius level good fucking luck.We aren't talking about systemic racism we are talking about racism period none of your power plus privilege bullshit just good ol fashioned bigotry.  IE RACISMThen you haven't looked at what their mods post no it wouldn't in other words.Almost every male superhero is heavily sexualized they tend to be running around in skintight costumes that outline pretty much everything.  However they are so called power fantasies because reasons.Let's be honest it was probably killallwhitemenI wasn't aware I was in tech for decades to enjoy this so called perference.   Tell me more about my past life.  No it's discrimination period no matter how much you try to excuse.  Also just so we are clear the group getting most fucked is asian males not white males.  It's a level playing field when you are hiring the same percentage of each group as they comprise the talent pool.  Not when you are hiring at nearly double their rate in the talent pool.  That would be a tilted field it's just one you are okay with.Eh depends if they have lived abroad also I would argue some forms of prostitution are basically slavery.  IE the kind where they get a young kid addicted to drugs and make them give up their body for more of the drugs.Personally I would highly prefer the system some countries are moving g to where college is free for all citizens to public universities.

edit: If you can dv saying that college should be free for everyone you are seriously fucked in the head.Some teams use sub spots for heavy streamers tbh NB3 is an example of this.  Without the ability to have a full sister team a sub is only so much use.One of the EU teams is pretty much an all star team and the other is mainly the old guard of all stars with a really fucking good up and comer.  NA squads tend to be groups of friends not meticulously put together like FNC or OG.    The thing is this is what happened with the SC scene almost all the homegrown players were kicked to the curb for KR and it kind of killed interest in the scene in the US for the most part.It isn't though.  The biggest issue with the NA talent pool is a. It's more profitable to stream and b. homegrown talent rarely gets a shot and even when they do well may be replaced.  See Azingy.Almost like it takes time for a player to develop and get comfortable on stage.Sneaky was damn good sesaon 3 he was just on a utility carry 90% of the time with the ashe zyra laneOkay seriously phone games do not equal game like league nor do facebook games.  Yes it's not like 5% but the percentage of female gamers in competitive games is around 20 to 30% possibly lower.Do you actually think women are delicate flowers?  If someone is truly competitive hearing something like that is just going to make them strive to prove them wrong.  Look at Russell Wilson hearing his entire life that he is too short to play qb now his a top 10 possibly top 5 in the league.  Flutie same thing Brees same thing.  If someone has the talent and drive such comments would only push them forward.This is actually a really good point when you ban "toxic" players who are say masters chances are they just move onto another game.  The people who tend to rage the most are those who are hyper competitive and always want to win aka the people who actually have the drive to be pros.  Yeah some are just asses but frankly who have dealt with assholes since the beginning of gaming we have mute buttons there is no need for riot to babysit. Shall we talk about EU last year?If you are competitive enough you will work harder just to prove the doubters wrong.  The whole concept of victim blaming applied to anything outside of actual crimes is fucking moronic.  If you haven't noticed NA is becoming less competitive in general it's the everybody gets a trophy generation.  People who have actually had adversity and have the drive fight through it and come out stronger if they don't have the drive they quit.The NA talent pool isn't a wasteland.  The issue is there aren't the incentives to go pro it's more profitable and less stressful to simply stream and you can go to school while doing so.  Azingy went 3-1 what was Helios's record again?  He was just another hyped up import who couldn't deliver.Nope still cop.Interactive mediums are different than passively observed ones why is this so hard to understand.Which is why violence has been dropping for years /sIncoming mass downvotes it's literally because of her gender.  Same reason why bernie sadly I don't think can win old white dude will not get votes from the people who will vote Hillary simply to have a female president regardless of their policies.For me because I don't want to see creative freedom restricted or quotas in all but name.  I am also in the industry I don't know why half the people who are here are here though particularly those who have admitted they know nothing about vidya and don't care about it.It takes time for a player to develop and get used to a LAN situation usually.  Getting rid of sister teams is the biggest mistake riot could make in this regard also we need Bo3 series.  The sheer number of games the LPL teams got vs NA is staggering.  Also there needs to be compensation that makes essentially sacrificing a year of your life worth it.Power fantasies = objectified physically perfect males but it's not the same because reasons.  There I made your post much shorter.Eh certain people aren't up yet I can watch comments go from plus 3 to -5 in a matter of minutes at certain times it's amusing.  I didn't say she was terrible because of gender what I said is gender is the biggest reason that people are thinking about voting for her.Would you prefer I said tokens?  The op asked why people care wtf am I supposed to do lie?  By quotas I mean in games not in tech you already get massive points for gender/race in tech that isn't a conspiracy theory I already back it up with intels own data.  You waved this away because I have been favored for decades apparently.   So a tilted field is fine as long as it's tilted the right way fuck having a normal field a tiled field is the right way the only way the judgeholden way.Not really I simply boiled down your gish gallop.Obviously a women will be more empathetic after all women have always been the primary victims of war.You mean since the numbers directly support the conclusion I wish wasn't True I must accept it to be True?Indeed early it's going to throw off timing a decent amount.The 40 mana is actually rather large especially early game prior to rune.It isn't meant for her dueling it's meant to impact her cs sheesh.The biggest right now for blacks is violence specifically gang violence especially in the inner city some of this could be lessened by having stricter regulations on automatic and semi automatic weapons.  Also by not defending community programs that actually give kids a safe place to go that isn't gang affiliated.  Another absurdity is the difference in sentencing between crack vs coke.   Also the amounts that supposedly distinguish intent to distribute vs intent to use are absurd.  There is also discrepancy in sentencing in general with it going roughly black male &gt; white male &gt; black female &gt; white female.  Obviously this is also influenced by gender.  Any other bullshit you want to try?  I can keep going these are just the rather pressing issues off the top of my head also income inequality is rising which is bad for everyone as the middle class is vanishing.I've written many actually. I just don't feel like spending the time to break down every component of your gish gallop; it's the same thing no matter how many words you spew.We have been overcompensating for many years.  I'm not bitter about anything I don't like discrimination in any form when there is a 15 percent difference between hire rate and pool size that isn't a good thing no matter how you try to spin it.

Also to be clear when I was talking about tokens I meant actually in the games themselves not the people making them since that doesn't seem to be clear.There is a 15% difference between hiring pool and actual hires it's also already a fairly sizable pool.  Pretty sure that falls outside of 2 standard deviations and pretty sure you would be screaming bloody murder if the talent pool was 19 and only 4 percent were getting hired.Your post boils down to a lot of words to say the same thing is different because gender.What I want is very simple I want hiring in line with the talent pool percentages.It's rather interesting I think these are the three biggest contributors to the frustration with gaming journalism besides payola and all the other fun stuff

&gt;That there are many people with left-wing or progressive political sympathies who recognize that art can be interrogated for its political beliefs but nevertheless want to read art and culture criticism that does not consist primarily of explicit progressive political complaints
___________________________________
&gt;That a time-honored and cogent school of thought suggests that evaluating a work of art for its political hygiene before and above more traditional aesthetic criteria leads to bad art criticism, art criticism that is incapable of working in the spirit of nuance, shades of grade, uncertainty, and instability that is so essential to deep artistic thinking
_____________________________________
&gt;That the degeneration of artistic analysis into political list checking provides incentives for creators of art to serve those interests, rather than actual aesthetic goods, a surefire way to create terrible art

I think think these two reasons sum up a lot of the annoyance with places like polygon and even gamespot massively pushing politics in things such as gone home.  Just because a product is politically doesn't make it good and just because it isn't doesn't make it bad.  Games should be judged first and foremost on well being a game and this seems to be happening less and less.

As for the gamedrop idk how much he has looked into gg but some of the groups of people he talked about absolutely fit gg.  I would say overall it's a negative game drop.  At the same time however he seems to believe many of the issues that gg believes outside of just corruption in journalism have merit.

I don't really think any big issues are missing but idk those three are my biggest at least but they could be different for others.  The only thing I can think of is that the attempted forcing of pc can lead to self restrictions imposed on the creators limiting what they feel they can make but I think this is kind of covered under the third idk.A large number of people will vote for her over Bernie because she is a woman.  The kind of people who are usually dems should not bee pro someone with a ton of a corporate sponsors that someone like Hillary has such a huge amount of support despite serving on freaking walmart's board is wtf worthy.It's almost like if you talk enough you can try to give reasons for why red and red aren't the same color.Except I have numbers to back up my "baseless assumptions" which makes them not baseless.I have been spending to much time on nfl I expected a manning face lolSo how many gigs by now?TBH SSW thresh is by far my favorite thresh skin love the style of it idk.I love SKT vayne if not for the pure gold crossbow the golds needs to the highlight and crossbow dark red or black and that skin would be god mode.everyone has headphones tpa skt fnc and ssw all did.That Vayne skin is so close to perfect just the giant pure gold crossbow annoys the hell out of me.Bandwagon as fuck but not wrong necessarily.I wish they all would :(Lol gl with that for SKT not to win would take the most obvious rigging to ever happen.  TBH I don't think they drop a game Marin Faker and Bang are just too fucking good.For dems absolutely for general possibly not.  Course the republicans don't have anyone sane running so the dems should win no matter what hopefully.Better?I read it then I dismissed it.There is no fucking conspiracy.Wouldn't be shocked to see c9 rush c9 impact and c9 random import next since incarn can declare region and so can rush and impact if they want to stay :(  Will be the end of an era if so.So can Incarn declare residency now or how does this work this is confusing as fuck.  From what I can tell everyone declares residency at the start of the season or something idk.Nah that will be the Koreans especially if they are only on one year contracts you could see some move over.Actually you have never cited numbers ever.Why would you want this?  That team would run roughshod over the nalcs supposedly mata talked about wanting to join c9 at one point good fucking god.  I mean it was be a beast team but I like apple pie and sneaky would be the only piece left :(No they don't at all.the jinx skin is a consolation for making siv the victorious adc :PI hope it's challenger jinx because I want it but also to spite you :PShe is Harley Quinn and Shacco is Joker it's not hard don't get why people think it's emo quirky bs it's an obvious take on harley and joker.It's dead rising/l4d sheeshProbably challenger Azir tbh most people were expecting Jinx but Azir makes sense since Jinx is now getting a skin.Dead Rising FTFYhttp://40.media.tumblr.com/883bb46a2b3f836389020c1b6da4e805/tumblr_nlezrdxe6J1tirp9oo1_500.pngOfficer Vi fits her well but personally I use neon because it's awesome.Good hopefully people will stop playing him.It's based on l4d/Dead Rising sadly hipsters look a lot like those games and the new non mad max movie has made it worse :(Oh I agree I've actually moved to maining almost entirely jungle because I hate playing mord and I want to take his dragon pet away so I play champs who can solo dragon and do my best to keep him from getting it.  I'm not bitter they stuck a fucking ap bruiser in my bot lane; nope not at all.The only non terrifying candidate for me is Sanders and I honestly don't know if he can beat Hilary.I was more questioning because of your flair.Agreed.ahIf I link posts saying exactly what I just said by /u/TaxTime2015 is it acceptable?Why?  Most people in this sub have been talking back and forth for months.For positive coverage not necessarily there were however major COIs which were not disclosed.  Also the response on both reddit and 4 chan was not normal at all even the fappening took days before being closed down and that was with major celeb pressure and heavy media coverage.  I don't even know if it got closed down for sure on 4 chan I know it did on reddit.  This was some nobody who got faster treatment than freaking jlaw.Blizzard meanwhile has 5 maps each with a different game mode in half a year sob.I was talking about SKT I prefer the skt skin over any if it wasn't for the giant gold crossbow as such I mainly use dragon.I mean it's not petty we left England to get away from the monarchy.Her political stances changes based upon what was popular honestly we have no idea of her True stances at this point and that is fucking terrifying.Or because she served on the Walmart board her voting record is anything but consistent and we don't know her True views since she just says w/e is popular.  So why is it you are apparently voting for her since it isn't gender.

For an example of this flip flopping https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-switch/wp/2015/04/21/hillary-clintons-history-with-video-games-and-the-rise-of-political-geek-cred/

Sanders on the other hand has been consistent for decades.  To be clear Hillary is better than an R but not much.Theoretically people who sell feed most people aren't heartless enough to let ponys starve.Are you sure he didn't copy a Hillary campaign ad?  Seems to flip flop enough.mmm chicken the demon king faker would rather have chicken than his own skin so you know it's good :DBut Rush and Impact can now right?Reddit mods specifically reached out to ZQ do you not get how unusual that is?  Also no nothing in the TB post that was deleted violated current rules and sure as hell not on 4 chan.  Seriously I don't think you get how rare it was for a topic to be forbid on 4 chan prior to gg.TB's post was absolutely not a witch hunt rofl.-8 yeah I believe there are enough people without lives to do that.I mean a cuck is short for cuckhold so yeah someone in an open marriage may well have cuck kink as for why it's an insult the same reason people use virgin to attack gamers.  It attacks a perceived weak spot.Believe it or not over the half people here wouldn't downvote that shocking I know.Wasn't a witch hunt so doesn't apply and still doesn't explain 4 Chan.You mean 4 Chan dislikes infidelity huh weird.The idea in this case is one being an unconsenting cuck ie you are getting cheated on while providing resources basically that you aren't masculine essentially since you can't actually satisfy your so.  Idk that is my understanding of it anyway not really a fan of it personally.Did you seriously just compare child molester being an insult to liberal?  Also most of us are liberal ffs.You tried this before I can just copy past my previous reply or you can delete your current one idk which.I love how he had to correct that he was quoted by more places including gawker and the Mary Sue pretty sure I would never admit to being quoted by either if I could help it.How has it swapped?  Wanting a level playing field is utterly consistent with that view and not hypocrisy in any regard.  You do actually read before spewing bs right?  Also my reference to quotas was in actual games not the people making them.  Stop trying to gotcha me it isn't going to work and wastes both of our time.Suggestion Google fdny dropping physical test requirement then when you cry about the sourcing send a politely worded email to fdny asking if this is correct or not.This was already altered and reapproved.Eh pretty damn effective actually seeing as she is now working in the equivalent of journalism Siberia.It's why I'm extremely paranoid and frankly have laid False trails on other sections of Reddit using this account.Not saying I necessarily agree with what happened in that case but it was effective.Police brutality is a problem for everyone if you want to talk about a minority specific problem we could look at gang violence but that unfortunately gets dicey.  If we could actually talk about it we might make some headway towards convincing people to ban autos and semi autos but idk.Haven't you said you are white multiple times but legally a member of a tribe or something?A flat tax with no breaks for the rich would gain far more money than our current system full of loopholes which ends with corps paying fucking 10% taxes.Ah so your that guy I see on public transportation with his hand in his pocket while reading a kindle intently :PNah I said I would be dved for saying it was due to her gender.

Also hate to make you a liar but
&gt;I still haven't seen the predicted "you only hate Hillary because she's a woman and how dare you say bad things about her" comments.

https://www.reddit.com/r/GGdiscussion/comments/3olrcw/offtopic_cnn_democratic_debate_thread/cvz1btw

and

https://www.reddit.com/r/GGdiscussion/comments/3olrcw/offtopic_cnn_democratic_debate_thread/cvyob2k

That work?




Gang violence is a rather verboten topic in the US because frankly it has heavy racial components.  Which is why you will hear about the latest school shooting but won't hear crap about the people who died in Chicago to gang violence that day.  Because sickeningly enough as the joker said it's because it's expected unlike a school shooting.  If we could talk about it we might be able to show just how important restricting semi autos is.  Let's be honest any hunter worth shit doesn't need more than a rifle to hunt they sure as hell don't need a semi auto. &gt;then when you cry about the sourcing send a politely worded email to fdny asking if this is correct or not.Pillars of Eternity would be the most recent one.Kam has been flat out horrible aside from that one play 2 of the Bengals TDs were directly on him thinking he could pass of the TE when there was nobody to pass off to.Eli is not top 5 even with injuries top 10 yes but not top 5.how about no.The best part is jungle with tele is completely viable so I can go kill top lane then me and my buddy can port to bot and collect our double kill there.  But yeah tele totally isn't borked beyond belief atm :PMordekaiser is not a fucking positive.  Get that ap bruiser fuck out of my bot lane thanks.Nah Vayne and it isn't even close.  You can go 0/3 in lane as long as your team doesn't feed you become relevant the instant you get blade.  Most ADCs need IE which is 600 gold more and pd which is another 2800 gold before being viable at all.jinx is just disgustingly good she has incredible turret pushing but can swap to long range for teamfights has a global and multiple cc abilities.eh the biggest issue I have with mf is have to be close and I have no way to peel.  If I'm going to be in close I want vayne because I can tumble around I can condemn I get another cc as my first major item.  Otherwise I'll stick to stuff like jinx trist or even cait who can attack from relative safety by the time teamfights start.ADCs are not weak in an organized team with babysitters who can peal ftfy, also after getting solo lane farm.Uh no it's not at all.  anything over 1% past 50 in either direction should be getting looked at especially with high pick rate.Isn't Bustle a feminist site?

http://www.bustle.com/articles/53536-fdny-wants-more-women-firefighters-but-is-cutting-strength-requirements-the-way-to-do-it

and for the non ny post source of doing everything possible to get more woman firefighters.

http://newyork.cbslocal.com/2014/12/10/fdny-commissioner-vows-to-boost-hiring-of-female-firefighters/

CBS a right wing tabloid now?This I know my point as even a flat tax with no breaks would tax thema higher amount than they are currently paying.Ignored and told people to fuck off.  PR panicked the vast majority of their backers were telling them to ignore the idiots.Because the poem wasn't transphobic it was mocking one of two things the idiots who have transphobia or beer goggles.  If it ended with him killing the person he slept with instead of running off a cliff it would have been transphobic but it didn't.You are in favor of dropping the strength requirement for firefighters are you serious?Yes they were they were receiving major outside pressure even though the actual backers for the most part were fine with it.Riotakes a ton of money off new champion bundles if they couldn't be played in ranked that would go down significantly.I mean it could work of you got fed off assists and "kill secures"We also know what the author said it was intended to be which was at the expense of firedorn.Your opinion of what was right in my opinion taking away a backer award is worse than caving into offendatronic idiots who will likely never actually play the game.Yes her long political history is why I distrust her and so should anyone who actually looks at it.  She changes her views based on what is popular she has changed so many times we have no idea of her actual views and that is terrifying.No she really isn't Obama was a lot better than her at least he hadn't served on the Walmart board.  She is R light honestly the closest to a republican canidate that the dems have.It was a fucking backer reward that nobody even had to see it could have existed just fine.  Believe it or not most people who are liberal tend to be against censoring of ideas whether or not they agree with them shocking I know.So is watching people get murdered You should really look into the middle ages sometime which GoT is based on.  The reason people got bent out of shape is they have no idea of history and never read the books and were just watching the show because it was the cool thing to do.Or one is social interactions and the other isn't hence they are not exclusive.Perhaps we aren't the ones who need to get used to not having our every whim catered to ...Boy your face must be red.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PL2Zmye3BkYHere is an idea suck it the fuck up if something offends you don't fucking play it.  Don't cry about it because it doesn't have your perfect female character in it or is triggering just don't fucking play it.  Don't write a review full of bullshit just say my religion would compel to downrate this game unfairly as such I am not reviewing it.  Because yeah it is a fucking religion at this point.Welp guess what some people are offended by non nude women who aren't in the kitchen making food.  *Note this is highly sexist and I do not believe it personally* So in order to satisfy them I guess all women should be nude and making sandwiches in games.  I am purposely taking this to an absurd level because your statement is absurd.No it's her talking how she learned not to point it out to everyone she never said she stopped believing it she just doesn't point out everything she *sees* to everyone anymore.Yes it is rofl do you not know the definition of censorship?Yeah that wasn't how you comment was phrased.  You very simply if you don't care about other people nothing about offense just if you don't care about other people.  Don't try to backtrack now.I have no issue when my every whim isn't catered to was kind of the point of my comment.Reviewers aren't artists there are glorified bloggers providing product reviews.Actually a large majority of devs who I know consider her a complete idiot at this point at best.Feminism/Social Justice has essentially taken the place that religion once held in many people's lives.  To question it is verboten and many people essentially are subservient to it.  The whole idea of listen and believe all of this parallels religion extremely heavily.Hm I wonder what your reaction would be if someone was to say claim the stereotypes surrounding black people are correct ...Yes stuff like Arkham Horror dnd are a lot of fun with friends also Sentinels of the Multiverse but that's more of a card game.If I link the exact source of that quote is it still a rule one?  It's from the GJP logs.I don't think you get just how weird it is for 4 chan in particular to make a topic forbidden especially something like this.They do however have to act ethically.I know quite a few /shrug whether it is the prevailing feeling in the industry who knows but across multiple companies I know a lot of devs who believe it.  The E3 statements swayed a lot of people.Other way around mate GG weren't the one that wanted to make communities bend to their will.Just another reason we should have booths and it's pathetic we don't by now.Uh he didn't it in front of a ton of cameras including player cams and he isn't an idiot he knew full well it would be on film lol.  If anything that lends credence to it being a friendly jab.What they are doing is not debating it's phishing for gotchas aka blatantly arguing in bad faith, but looking at their posting history would be apparently too much to ask.We were up in the 4th if the D could have held we win.this was posted 2 hours ago I haven't done crap since.You guys really need to take a look into rule 4.  The reason I got pissed is the vast majority of these I have answered in the same threads as 3rd or directly to them before.  This seems to be the new style when you can't actually refute something ask for sourcing of every detail when it has been provided before.  Especially the stuff about AS's actual words I also know they have watched the AS videos which makes it double bullshit.  Either enforce it or get rid of it.It's almost like we have no idea of her True views since she just votes with what is most popular in order to accrue political capital but that couldn't be could it :PI intensely dislike Hilary she flip flops based on what is popular and there is no possible way to know her True views at this point.  She is also heavily pro big business and actually served on the walmart board.  I would rather have a president who literally does nothing for 4 years than have someone who puts tons of behind closed doors deals in place that we won't know about for years but will silently fuck the common man over and over.For fucks sake this is my alt I have no other alt involved in gg conversations because I'm paranoid because unlike most here I actually have something to lose.  Do not get involved in controversy if you want to work in AAA and are not currently a big name period.It should be enforced it just needs to actually be enforced it's a rule that is actually necessary for a working discussion/debate forum.  I'm talking about the literal words she has said not an interpretation, stuff like this.

&gt;The player cannot help but treat these female bodies as things to be acted upon,because they were designed, constructed and placed in the environment for that singular purpose. Players are meant to derive a perverse pleasure from desecrating the bodies of unsuspecting virtual female characters.
An alt is secondary non main reddit account.What shit how is outting a pedo shit.So stop outting people who are child predators because that is bad according to twitter got it just wanted to make sure.Or it's because Harper SRH ect have friends in twitter as we have seen when bans get reversed on them within minutes.Nope I absolutely want the sicks fucks who post shit caught that doesn't mean I want 8 Chan shut down a board of 30 or so users should not cause the shutdown of a website that 1000s use.not really malky didn't read the whole paragraph before queuing up their snide response.Reasonable people who think people going to cons and midnight releases is a horrible thing?Yeah there are certainly no cinephiles who feel Michael Bay and his ilk are ruining movies /s Or because they are just bad and were bad back then see the average game reviewer who has to go through a game on easy.Teuth read the whole paragraph specifically what the best response is.  A boycott isn't censorship now actually writing to advertisers is possibly an attempt to do that and I'm not for that except for pointing out ethical issues which should be fixed.I'm done replying to you I'm sick of playing gotchas and frankly you aren't good enough to amuse me with it.  It's just annoying due to the sloppy quality of attempts.Shit in this case refers to actions which twitter considers bad this is the action that directly preceded the ban.  Again stop trying to gotcha you suck at it.Can we get a blanket ban on linking to other subs and actual consequences.For fucks sake Teuth

&gt;In contrast, when private individuals or groups organize boycotts against stores that sell magazines of which they disapprove, their actions are protected by the First Amendment, although they can become dangerous in the extreme. *Private pressure groups, not the government, promulgated and enforced the infamous Hollywood blacklists during the McCarthy period.* **But these private censorship campaigns are best countered by groups and individuals speaking out and organizing in defense of the threatened expression.**

Italicized = gamers are dead ect.  Bolded = Boycotting in response to these pressures

Still not a fan of ODN outside of informing on major ethical issues like Gawker I consider polygon to have a major issue with only pushing one side and don't think they should be on meta.  However I don't consider them for the most part to be unethical except when they clearly use their position to punish or promote based on a specific agenda rather than review as close to impartially as possible.Disagree correct to an extent but not to the point of microaggressions and other bullshit at least not sane ones.Read the edited second paragraph I am not a fan of ODN because it reaches beyond just boycotting.  Boycotting is simply not consuming the product.  A True boycott would simple result in drops in profit with letters written directly to the source.  It's pushes into attempted censorship when we are talking about things like preventing people from entering a store due to it's politics.It's actually the opening two paragraphs but good try there champ.http://o.aolcdn.com/hss/storage/midas/129f43bb9aac415aadacdf416cd22954/202388980/08bfcc8d25af708509b5efcee7fb51e5.gif

Anytime you want to actually start having discussions about facts and not try to gotcha let me know until then shoo.I am talking about twitters value judgement again this is obvious if you aren't trying to twist words.As I said I'm not a fan of ODN beyond Gawker because Gawker has dozens of major ethical breachs and TOU breachs of adsense.Nope.  GG is fine with neutrals hell we welcome people who don't figuratively want us burned at the stake.  My favorite person in this whole mess is a neutral.  Antis on the other hand well you guys tend to be the side that screams it's not possible to be neutral.That's not an assumption journos have been flat out called out for it before.  Dude complained about the ending he got and the dev knew it was on easy because it changes at higher difficulties.I didn't quote the sentences as you should know if f you have read the article.Most people simply respond when they see something they as fuck don't check to see how many have responded.Replace sea lion with negro and let's see how fast you change your tune.The greatest thing about twitter for all it's shit is you can go private and only receive message from those you follow and who follow you.Correct far more people will see the tweet especially if it's by someone controversial.Because it is, it is literally a defense of racism or islamaphobia or w/e other isms you want to use.Repeated questions where no answer is given to an extremely bigoted remark rofl.I'm on Reddit aren't I? I use imgur I occasionally use Facebook or even gasp Tumblr.  There are pedos on all of these sites every single one.  So are you?
To any question no but when it's actual bigotry yes I feel repeated questioning is justified.It really is though what would the rage factor if I made say #killallblackmen it would be through the roof and rightly so.  Yet so called progressives think it's fine to use #killallwhitemen.  The rules are different for minorities and woman especially if they happen to agree with "progressives" politically.  As another example Jezebel made an article talking g about how they beat their boyfriends and the vast majority of comments were approving.  Or the article about how fuckable the new Canadian mayor was.  Now imagine these were made about woman instead.  The rage would overflow the internet.We also call ourselves aspies many of us are on the spectrum.  Furthermore these words serve as filters the same as scat or gore.I'm not?  Bringing idiots in from meta subs is harmful to having a discussion which is the stated purpose of this location.    I have no issue with specific sections being controlled I have an issue with topics that do not violate rules being off limits.How so the comic is racist sexist what have you.  Using a word replacement isn't bad faith.No I just believe if you don't have the skill level necessary to beat a game on it's intended difficulty you probably aren't going to understand the depth of the gameplay.  Also there is a major difference between casual and bad.  Someone who plays games once or twice a week is casual.  Someone who plays games constantly as their job and still sucks is just bad.Actually it's completely on topic you said it's an assumption journos are bad at games it really isn't there is plenty of evidence for it.If I browse ghazi and replace white with black that place ends up pretty fucking racist even by PC standards.White with black makes far more sense.  The session can be replaced with anything because it's a representation but actual races should be replaced with races and religions with religions.How in the world can you ever associate something that attacks someone for an accident of birth with good just wtf.I was talking about neutrals which aGG doesn't believe can exist judging by certain vociferous members.Rice wearing 80 in Seattle still makes me angry.Damn it you didn't end it in time we could have done the whole song.I thought that was Bom Trady?No I really don't.  The way that comic is written allows for substitution of anything.  But since you want to go with like to like.  Shall we talk about how #killallblackmen would go down?Nope but if you can't do a game on it's intended difficulty you shouldn't be doing a review of that game.  IE if you can't clear Halo on Heroic you shouldn't be doing a review.  Or win Madden on all pro basically the average online difficulty.  If you have the skill it takes no longer to clear Halo on legendary than it does on normal.There is actually a really interesting fan theory about how the Sith originally were the good guys.  The Jedi essentially cut off emotions.  While the Sith embrace passion and emotions.  Of course then you have the evil people coming in and co-opting it.could be idk but the numbers are much higher than they usually are on this sub.Again this isn't equivalent the sea lion in the comic is a clearly a stand in for either race/relgion or any other ism.  A food is a food much like a race is a race and a gender is a gender.The vast majority of antis I have interacted with are incredibly hostile towards neutrals and cast them as pros.Yeah it is please provide an alternate interpretation if not.You have 5 minutes to come back and make it cause a kill it doesn't have to they first time.nope, fits perfectly with what you said.So you can't provide an alternative interpretation that's all I wanted thanks.If you can't clear a game on the indented difficulty set by the creators you likely can't make accurate judgements about their combat system.  Some games are flat out not mean to be played by bads which is different than casuals or noobs for that matter.Uh yes it is actually.  Much like Madden is made for all pro.  When a difficulty literally says this is how Halo is meant to be played yeah it's made to be played on heroic.  Madden's online mode is all pro aka it's made to be played on all pro.

&gt;Martin O'Donnell stated that, 'Normal is for beginners who are embarrassed to pick Easy. Heroic is what we intended.'bads are people who play a ton of games but still suck.  Casuals are people of varying skill levels who occasionally play games newbs are new players who are pushing to get better.  There is some confusion since noobs is used to refer to people who play a lot and still suck as well but is not the same thing as newb.That isn't gatekeeping rofl it's categorization it's not saying they aren't gamers.  It's simply saying they do not have the skill necessary to actually analyze how many gameplay systems work in general especially complex ones that require skill to fully utilize.So he is just fine with bigotry kThen Cthulu comes and saves us all :DI would disagree and consider the artist to be fine with bigotry as result of said disagreement.Heroic is normal it's how Halo is meant to be played look it up devs have confirmed this.  Legendary equals hard mode.I beat games on "hard mode" aka intended difficulty faster than most people beat normal and I'm not even a QA person those guys are nuts.  Maybe that's what journos should do hire QA talent to record a full-length play through and explain the game systems then they can rewrite that into a coherent article.This is a commonly know opinion across the dev team Google it for once.The source is the difficulty selection screen which literally says This the way Halo is meant to be played underneath the heroic symbol.  The O'Donnell quote along with many others is from the heroic section of the halo wiki now feel free to Google.No said they were arguing in bad faith because I had already answered the vast majority of their questions to them before sometimes multiple times.Unlike you I'm actually in the industry.The downvote into oblivion still happens here especially when someone links to a meta.Frankly you come off as someone very bitter towards the industry curious what happened obviously only if you can say without doxing yourseldUh so does Harper not use her own blacklist?  Because she is one of the most vociferous complainers.Because they were asking for the same evidence I had already provided multiple times while I was at work when I obviously wasn't going to looking for links again.She uses her own blog post and still complains a lot that kind of contradicts what you claimed.I really fucking hope not come on Bernie.That's almost as entertaining a post as medievals poc's fantasies but not quite

Edit:  Also I don't consider pushing for censorship to be left wing I'm weird that way.Fun fact they did not exist in landlocked Bohemia at least beyond one slave who was so unusual that a slave was actually put down in accounts of the court.How is arguing something backed up by previous actions especially when I actually believe it arguing in bad faith.Whatever he says doesn't change what appears to be fact that he is fine with bigotry being excused by using his comic.Hillary is someone who I do not trust in the slightest she flip flops with what is popular and sat on the Walmart board.  I would rather have a president who does nothing than have her in a position to make deals behind closed doors that we won't be able to do shit about.They will be you are being biased as fuckThat has literally nothing to do with the topic at hand.So a Mary SueDemos of AAA and lack of corresponding huge jumps when creating a game with a female protag as well as the increased scrutiny that comes with a female protag says yeah it does.

Now if people stop nitpicking apart female characters they would likely become more common.It feels like a token because they promoted a fucking quest giver to say look at how progressive we are please forget about Unity.No us citizens will be a large chunk but so will EU and other regions.  It will not be US as a majority it never is for AAA outside of maybe Madden.Yeah I'm pretty sure Razor Net and I are the loathed ones but if we add you to the list we couled make a Mount Rushmore of pGG people loathed by aGG and the metas which totally don't have near 100% crossover :P  So I'm all for it when should we begin construction.better?good?With my post not at all with one's above it possible but then it should have been made in reply to them not me.No I'm actually going with the opposite.  I would rather have Bernie even if he does literally nothing for 4 years other than play with legos in the oval office than have Hillary.  Because I do not trust her I do not know her True positions she has flip flopped based on what is popular and likely planned on running for President as far back as when Bill was in office.  She also is rather pro big business I consider her an R light and she is smart enough to put deals in place behind closed doors that could fuck the average American.  Logically I have no reason to trust her I have no idea of her True positions.TIL we were talking about the entire earth rather than the 9 square kilometers that Kingdom Come Deliverance takes place in.I didn't make up anything we heard about a fucking quest giver months before the game released simply to say look at us we are so progressive.  The tokens they added and characters they removed will likely add at least a point if not more to their score from many sites that are trying to be "progressive"Uh no it isn't no region is ever a majority outside of Madden and specific Japanese games the major regions usually fall along 30/30/30/10 lines.  This can shift somewhat with games like FiFa as well but that is the general breakdown same thing happens on steam.PL no offense but when you are already banning people for past transgressions and only from one side you aren't going to create a common ground.http://i0.wp.com/venturebeat.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/05/Newzoo_Global_Games_Market_2015_Per_Region_V1_Transparent.png?fit=780%2C9999

Since apparently you can't google US is nowhear near a majority Asia has far more in terms of game sales though the US and China are very close in how much they spend on games.Really I made up that they promoted a quest giver in interviews?Good thing I'm not loathed by pros or really anyone outside of antis then.No it's point out the difference between Tomb Raider coverage and Deus Ex yet again.  Or the countless males who are skewered shot stabbed cut apart in games vs the reactions when females are treated similarly.When they are people go nuts.  What is called fridging specifically for females happens often to males with the most famous example being Uncle Ben obviously.That's cute now collect a week from TB sometime.I enjoy them as well one of my favorite recent games is Tomb Raider the difference is the level of scrutiny that comes with having a female main character.&gt; simply to say look at us we are so progressive.

Is what I was replying to.  If it wasn't to do that they wouldn't have promoted it and would simply have added hints in game to allow the player to figure it out on their own.  A good trans character is not one who is in your face about being trans because the vast majority in real life simply want to be seen as the sex they feel like they are.  Very often they won't even mention that they are trans except to very close friends or where they can't be identified ie the internet.Oh yeah agree with that I'm really not a fan of callout culture whatsoever.  That includes what Tfoot did for that matter what EG did.  In EG's case I can excuse it a little bit more because it was his response to being emotionally abused and frankly he is an SJW so his reaction makes sense in that context.  Doesn't mean I'm a fan of it.I wasn't talking about me I was talking about net I'm not banned at least I don't believe I amhttps://www.reddit.com/r/GGdiscussion/comments/3psk82/anita_sarkeesian_reviews_assassins_creed/cw9fs5i

Look at the context he is claiming that adversity can only be sufffered due to the government.  This is in response to an lgbt person saying yeah they face struggles which they absolutely do.  If anything that would be a rule 4.My biggest issue is if we couldn't have Heir I wanted a movie with Luke's son.  Continuing the father to son thing.  I don't think that is happening.  Also really pissed about the EU not existing anymore Luke and Mara forever and Jaina Jacen Anakin Tenel Ka ect.Hm that actually sounds really good I usually do hardboiled or sunny side up but might have to try that.So Milo trolled a bunch of people into wasting time attempting to troll a troll?  Almost as good as getting Mary Sue ect to go nuts over the #boycottstarwars troll I suppose.I make short ribs that are to die for slow cook em all day and they literally fall apart in your mouth.  Freaking wonderful and I actually have money to make them semi consistently now :DHey I got in the cool kids club without ever even posting so I'm pretty sure that makes me lead of the cool kids club right?Tbh I think milo trolled a bunch of people into wasting time and is giggling over their responses.I didn't even see my name til I looked at the sub tbh I wasn't sure if you were serious about net or not.Nah I hate his guts I just think he is damn good at trolling.Besides the defaults that I'm too lazy to unsub from

/r/Overwatch 

/r/nfl 

/r/aww - It's a default but I would be subbed to it no matter what

/r/leagueoflegends

/r/DotA2 

/r/Cloud9 
hm what is that from?There is nothing wrong with ASUS rofl.I mean it's needed in CS as well there are often multi level structures.Korean but closeLong as they have decent matchmaking pubs won't get stuck with pros for long.Agreed the only issue I had in alpha was how slow it was to acquire new heroes course once i got nova and zera I just spammed them over and over.  Once it got into open to the public mode it was much more annoying.For League Midwestern Korean.  League pretty much considers the Koreans to be gods.  Which is somewhat True but it's more due to their infrastructure than the meta which is roughly the same for everyone now.  I'm actually really annoyed with the jugg rework because it has caused a rather standardized meta compared to other worlds.She deep breaths more damn it.would 5 in the morning be a better time for you?  Sorry but I need that NR gear for AQI fully expect he won't be able to do anything I would still rather have him than someone who is heavily pro corps and could put into place backroom deals.Natalia Simonova - Izabella Scorupco was absolutely gorgeous and crazy smart as well if her job was anything to judge by.Because there is a difference between sexism and misogyny which people don't seem to get.  Misogyny means a hatred of women.  It is not a 20 dollar replacement for sexism which is what most try to use it as especially on reddit and social media.

http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/misogyny
Fuck I thought D2 would be good enough no pushing for jungle in C9 :(

In all seriousness Rush please or Adrian either or.Hence why jungle and support are much better roles for him you don't have to cs.  CS is by far the most micro movements during laning.Vesper does but it probably should have been the girl who got shot by the bad dude for Skyfall.Starcraft players get massive issues later in life as well.  You need to micro far less in the jungle especially after first clear you just got down your f keys looking for ganks and navigating via ma